











Courage to Stand | Pawlenty, Tim                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                  | LifeWay Christian Non-Fiction























Find a Store
Español
Help & FAQ






LifeWay Christian Resources




Shop



Events



Ministry



Articles



Church Ordering





Sign In / Register




















Select a field to search: 

All
Title
Product #
Author



Search 


Search

















eBook



View Larger Size




Courage to Stand - eBook (eBook) 
An American Story


Pawlenty, Tim (Author)	
									        	
									





												File Type:
											 
											EPUB
										

Long before he was considered a top prospective presidential candidate for 2012—even before he landed on John McCain's short list of potential running mates in 2008—Governor Tim Pawlenty had already earned legendary status in conservative




Description


										Long before he was considered a top prospective presidential candidate for 2012—even before he landed on John McCain's short list of potential running mates in 2008—Governor Tim Pawlenty had already earned legendary status in conservative circles. In his hard-left-leaning home state of Minnesota, the man known as "T-Paw" somehow erased a $4.8-billion budget deficit while simultaneously reforming health care, creating jobs, improving education, and supporting renewable energy reform—all without raising taxes. In Courage to Stand, Pawlenty reveals, for the first time, how he found the resolve to get the job done, taking readers all the way back to the lessons he learned as a boy in the gritty meatpacking town of South St. Paul. From the devastating early death of his mother to the struggle to work his way through college and law school and his epic political battles as governor, Pawlenty opens up about his deepest beliefs and shares his vision for a better America.
									




Available Formats



															eBook, Non-Fiction
														
$26.99










Share



















$26.99















Quantity:



													Add to Cart
												











Courage to Stand - eBook (eBook)
Long before he was considered a top prospective presidential candidate for 2012—even before he landed on John McCain's short list of potential running mates in 2008—Governor Tim Pawlenty had already earned legendary status in conservative

$26.99


 



Media


























Specifications


Medium Format
eBook


Product Group
Books


Type
Non-Fiction


Publication Date
2011-01-11


Publisher
Tyndale House Publishers, Inc.


Item Number
005575264


ISBN10
1414351542


ISBN13
9781414351544



Contributors

												Pawlenty, Tim                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                  (Author)
								    	    		
									   	    



Maximum Downloads
0


Maximum Devices
0










     About LifeWay  About Us Contact Us Careers Internships Newsroom Licensing & Permissions Privacy Policy Product Submission Writing for LifeWay    My Account  My Orders My Downloads Shipping Rates Return Policy Gift Cards Live Chat!    Digital Resources  Ministry Grid LifeWay Worship Digital Church KidEvent Pro Downloads MyCurriculum Manager Simulcast Management LifeWay Reader eBooks SmallGroup.com New Churches Twenty28    Join now! Get inspiring content, special offers, and more.      Email Address   Sign Up    Like us on Facebook Follow us on Twitter Google +       LifeWay Network: LifeWay Research B&H Ridgecrest     Sites  Fuge MyWordSearch Your VBS CentriKid    Blogs  Thom Rainer Eric Geiger Women’s All Access    Featured  Authors Books Movies Music Events Articles      Bible Studies for...   Adults Kids Men Women Young Adults Youth Small Groups Sunday School All Bible Studies    Shop for...  Adult Ministry Girl's Ministry Kid's Ministry Men's Ministry Preteen Ministry Women's Ministry Worship Ministry Youth Ministry          Payment Options: LifeWay Account, MasterCard, Visa, Discover and American Express LifeWay Accounts are for churches, ministries, and businesses only. Organizations having a not for profit status may also enjoy savings by not having to pay sales tax on qualifying products. © 2001– LifeWay Christian Resources   Your trusted source of Christian resources since 1891    


















Tim Pawlenty Products - Premiere Collectibles







































                                           















0









Contact
Our Story

Login


Sign Up






Search Keyword:

















Shop All
Bestsellers
New Releases
Recently Added
Upcoming Releases
Rare books
On Clearance




0
















Search Keyword:









Shop All
Bestsellers
New Releases
Recently Added
Upcoming Releases
Rare books
On Clearance
Contact
Our Story

Login


Sign Up





 





Home


Tim Pawlenty












Tim Pawlenty


There are no products listed under this brand.





 










Sign up for our Latest News & Special Offers












Email Address









 


Stay Connected














 

×













Categories



2016 Presidential Candidates


Celebrities


Children


Fiction


Gift Box Editions


Inspirational / Motivational


Non-Fiction


Politics


Presidents


Premiere Platinum




Popular Authors


Greg Gutfeld


Sherrilyn Kenyon


Karen Kingsbury


Brad Thor


Brandon Steiner


Glenn Beck


Mike Huckabee


Richard Paul Evans


Eric Metaxas


George W. Bush





Need some help?

Affiliate Program
Ordering
Shipping & Delivery
Returns & Refunds
Certificate of Authenticity





Testimonials




You guys have great products and communication. If you were Ebay I'd leave A+++++ feedback!

Jeff, Maryland



I just got off the phone with one of your reps.  I can't believe how GREAT your customer service team is!  THANK YOU, THANK YOU, THANK YOU!!

Theresa, New Jersey



I like the collectors box… thank you…for excellent service!!!

Bill, California



My book came today and I couldn't be any more pleased than I am.  What a nice book and what a nice gift it would make for anyone.

Gail, New York



Everything I have ever bought from you has been quality. The method you have presented these books is above all the rest… your books are some of the very best I own.

William, Tennessee



Your efforts to compensate for the unforeseeable are extraordinary. I commend you and your organization for such prompt, customer-oriented action. You not only won my future business, you will receive my highest recommendation when referencing your firm to my colleagues

Lawrence, Arizona



I received my signed book today in the mail.  I have never received anything packaged so beautifully. The leather case for the book is sooooo beautiful!  Thank you so much

Sahirah, Virginia















Search Keyword:






 






                            Cart 
                            ( 
                                0
                            )
                        


Home

Contact


Our Story

Login
Sign Up




Politics
Fiction
Children's
Inspirational
Military
Rare Books













Contact | 
                        Our Story | 
                            Login |
                            Sign Up









                    © 1995-2017, Premiere Collectibles Inc.
                    
Privacy Policy | Terms of Service



























Tim Pawlenty: Republican Party Needs Better Marketing, Better Product To Win Election
































































  U.S.EditionsAustralia EditionChina EditionIndia EditionItaly EditionJapan EditionSingapore EditionUnited KingdomUnited States Jul 28, 3:20 AM EDT  Subscribe  Search     Search     

 World  Tim Pawlenty: Republican Party Needs Better Marketing, Better Product To Win Election By  Laura Matthews  @LauraMatt   On 11/18/12 AT 10:18 AM             Former Gov. Tim Pawlenty of Minnesota.   Photo: REUTERS/Bryan Snyder   Republican Tim Pawlenty, who served as the 39th governor of Minnesota, said his party lost the 2012 election because it needed better marketing and a better product, not because President Barack Obama handed out “gifts” to minorities.In an interview with C-SPAN’s “Newsmakers” program, which is scheduled to air 10 a.m. Sunday, Pawlenty disagreed with Republican candidate Mitt Romney, who told his big donors in a conference call last week that his election loss resulted from Obama being “very generous” to the African-Americans, Latinos and young voters, who make up his core constituencies.“I do think if you look back at the election of 2012, when you have a product that you put into the market place – Republican perspective – and the market place doesn’t buy it, you either have to have better marketing or a better product,” Pawlenty said. “And so this is a wake up call for the Republican Party to first of all have better marketing and that involves a lot of things.“Clearly as the discussion unfolds, Republicans need to do better with female voters, blue collar voters, Latino and Hispanic voters,” he added. “So there’s a need to better market, but we also need to have products that sell better. And that doesn’t mean you change your philosophy, but I think President Obama first of all, just tactically did a better job getting out the vote in his campaign. No. 2, he, at least at the margins, was better able to connect with people in this campaign and then they made that judgment. But I don’t think it’s a matter of people looking at the election and say, ‘I’m going to vote because of gifts.’ I think they looked at it and said which one these candidates would they prefer because leadership considerations and also who can also understand their needs the best.”This is a very different assessment of the election loss from the one Romney gave during the conference call.Romney told the wealthy donors, “With regards to the young people, for instance, a forgiveness of college-loan interest was a big gift. Free contraceptives were very big with young, college-aged women. And then, finally, Obamacare also made a difference for them, because as you know, anybody now 26 years of age and younger was now going to be part of their parents' plan, and that was a big gift to young people.”Several Republican governors have already started distancing themselves from Romney, saying those views were not shared by the party. Louisiana Gov. Bobby Jindal called Romney’s gifts claims “absolutely wrong.” He also said it was time the Republican Party focuses on getting 100 percent of the votes and stop dividing the American voters.Pawlenty, who is now the president and CEO the Washington, D.C.-based advocacy group Financial Services Roundtable, said there’s a lot more to Obama’s winning the re-election and that it isn’t as simple as saying he gave out gifts.Obama’s margin Among African-Americans voters was 93 percent. Among Latinos it was 71 percent and 60 percent among young voters between ages 18 to 29.







 

Most Read



The NewsletterExclusive articles delivered to your inbox daily.Subscribe

Recommended



  BusinessSpaceX To Test Falcon Heavy Rocket In November The private space transport company’s CEO Elon Musk made the announcement late Thursday on his Instagram and Twitter accounts. Technology5G Capable iPhone 8 In The Works? An FCC listing revealed Friday that Apple has received approval from the Federal Communications Commission to test 5G broadband. WorldCharlie Gard To Be Transferred From Hospital To Hospice, Court Rules The decision comes after the terminally ill baby's parents announced their decision to withdraw a legal battle against the hospital that had been going around for months. NationalTrump In Two Minds Over Russia Sanctions Bill? The White House has been giving mixed signals on whether POTUS will sign the Russia sanctions bill that passed the Senate on Thursday with an overwhelming majority.





 













World | International Business Times














































  U.S.EditionsAustralia EditionChina EditionIndia EditionItaly EditionJapan EditionSingapore EditionUnited KingdomUnited States Jul 28, 2:53 AM EDT  Subscribe  Search     Search      

 World  Motorbike Pillion Flung Into Air After Collision With Stationary Car By Shreesha Ghosh Videos of the accident, circulating online, show two Malaysian security guards flung off a green motorcycle after they crashed into the stationary white sedan on the highway. Erica Abbot: Professional Dancer Killed by Car in Brooklyn Bike Accident Man Trying To Scam Woman For Auto Insurance Money Caught On Camera   Bull Kills Itself After Its Horns Are Set On Fire With Torches By Dory Jackson A fighting bull killed itself during a festival after event organizers purposefully set its horns set on fire with torches. 5 Animals On The Brink Of Extinction Today How Noise Pollution Affects Animals And Even PlantsMore StoriesWatch: Fukushima Robot Finds Chunks Of Nuclear Fuel Debris Underwater By Juliana Rose Pignataro on 07/27/17 AT 11:23 AM Video recorded by the robot showed “lava-like” lumps of what appeared to be melted fuel debris inside the submerged No. 3 reactor.Burundi Robotics Team Members Told Parents They Wouldn't Return Home By Juliana Rose Pignataro on 07/27/17 AT 11:09 AM Six teenage members of Burundi's robotics team vanished after a competition in Washington, D.C.Study: Alcohol Might Boost Memory, Help Improve Retention Power By Shreesha Ghosh on 07/27/17 AT 7:20 AM The University of Exeter in U.K. conducted a study to examine how alcohol consumption can affect the brain and its abilities and found that people who drank alcohol could remember more.Shark Attacks Map 2017: Full Timeline Of When And Where By Juliana Rose Pignataro on 07/27/17 AT 6:34 AM Better conservation and more humans mean more shark attacks. Here's where they're happening.After Trump's Ban, Canadian Forces Welcome Transgender Soldiers By Amruta Agnihotri on 07/27/17 AT 1:42 AM The Canadian armed forces posted a message on Twitter inviting people of all sexual orientation and gender identities to join them.Diver Has Close Encounter With Rare Megamouth Shark By Juliana Rose Pignataro on 07/26/17 AT 5:44 PM A British diver was lucky enough to catch a glimpse of one of the ocean’s most elusive sharks.An Official US Warning For Tourists To Mexico By Juliana Rose Pignataro on 07/26/17 AT 4:28 PM The State Department warning may have been prompted by the mysterious death of Abbey Conner, 20, at a luxury resort in Mexico in January.This Fish With 3 Rows Of Teeth Once Ruled The Ocean By Elana Glowatz on 07/26/17 AT 2:46 PM How long did it take for giant predators to evolve after the worst mass extinction event in Earth’s history? Not as long as you may think, based on this fish with a big mouth.Finally, A Detailed Look At A Gamma-Ray Burst By Himanshu Goenka on 07/26/17 AT 1:00 PM Thought to occur when a massive star collapses into a neutron or quark star or a black hole, or when two neutron stars merge, gamma-ray bursts are the most powerful explosions in the universe.Prehistoric Humans Ate Wheat As They Hiked Across Mountains By Elana Glowatz on 07/26/17 AT 12:40 PM Prehistoric humans packed wheat with them for food as they crossed through mountain passes and spread across the planet.The Hidden Lives Of Queer People In The Military By Shirleene Robinson on 07/26/17 AT 9:21 AM It has been argued that homosexuality threatens military cohesion and morale.Malaysia Airline CEO Expects MH370 Breakthrough In 4 Years By Suman Varandani on 07/26/17 AT 8:28 AM Flight MH370 went missing on March 8, 2014, with 239 people on board while on its way from Kuala Lumpur to Beijing.France Wildfires Force Evacuation Of 10,000 People By Ishani Roy on 07/26/17 AT 7:40 AM A new fire broke out in southern France on Tuesday, which was facing massive blazes that started this week.UK To Ban Sale Of Petrol And Diesel Cars By 2040 By Shubham Kishore on 07/26/17 AT 7:07 AM After a legal battle the government was ordered to come up with new plans to curb level of nitrogen dioxide pollutants,Delta Deplanes Man For Being Russian  By Gayathri Anuradha on 07/26/17 AT 6:23 AM The passenger, Andrei Yeremin said would file a suit against the airline.German Man Swims To Work Every Day  By Pritha Paul on 07/26/17 AT 5:30 AM Every morning Benjamin David packs his essential things into a water-proof bag and dives into the Isar, which flows right next to a busy street of Munich.Rick Perry Discusses Energy Issues In Prank-Call By Chandan Prasad on 07/26/17 AT 2:53 AM In a 22-minute call, the energy secretary discussed fuel made from alcohol and pig manure, cyberhacking and the U.S. withdrawal from the Paris Agreement.Ahead of Armistice Day, North Korean Military Officials Vow War By Shubham Kishore on 07/26/17 AT 1:40 AM Servicemen from North Korea's military have vowed their firm readiness to fight with the United States ahead of the 64th anniversary of the armistice that ended the 1950-53 Korean War.Serial Killer Elizabeth Wettlaufer Has Nursing License Revoked By Andrew N. White on 07/25/17 AT 7:25 PM The ex-nurse was fired for mishandling insulin three months before killing her last victim and was stripped of her nurse's license.Pieces Are Already Breaking Off Antarctica’s Lost Iceberg By Elana Glowatz on 07/25/17 AT 3:47 PM The huge iceberg that calved off Antarctica earlier this month is already breaking into smaller ice pieces that could be hazardous to sailors.PagesNext 

Most Read



  












Tim Pawlenty - Wikipedia




















 







Tim Pawlenty

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Tim Pawlenty








Chair of the National Governors Association


In office
July 23, 2007 – July 14, 2008


Preceded by
Janet Napolitano


Succeeded by
Ed Rendell


39th Governor of Minnesota


In office
January 6, 2003 – January 3, 2011


Lieutenant
Carol Molnau


Preceded by
Jesse Ventura


Succeeded by
Mark Dayton


Majority Leader of the Minnesota House of Representatives


In office
January 3, 1999 – January 3, 2003


Governor
Jesse Ventura


Preceded by
Ted Winter


Succeeded by
Erik Paulsen


Member of the Minnesota House of Representatives
from District 38B


In office
January 3, 1993 – January 3, 2003


Preceded by
Art Seaberg


Succeeded by
Lynn Wardlow





Personal details


Born
Timothy James Pawlenty
(1960-11-27) November 27, 1960 (age 56)
Saint Paul, Minnesota, U.S.


Nationality
American


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Mary Anderson


Children
2


Alma mater
University of Minnesota, Twin Cities (BA, JD)


Signature



Timothy James "Tim" Pawlenty (/pəˈlɛnti/;[1] born November 27, 1960) is president and CEO of Financial Services Roundtable, a Washington, D.C.-based industry advocacy group. He was a Republican politician who served as the 39th Governor of Minnesota (2003–2011). He previously served in the Minnesota House of Representatives (1993–2003), where he was majority leader for two terms. In 2011, he entered the campaign for the Republican presidential nomination and later was a potential vice presidential nominee before serving as co-chair of Mitt Romney's campaign.
Pawlenty was born in Saint Paul, Minnesota, and raised in nearby South St. Paul. He graduated from University of Minnesota with a B.A. in political science and a J.D. His early career included working as a labor law attorney and the vice president of a software as a service company. After settling in the city of Eagan with his wife, Pawlenty was appointed to the city's Planning Commission and was elected to the Eagan City Council at the age of 28. He won a seat as a state representative in 1992, representing District 38B in suburban Dakota County. He was re-elected four times and was voted majority leader by House Republicans in 1998.
After narrowly winning the Republican gubernatorial primary in 2002, Pawlenty won a three-way election for Governor of Minnesota, and was re-elected in 2006 by a margin of less than one percent. His campaign platform focused on balancing the budget without raising taxes. During Pawlenty's governorship, he did not raise income taxes, but did enact targeted increases in sales tax and user fees. His administration advocated for numerous public works projects, including work on the Northstar Commuter Rail Line, and the construction of Target Field, a Major League Baseball stadium in Minneapolis. He signed a bill mandating 20% ethanol in gasoline by 2013. He cut health care costs in an attempt to balance the budget, and borrowed funds from the state's K-12 education and low income programs. He signed an executive order rejecting federal funds related to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act. He also led worldwide trips for business leaders and trade delegations to explore trade opportunities. In the 2007–2008 term, he served as chairman of the National Governors Association.
Pawlenty was rumored to be a contender for both the Republican presidential and vice presidential nominations during the 2008 election, and he officially sought the 2012 Republican presidential nomination from May to August 2011. After withdrawing from that race, he became a finalist to join his party's nominee on the 2012 ticket as its vice presidential candidate.[2] Pawlenty was not selected as Mitt Romney's vice presidential candidate, but served as co-chair of Romney's campaign. In September 2012, he left Romney's campaign to become a Washington lobbyist for financial institutions.[3]



Contents


1 Early life, education, and early career
2 Minnesota House of Representatives
3 Governorship

3.1 Election, 2002
3.2 Reelection, 2006
3.3 State budget

3.3.1 Minnesota Supreme Court case


3.4 Funding projects
3.5 Education
3.6 Transportation
3.7 Crime
3.8 Energy policy and climate change
3.9 Health
3.10 Foreign relations
3.11 Other activities


4 2012 presidential campaign

4.1 Early steps
4.2 Book tour and political positions
4.3 Candidacy


5 Financial Services Roundtable
6 Personal life
7 Public image

7.1 Political views
7.2 Approval ratings
7.3 Electoral history


8 References
9 External links



Early life, education, and early career
Pawlenty was born in Saint Paul, Minnesota, to Eugene Joseph Pawlenty, and his wife, Virginia Frances (née Oldenburg).[4][5] His father, who drove a milk delivery truck, was of Polish descent, while his mother was of German ancestry.[4] His mother died of cancer when he was 16.[6] Pawlenty grew up in South St. Paul,[5] where he played ice hockey on his high school's junior varsity squad.[7]
Intending to become a dentist, Pawlenty enrolled in the University of Minnesota, the only one in his family to go beyond high school.[8] However, he changed his plans and spent the summers of 1980 and 1982 working as an intern at the office of U.S. Senator David Durenberger.[5] In 1983, he graduated with a B.A. in political science.[9] He received a Juris Doctor from the University of Minnesota Law School in 1986.[10] While in law school, he met wife, Mary Anderson, whom he married in 1987.[11]
Pawlenty first worked as a labor law attorney at the firm Rider Bennett (later Rider, Bennett, Egan & Arundel), where he had interned while a law student.[12] He later became vice president of a software as a service company, Wizmo Inc.[13][14]
Having moved to Eagan, Minnesota, a suburb of Minneapolis – Saint Paul, Pawlenty was appointed to the city's Planning Commission by Mayor Vic Ellison.[14][15] One year later, at age 28, he was elected to the City Council.[6]
Pawlenty entered state politics in 1990 as a campaign advisor for Jon Grunseth's losing bid for Minnesota governor.[6] After Pawlenty himself became governor, he appointed Grunseth's ex-wife, Vicky Tigwell, to the board of the Minneapolis−Saint Paul International Airport, an action which became an ethics and accountability issue in 2003.[16][17]
Minnesota House of Representatives
Pawlenty was elected to the Minnesota House of Representatives in 1992, winning 49.1 percent of the vote in District 38B (suburban Dakota County).[18] In the House, he authored bills instituting term limits for committee chairmen, funding for infant parenting classes, minimum sentences for repeat domestic violence offenders, and community notification for sex offenders. In response to a state budget surplus, he advocated for a tax reduction rather than expanded education funding.[19] He was reelected four times and was chosen House Majority Leader when the Republicans became the majority party in the State Legislature in 1998.[20]
Governorship
Election, 2002
Main article: Minnesota gubernatorial election, 2002
In 2002, Pawlenty wanted to run for governor, but party leaders made it clear they favored businessman Brian Sullivan.[6][21] Pawlenty then decided on the U.S. Senate, but he abandoned those plans when Vice President Dick Cheney asked him to step aside and allow former St. Paul mayor Norm Coleman to challenge Senator Paul Wellstone without Republican primary opposition.[22] Pawlenty returned to his original ambition and won a hard-fought and narrow victory over Sullivan in the Republican party primary election.[23]
In the general election, Pawlenty faced two strong opponents. His main rival was veteran Democratic–Farmer–Labor (DFL) state senator Roger Moe. Former Democratic Congressman Tim Penny ran on the Independence Party ticket (Governor Jesse Ventura, a member of the Independence Party, chose not to seek reelection). Until mid-October 2002, all three were essentially tied in the polls.[24] Pawlenty's major campaign stances included: a pledge not to raise taxes to balance the state's budget deficit (while allowing for increases in license and user fees);[24] that visa expiration dates be required to be printed on driver's licenses; that women seeking an abortion be required to wait at least 24 hours; enactment of a concealed carry gun law; and reform of the state's education requirements.[25] Pawlenty won the election with 43.8 percent of the vote.[26] His largest gains after the October three-way tie were reportedly among voters in the suburbs of Minneapolis–St. Paul.[24]
Reelection, 2006
Main article: Minnesota gubernatorial election, 2006
Governor Pawlenty ran for re-election in 2006.[27] He espoused conservative stands on issues. But conservatives criticized him on funding issues, in particular two pieces of legislation for stadiums for the Gophers and Minnesota Twins, and bond issues for public transit, including the Northstar commuter rail line.[28]
The 2006 gubernatorial race included Minnesota Attorney General Mike Hatch, of the DFL; Peter Hutchinson of the Independence Party; and Ken Pentel of the Green Party. Pawlenty won, defeating Hatch by a margin of less than one percent, though both the state House and Senate gained DFL majority.[29]
State budget
Pawlenty was elected in 2002 on a platform of balancing the state's budget without raising taxes. He emphasized his campaign and first term with the Taxpayers League of Minnesota slogan "no new taxes."[30] His governorship was characterized by a historically low rate of spending growth. According to the Minnesota Management and Budget Department, general-fund expenditures from 2004 to 2011 increased an average of 3.5 percent per two-year term, compared to an average of 21.1 percent from 1960 to 2003 (these numbers, however, are not inflation-adjusted).[31][32][33] University of Minnesota political science professor Larry Jacobs said that slowing down state spending and opposing tax increases were the "signature issue" of Pawlenty's governorship.[34]
In his first year as governor, Pawlenty inherited a projected two-year budget deficit of $4.3 billion, the largest in Minnesota's history.[35] After a contentious budget session with a Democrat-controlled Senate, he signed a package of fee increases, spending reductions, and government reorganization which eliminated the deficit. The budget reduced the rate of funding increases for state services, including transportation, social services, and welfare. It also enacted a perennial proposal to restructure city aid based on immediate need, rather than historical factors. In negotiations the governor agreed to several compromises, abandoning a desired public employee wage freeze and property tax restrictions.[35]
During his second term, Pawlenty erased a $2.7-billion deficit by cutting spending, shifting payments, and using one-time federal stimulus money.[36] His final budget (2010–2011) was the state's first two-year period since 1960 in which net government expenditures decreased. Pawlenty has claimed this as "the first time in 150 years" that spending has been cut, but fact-checkers have disputed this claim as no public budget records prior to 1960 are known to exist.[33][37]
Pawlenty has been criticized by some for providing a short-term budget solution but coming up short in his long-term strategy as governor. The state department of Management and Budget reports that the two-year budget starting in July 2011 is projected to come up $4.4 billion short.[36] Former Minnesota Governor Arne Carlson, a Republican, criticized Pawlenty's budget strategy: he borrowed more than $1 billion from the tobacco settlement (money set aside for health care), borrowed more than $1.4 billion from K-12 education funding, borrowed more than $400 [million][38] from the Health Care Access Fund for low-income families, among other short-term shifts in accounting. The result was a $5-billion deficit, the seventh largest in the United States.[39] Minnesota property taxes rose $2.5 billion, more than the previous 16 years combined, and Moody's lowered the state's bond rating.[40] Carlson told Time, "I don't think any governor has left behind a worse financial mess than he [Pawlenty] has." Pawlenty responded, "My friend governor Arne Carlson is, of course, now an Obama and John Kerry supporter."[41]
Minnesota Supreme Court case




Minnesota Supreme Court chamber at the Minnesota State Capitol


While Pawlenty said he was "confident" in his right to use unallotment, the Minnesota Supreme Court ultimately decided against him, voting 4 to 3 in a decision in May 2010.[42] His budget had been the subject of a lawsuit in Ramsey County District Court, which was decided against him. Judge Kathleen Gearin decided Pawlenty exceeded his constitutional authority in making unilateral spending cuts to a $5.3-million special dietary program that he had unalloted.[43][44] Attorney David Lillehaug said initially, "This is, I don't think it's understating this to say, this is one of the most important court cases in Minnesota legal history."[45] Pawlenty announced the following day that he would appeal;[46] he filed his defense in February,[47] and arguments were heard on March 15.[48][49] In May, the Supreme Court affirmed Judge Gearin, deciding that "Because the legislative and executive branches never enacted a balanced budget for the 2010–2011 biennium, use of the unallotment power to address the unresolved deficit exceeded the authority granted to the executive branch by the statute".[50] Pawlenty responded:[51]

I will fight to reduce spending and taxes in Minnesota and that battle continues. My commitment to the people of Minnesota remains the same: we will balance the budget without raising taxes.

After the court ruling, as the 2010 legislative session drew to a close, Pawlenty vetoed a budget which would fix a $2.9-billion deficit by adding a new tax bracket for six-figure incomes. In response to the proposal, he criticized Democrats for attempting to raise taxes in the midst of an extremely difficult economic situation.[52] Eventually, due in part to the efforts of House Speaker Margaret Kelliher, who was running for the 2010 Democratic nomination for governor of Minnesota, the General Assembly passed legislation approving nearly all the original unallotments.[53]
Funding projects
Since the Minnesota Constitution prohibits state-run gambling outside of Native territory, Pawlenty proposed negotiating with Minnesota's 11 tribes over profit-sharing of their casinos.[54] Legislators also pushed a proposal to turn Canterbury Park horse track into a racino.[55] The plan was poorly received by Northern Tribes who would operate part of the racino, citing reluctance to compete with other tribes.[56] Tribes with casinos opposed the expanded gambling and some legislators objected on moral grounds that the state shouldn't exploit problem gamblers. Politicians in heavy tribal areas feared losing campaign-finance sources if they supported the plan.[57][58] Delays by the Legislature ended with the bill being pulled from committee.[59] Tribes had spent millions lobbying legislatures in 2004.[60]
Pawlenty worked throughout 2006 to fund a Minnesota Twins baseball stadium in Minneapolis.[61] The resulting Minnesota Twins-Hennepin County ballpark bill called for an increased county sales tax which passed the state legislature and was symbolically signed in at the Hubert H. Humphrey Metrodome.[62][63] The majority of Hennepin County commissioners did not feel a referendum was necessary to approve the sales tax because of the delay it would cause. Pawlenty and the Legislature agreed, citing 10 years already of the project's debate, and exempted the county from state law requiring one in the bill.[64][65]
In June 2006, Pawlenty signed a $999.9-million public works bill that included funding for additional work on the Northstar Commuter rail line (a change in position from reservations about the idea he initially expressed), an expanded Faribault prison, a bioscience building at the University of Minnesota, and science facilities at Minnesota State University in Mankato. The bill also funded a $26-million expansion of the University of Minnesota's Carlson School of Management.[66]
In 2011, Pawlenty shut down an Islamic finance program, that was part of a larger program to increase home ownership in Minnesota, and his spokesperson said that the program accommodated the Muslim ban on interest.[67] Adam Sorensen from TIME questioned whether this was a case of double standards, pointing out New York's kosher food regulations, Blue Laws that prohibit alcohol sales on Sundays, and Pawlenty's own creation of "The Governor's Council On Faith-Based And Community Initiatives".[68]
Education
In the budget process, Pawlenty made an effort to preserve education funding while cutting other government spending. In 2009, he bolstered education funding using federal stimulus grants. Despite this, education funding fell from $9,700 to $8,400 per student (adjusted for inflation) during his tenure.[69] Pawlenty was an advocate for charter schools and was praised by the National Alliance for Public Charter Schools for his education policies. In 2010, the organization rated Minnesota #1 in the country for charter school promotion.[70]
Pawlenty oversaw the repeal of the Profile of Learning Kindergarten through 12th grade graduation requirements and sought to reinstate them during his governorship.[71] Renamed the Minnesota Academic Standards, they were guided by Department of Education commissioner Cheri Pierson Yecke. The bill's first draft raised several concerns by the education review boards including the amount of content, age-appropriateness, and a European-centric view of the social sciences portion.[72] Yecke revised and expanded material based on the response.[73] Even as both Legislative houses passed the Academic Standards bill, her confirmation as commissioner was rejected by the DFL majority Minnesota Senate.[74] She was seen as an outsider coming from Virginia and became unpopular for having pushed the academic reforms during a tight budget session as well as her critical look of Minnesota schools.[75] In her confirmation hearing, DFLers also noted concern over her conservative viewpoints.[75]
In June 2006, Pawlenty proposed the ACHIEVE program for the top 25% of high school graduates.[76] The program would pay for tuition for the first 2 years (4 years for selected fields such as science, technology, engineering and math) and would cost the state an estimated $112 million per 2-year cycle. However the program was not included in the 2007 higher education bill.[77]
Pawlenty used an accounting change called a tax shift to balance the state deficit without raising taxes. School districts statewide may unexpectedly lose $58 million in interest and reserve revenue.[78]
In 2010, Pawlenty vetoed a bill (HF 3164), which the legislature had passed 110 to 20, calling for Minnesota State Colleges & Universities (MnSCU) to revamp its credit transferring system within five years to fix "minimal loss of credits for transferring students" who had been losing between 10 and 30 percent of their credits.[79] Pawlenty found it "unnecessary" because MnSCU was fixing its system already "through internal actions and policy changes".[79]
Transportation




U.S. Representative Keith Ellison speaking at the site of the I-35W Mississippi River Bridge collapse in Minneapolis. He is flanked by Governor Pawlenty on the picture's left. To right: Mayor R. T. Rybak, Secretary of Transportation Mary Peters behind Ellison, Betty McCollum, and Senator Norm Coleman


During Pawlenty's first term, urban traffic congestion was a significant concern of voters. He appointed his lieutenant governor, Carol Molnau, as transportation commissioner, for which she was approved by the legislature in May 2004.[80] Molnau attempted to reform the transportation department, (Mn/DOT), using concepts such as "design-build". Legislators criticized Molnau's performance as transportation commissioner, citing ineffective leadership and management, and removed her from that role in February 2008, a decision Pawlenty said was motivated by partisanship.[80][81]
Pawlenty favored raising fees and imposing toll lanes on roads as the primary means of discouraging excessive traffic. During his term, the carpool lanes of Interstate 394 leading into downtown Minneapolis were converted into high-occupancy toll lanes. Pawlenty used or threatened vetoes in 2005, 2007 and 2008 on legislation funding proposed highway expansion, infrastructure repairs, road maintenance, and mass transit.[82] The 2008 veto was in spite of Pawlenty's announcement that he would consider reversing his opposition to a state gas-tax increase for funding road and bridge repairs, in the wake of the collapse of the I-35W Mississippi River bridge.[83]
Pawlenty had opposed the Northstar Commuter Rail as a legislator, but changed his position in 2004, announcing a funding plan to jump-start the project, when the Bush administration determined the rail line was deemed cost-effective and time-saving for commuters.[84]
In April 2008 during the budget bonding bill signing, Pawlenty used his line-item veto on $70 million pledged toward the building of the Central Corridor light-rail project, intended to connect Minneapolis and Saint Paul. In vetoing the expenditure, Pawlenty did not consult Peter Bell, head of the Metro Council and project leader.[85] Pawlenty stated that he vetoed the bill in order to send a message to the Legislature, which had exceeded his initial budget request, that they needed to "stay focused, be fiscally disciplined, set priorities and solve this budget crisis in a fiscally disciplined way."[86] Pawlenty however was supportive of the project and had requested the money in the bonding bill he submitted to the Minnesota State Legislature.[86] The veto disappointed some of Minnesota's congressional representatives in Washington, including Minnesota's Republican Senator Norm Coleman, who pledged to "raise my voice as strong as I can, as loud as I can. The federal commitment is there."[87] Though Pawlenty's veto might have delayed the ability of the state to receive federal matching funds for the project, Bell said the project was not derailed.[85] The Central Corridor funding issue was resolved on May 19, 2008, with the state pledging its original amount towards the project after legislators compromised with Pawlenty's budget requests.[88]
There were Republican state legislators who supported other cuts of the bonding bill, including Doug Magnus, the ranking Republican on the House Transportation Finance Division, who praised Pawlenty's "fiscal responsibility."[89] Critics, including Chris Coleman, Mayor of Saint Paul, called Pawlenty's veto "political gamesmanship," seeing the move as retribution for the Legislature's successful override of Pawlenty's veto of a transportation bonding bill.[86] They noted cuts overwhelmingly targeted Democratic districts, and Democratic stronghold Saint Paul most heavily.[90][91]
Crime
Crime in Minnesota was a high-profile political issue during Pawlenty's governorship. When crime rates in Minneapolis spiked 16 percent from 2004 to 2005, city officials blamed Pawlenty for large cuts to state aid, which they said restricted public safety resources. Pawlenty in turn criticized the capital city for poorly allocating its funding.[92]
Pawlenty made two large efforts to expand penalties for sexual offenders. In response to his first proposal in 2005, the state legislature passed a large package of sentencing reforms. One new instrument was the possibility of a life sentence without parole for serious offenders, although Pawlenty expressed disapproval at the courts' reluctance to use this option: only seven individuals received such a sentence in the first two years of implementation.[93] Pawlenty made a push for even harsher sentences in 2010, which increased the presumptive sentence for first-degree sex offenses from 12 years to 25 years and increased it further for repeat offenders. At the same time he advocated for a $90-million expansion of the state's civil commitment program for sexual offenders, maintaining that the increased criminal sentences would keep the commitment program's cost under control.[93] According to a single report in the Star Tribune, "A report on Minnesota's sex-offender program delivered to legislators in the final days of the Pawlenty administration was heavily edited by a top political appointee to reflect the former governor's skepticism about the effectiveness of treatment and to delete arguments for expanded community resources for offenders."[94]
Early in 2006, after issuing a study that estimated the cost of illegal immigration to the state as approximately $188 million, Pawlenty announced a program for changing the way the state dealt with persons who were in the United States illegally. Pawlenty said that the economic benefits of illegal immigration did not justify the illegal behavior.[95] Pawlenty's extensive proposal included the designation of 10 state law enforcement officials as the Minnesota Illegal Immigration Enforcement Team, "trained to question, detain and arrest suspected illegal immigrants" with a focus on "such crimes as human trafficking, identity theft, methamphetamine distribution and terrorism." He rounded out his proposal with tougher penalties for false identification, and instituting a fine of up to $5,000 for employers of illegal immigrants. His proposal was challenged by DFL senators who preferred increased legal immigration to punitive action.[96]
Energy policy and climate change




A United States Postal Service vehicle advertising its use of E85 fuel during the Saint Paul Winter Carnival parade in January 2007.


Minnesota has mandated a 10% mixture of gasoline and ethanol (gasohol) since 1997. Pawlenty signed into law in May 2005 a bill that will raise the minimum mandated mixture to 20% in 2013. Pawlenty has also lobbied the Governors' Ethanol Coalition to mandate higher ethanol use nationwide.[97]
Conservative Republican governors were not supportive of Pawlenty's presentation on clean energy to the governor's association, which he gave in cooperation with Ed Rendell, who was the governor of Pennsylvania and the National Governors Association's Democratic vice-chairman. With Kathleen Sebelius of Kansas, Pawlenty was co-chairman of the association's energy committee. The effort received "adamant opposition" from governors of petroleum (oil) producing states.[98]
In 2007, Governor Pawlenty signed the Next Generation Energy Act of 2007 into law and, along with six other Midwestern governors, the Midwestern Greenhouse Gas Accord. These directed state agencies to develop a plan to reduce greenhouse gases, and "develop a market-based and multi-sector cap-and-trade mechanism".[99] However, by 2009 Pawlenty had reversed his position and called cap-and-trade "overly bureaucratic" and a potential "disaster".[99] By 2011, Pawlenty's position had changed sufficiently to state "the weight of the evidence is that most of it, maybe all of it, is because of natural causes."[100]
Health
In 2004, Minnesota's Star Tribune newspaper opined that the credibility of Pawlenty's commissioner of health, Dianne Mandernach, suffered when a website posting by the department suggested that abortion might have a role in breast cancer. She also angered many when it was learned she had delayed releasing government research on cancer in miners. In 2007, Mandernach resigned.[101]
In 2005, Pawlenty asked a U.S. Senate subcommittee to allow his MinnesotaCare health plan to expand and continue allowing state residents and employees to import cheaper Canadian prescription drugs.[102]
In 2007, Pawlenty signed into law the 2007 Omnibus Health and Human Services Appropriations Bill, which provided funding for the Health Care Transformation Task Force, a panel of health care experts charged with exploring ways to reduce health care spending, improve quality, and ensure that Minnesota develops a universal health care plan by 2011.[103]
Later in his tenure he used health care funding cuts as a mechanism to balance the state budget. After years of assuring doctors that the state "sick tax" would be used only to fund health welfare programs, in 2009 Pawlenty recommended a 3% cut in physician reimbursements from the state and asked that the sick tax be put instead into the state's general budget.[104] Pawlenty used a line-item veto to remove $381 million from health and human services funding, a removal which could lead to 35,000 Minnesotans' losing their General Assistance Medical Care (GAMC) health insurance in 2011.[105] Hennepin County Medical Center—the largest provider of health care to Minnesota's poor and uninsured—closed two clinics, reduced its staff and reduced access to non-emergency services.[106] State Senator Linda Berglin wrote a bill that would extend GAMC funding.[107]
In 2010, he refused federal health care funds including more than $1 billion to expand the number of Minnesotans covered by Medicaid, $68 million for a high-risk insurance pool, $1 million to help set up an insurance exchange where consumers could shop for health coverage, and $850,000 for teenage pregnancy prevention. Pawlenty accepted a $500,000 abstinence-only sex-education grant that would require $350,000 in matching state money. Pawlenty said, "It doesn't say we have to apply for all of them."[108]
Foreign relations




Tim Pawlenty meeting Minnesota National Guard troops in Kosovo (April 12, 2008)


Pawlenty's first term coincided with the deployment of National Guardsmen from numerous states, connected with the War on Terror and the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan. During his two terms Pawlenty made trips to Iraq, Afghanistan, Bosnia, Kosovo, and Kuwait visiting Minnesota troops.[109]
Pawlenty was visited in 2004 by Mexican President Vicente Fox in talks to strengthen trade. Fox announced that his country would open a consulate in Minnesota the next year, removing the need for Mexican residents in the state to travel out of state for identification papers and other materials.[110] In mid-2006, in response to illegal immigration, Pawlenty sent Minnesota National Guardsmen to the U.S.–Mexico border at the request of the U.S. Department of Defense and the U.S. Department of Homeland Security.[111]
Pawlenty took a delegation of nearly 200 Minnesotan business, government, academic and civic leaders on a weeklong trip to China in mid-November 2005. The stated objectives were to provide a forum for companies to acquire market information, assess market potential, evaluate market entry strategies and identify potential business partners, as well as to promote Chinese investment in Minnesota.[112] Pawlenty also led Minnesota trade delegations to Canada in 2003,[113] Poland and the Czech Republic in 2004,[114] India in 2007,[113] and Israel in 2008.[109]
Other activities
Throughout his eight-year tenure, Pawlenty hosted a weekly one-hour radio show on WCCO-AM, a tradition he inherited from his predecessor as governor, Jesse Ventura.[115] Pawlenty was the chairman of the National Governors Association for the 2007–2008 term.[116] He also served as Chair of the Midwestern Governors Association in 2006.[117]
Beginning in 2005, Pawlenty was rumored in the press as a potential candidate for president of the United States.[118][119][120] When formally announcing his candidacy for a second term as Governor of Minnesota on May 31, 2006, Pawlenty said, "As to my future, if I run for governor and win, I will serve out my term for four years as governor."[121][122][123] On January 15, 2007, after being reelected, Pawlenty said, "I am committed to serving out my term as governor. That's what I am going to do."[124]
In 2007, it was announced that Pawlenty would be serving in a lead role for McCain as a national co-chair of his presidential exploratory committee[125] which led to Pawlenty's becoming co-chairman of McCain's campaign (along with Phil Gramm and Tom Loeffler).[126] In January 2008, a reporter for the Minneapolis Star Tribune suggested Pawlenty's renewed focus on his proposed immigration reform plans might be politically motivated as counterbalance to McCain's less favorable guest worker program.[127]
For many weeks, Pawlenty was widely considered to be a leading candidate for the vice-presidential nomination on the Republican ticket with John McCain in the 2008 presidential election.[128][129] In a surprise, McCain chose Alaska Governor Sarah Palin.[130]
In 2008, Pawlenty expressed support for the Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP). But in 2010 Pawlenty claimed that he had made those statements solely as a surrogate for presidential nominee McCain and never actually supported the idea himself.[131] On May 23, 2011, Pawlenty formally announced he'd run for the Republican presidential nomination, saying, “politicians are often afraid that if they're too honest, they might lose an election. I'm afraid that in 2012, if we're not honest enough, we may lose our country.”
2012 presidential campaign
Main article: Tim Pawlenty presidential campaign, 2012
Early steps
In February 2005, ABC News identified him as a potential candidate for president.[132] Pawlenty decided not to seek a third term as governor, and so was not a candidate in the November 2010 gubernatorial election.[133] In July 2009, Public Policy Polling conducted a poll that showed that President Obama was favored to win against Pawlenty in his home state of Minnesota by more than 10 points.[134] In October 2009, a CNN article suggested that Pawlenty was contemplating a 2012 White House bid.[135] Among those advising him in preparation for a potential presidential run was lobbyist and former Congressman Vin Weber.[136]
In late 2009, Pawlenty began taking steps that many saw as leading to a 2012 presidential bid.[137] He visited Iowa in November 2009 and April 2010, making political speeches.[138] In January 2011, the New York Times reported that "Few Americans, in fact, even know his name."[139] In January 2011, Pawlenty told the College Republicans group at The George Washington University "If I decide to run it would be for president, not vice president."[140][141]
Book tour and political positions




Pawlenty at a book signing in February 2011 in Phoenix, Arizona.


Pawlenty went on tour for his book Courage to Stand, and as of January 18, his book had reached #1,979 on Amazon.com's list of bestsellers.[142] Pawlenty calls himself a social conservative.[143] In his extended interview with Jon Stewart on The Daily Show, he said he thinks United States Social Security and Medicare need to be cut to balance the federal budget.[144] Pawlenty believes that state governments should outlaw abortion, except for cases of rape, incest, and to save a woman's life. He thinks the United States Supreme Court decided Roe v. Wade wrongly, abortion being a state, not a federal, matter. He opposes same-sex marriage and civil unions, and said on talk radio "... I have been a public supporter of maintaining Don't ask, don't tell and I would support reinstating it as well".[143]
In December 2010, Pawlenty was one of three U.S. governors who publicly declared solidarity with the Christian-right group Family Research Council.[145]
Pawlenty's tour was in Minneapolis, San Francisco and Dallas, and it ended January in Iowa where the Iowa Caucuses were scheduled for February 6, 2012. "That will come up fast," he said, "if I do run." In Minneapolis, speaking to Pat Kessler of WCCO-TV who asked about his feelings regarding a potential run for president by Representative Michele Bachmann, "I have a lot of respect for Michele Bachmann … Whether she runs or not, it's gonna be a big field. There's gonna be five, six, seven, eight people running … Whoever wants to run can run. The more, the merrier."[142]
In a December 2010 column in The Wall Street Journal, Pawlenty argued in favor of the historical benefits of "private sector" labor unions and strongly against "public sector" labor unions, whose collective bargaining rights he would like to see curbed: "The rise of the labor movement in the early 20th century was a triumph for America's working class. In an era of deep economic anxiety, unions stood up for hard-working but vulnerable families, protecting them from physical and economic exploitation." He also criticized modern unions: "The moral case for unions—protecting working families from exploitation—does not apply to public employment... Unionized public employees are making more money, receiving more generous benefits, and enjoying greater job security than the working families forced to pay for it with ever-higher taxes, deficits and debt."[146]
Candidacy
On March 21, 2011, Pawlenty announced, via Facebook, that he had formed an exploratory committee in preparation for a potential run for the 2012 Republican presidential nomination.[147][148]
On April 12, 2011, Pawlenty said clearly on CNN's Piers Morgan Tonight that he was "running for president" and not for vice president, adding that a formal announcement would be given in several weeks.[149] On Twitter, his spokesman said CNN took his comments out of context.[150]
On May 23, 2011, Pawlenty launched his candidacy for president in a speech in Iowa stating: "I'm going to try something a little unusual in politics. I'm just going to tell the truth."[151][152] A YouTube video[153] appeared a day before.[154] The Wall Street Journal wrote of his candidacy, and the luck he experienced in the GOP's field, that Pawlenty has a "golden chance to become the chief rival to... Mitt Romney".[155]
Pawlenty finished third in the Ames Straw Poll on August 13, 2011,[156] behind the winner Michele Bachmann and the runner-up Ron Paul. Before the Ames debate, he took a more aggressive stance against Romney, including the coining the term "Obamneycare".[157] When pressed by John King during CNN's June 13, 2011 debate to address why he used the word, he backed off.[158] However, he denied that he backed off.[159] The following day he announced his decision to withdraw from the presidential race.[160] On September 12, 2011, Pawlenty announced his endorsement of former Governor Mitt Romney of Massachusetts, as well as his position as national co-chair for Romney's campaign.[161] Romney retired over $400,000 of Pawlenty's campaign debt.[162]
Financial Services Roundtable
On September 20, 2012, Pawlenty's advisor Brian McClung announced to Associated Press that Pawlenty would resign as the co-chairman of Mitt Romney's electoral campaign. He was to head the Financial Services Roundtable (FSR), a financial service industry lobby group in Washington, D.C. He would not be running in the 2014 gubernatorial election in Minnesota nor in the state's 2014 senatorial election.[163] He assumed the positions of President & CEO. He replaced Steve Bartlett, a former U.S. Representative from Texas who had held the positions since 1999.[164]
In November 2012, Pawlenty said that "Republicans and Democrats will have to reconcile their differences on spending and taxes because the 'walls of reality are closing in on them'" relative to the federal government's looming "fiscal cliff". Presenting himself as not from Wall Street or from Washington and, having previously criticized “entrenched financial interests”, he said he could "bring a fresh and new voice to those debates”. He also "refuted assertions that implementation of the Dodd-Frank Act, legislation enacted roughly 27 months [earlier] in response to the financial crisis, ha[d] been delayed because of lobbying".[165]
Personal life




Tim Pawlenty with his wife, Mary


Pawlenty and his wife Mary have two daughters, Anna and Mara. Mary was appointed as a judge of the Dakota County District Court in Hastings, Minnesota, in 1994. After he was elected governor in 2002, the family remained at their Eagan home instead of moving into the Governor's residence because of his wife's requirement to live in her judicial district.[166] In 2007, she left her judicial position to become General Counsel of the National Arbitration Forum, a dispute-resolution company based in Minneapolis.[167] She stayed on only briefly before departing for another dispute-resolution company, the Gilbert Mediation Center.[168]
Pawlenty was raised a Roman Catholic. His conversion to an Evangelical Protestant faith has been attributed to his wife Mary, who is a member of Wooddale Church in Eden Prairie, Minnesota,[169] a member congregation of the Minnesota Baptist Conference. In a January 2011 interview, Mr. Pawlenty stated, "I love and respect and admire the Catholic Church. I still attend Mass once in a while there. The church I now attend is an interdenominational church which has got many former Catholics in it, and so we share the Christian faith and the Bible. I had to reconcile my faith life with my wife so we could have a consistent, integrated family faith life."[170]
Pawlenty frequently uses (and is referred to by) the mononym "TPaw" or "T-Paw".[171][172][173]
Public image
Political views
Pawlenty is generally considered a conservative on the American political spectrum. With regard to his economic record, he has drawn mixed reviews from fiscally conservative interest groups.[174] The lobbying group Taxpayers League of Minnesota gave Pawlenty an average approval score of 80% during his years as a state legislator, while the Cato Institute think-tank gave him scores ranging from C to A across his eight years as governor.[70] In February 2008, Washington Post columnist Robert Novak wrote that Pawlenty was the most conservative Minnesota governor since Governor Theodore Christianson in the 1920s.[98] A 2011 white paper by the Club for Growth, analyzing Pawlenty as a presidential candidate, found his political stance difficult to identify. The group praised him for reduced growth in spending and taxation, but found that he "has some simply inexcusable tax hikes in his record" and questioned his support of proposals such as "mandatory vegetable oil in gasoline, cap and trade, and a statewide smoking ban."[70] Chris Edwards, a director at Cato, speculated that Pawlenty's rightward tack in his second term was related to his impending presidential run.[174]
Approval ratings
In April 2009, 46% of Minnesotans approved of Pawlenty, while 40% disapproved.[175] Among registered Republicans nationwide in July 2009, 38% had a favorable view of him while 33% didn't according to a Rasmussen Reports survey.[176] In March 2010 42% of Minnesotans approved of Pawlenty, while 52% disapproved.[177]
In October 2010 a Rasmussen report showed that Pawlenty had a 49% approval rating among Minnesotans with 49% disapproving.[178] A March 2011 survey by Gallup stated that Pawlenty began his Presidential run with only 41% name recognition in the GOP.[179] Also in March 2011, the Public Policy Polling (PPP) agency found that nationwide voters had a net negative view of Pawlenty, with 15% viewing him favorably verses 33% unfavorably.[180] In a 2011 PPP poll of registered Minnesota voters conducted from May 27–30, 42% of Minnesotans had a favorable opinion of Pawlenty, while 52% had an unfavorable opinion of him. In the presidential race, President Obama lead Pawlenty by 51% to 43%, suggesting Pawlenty could lose his home state to President Obama were he the 2012 GOP nominee.[181]
Electoral history

Minnesota District 38B state representative elections, 1992–2000

Year
Republican
DFL
Constitution
Total
Source


 
 
 


Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %


1992
Tim Pawlenty
9,610
49.1%
Linda Rother
8,773
44.8%
James Russell McMahon
253
1.3%
19,583
[18]


1994
Tim Pawlenty
12,172
81.0%
None
None
15,022
[182]


1996
Tim Pawlenty
14,747
74.4%
None
None
19,822
[183]


1998
Tim Pawlenty
9,118
48.5%
Leo Brisbois
7,819
41.6%
None
18,809
[184]


2000
Tim Pawlenty
13,779
59.6%
Gary Moore
7,239
31.3%
None
23,100
[185]



Minnesota gubernatorial elections, 2002–2006

Year
Republican
DFL
Independence
Green
Total
Source


 
 
 
 


Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %


2002
Tim Pawlenty
999,473
43.8%
Roger Moe
821,268
36.0%
Tim Penny
364,534
16.0%
Ken Pentel
50,589
2.2%
2,282,860
[26]


2006
Tim Pawlenty
1,028,568
46.4%
Mike Hatch
1,007,460
45.4%
Peter Hutchinson
141,735
6.4%
Ken Pentel
10,800
0.5%
2,217,818
[186]


References


^ Baenen, Jeff. "Minnesota Pronunciation Guide". Associated Press in Minnesota. Retrieved July 4, 2011. 
^ Streitfeld, Rachel (August 12, 2012). "Ryan's clandestine journey to Romney's ticket went from 'surreal to real'". CNN. Retrieved 2012-08-15. 
^ Knox, Olivier (September 20, 2012). "Pawlenty quits as Romney campaign co-chair". Yahoo! News. 
^ a b Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Tim Pawlenty". wargs.com. 
^ a b c Davey, Monica (August 7, 2008). "Pawlenty Looks to National Stage". The New York Times. Retrieved June 1, 2011. 
^ a b c d "Campaign 2002: Governor Tim Pawlenty". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Jim Walsh (January 28, 2004). "Grant Hart recalls his old classmate, Tim Pawlenty". City Pages. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Sharpiro, Walter. "The Tragedy of Tim Pawlenty: He did everything right. And that was the problem". The New Republic. Retrieved July 26, 2011. 
^ Political Science Dept of College of Liberal Arts (July 5, 2008). "PoliSci Alumni". University of Minnesota. 
^ "Empowered with a New Degree, Class of '08 Sets Forth – 120th Commencement Ceremony". University of Minnesota Law School. February 11, 2008. 
^ Melo, Frederick (January 5, 2007). "Mary Pawlenty leaves bench—First Lady will be top counsel for mediation firm". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ "Pawlenty Biography". 2012 Republican Candidates: Comparing the 2012 Republican Candidates. Retrieved July 26, 2011. 
^ "Main page". Wizmo. 
^ a b Tom Squitieri (November 7, 2002). "His plans changed, but message didn't". USA TODAY. 
^ "What's next for Tim Pawlenty?". MinnPost. September 8, 2008. Retrieved September 10, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (July 16, 2003). "DFLer slams "Grunseth groupies"". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ State Senator Sandra L. Pappas (July 21, 2003). "Legislators Call for Full and Complete Disclosure from Governor Pawlenty" (Press release). MN State Legislature press release (via Internet Archive). Archived from the original on September 19, 2004. 
^ a b Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1992. p. 146. 
^ Sherman, Amy (October 16, 1998). "38B candidates' ideas differ on surplus, education; incumbent faces unusual challenge". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ "Legislators Past and Present". Minnesota Legislative Reference Library. Retrieved August 23, 2007. 
^ Laura McCallum (June 12, 2002). "Campaign 2002 profile: Brian Sullivan". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Smith, Dane (April 19, 2001). "Cheney advises Pawlenty not to run for Senate; Majority leader bows to request from White House". Star Tribune. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (September 13, 2002). "Tim Pawlenty". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ a b c Grant, Ashley; Associated Press (November 6, 2002). "Pawlenty elected Minnesota governor—Republican breaks out of three-way race". Grand Forks Herald. p. A-05. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ Coleman, Toni et al. (January 5, 2003). "Your guide to the 2003 legislature: issues to watch". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A8. CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
"Major Minnesota issues". Grand Forks Herald. Associated Press. January 5, 2003. p. A-07. 
^ a b Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2002. pp. 322–325. 
^ Hohmann, James. "Once a goalie, Tim Pawlenty plays offense". Politico. Capitol News. Retrieved April 20, 2011. 
^ Laura McCallum (June 2, 2006). "Pawlenty accepts Republican endorsement for re-election". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Laura McCallum (November 8, 2006). "Hatch concedes; Pawlenty barely wins re-election". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Britt Robson (January 19, 2005). "Minnesota Eats Itself Another Pawlenty budget, another round of bloodletting". City Pages. Retrieved August 31, 2008. 
^ "Historical expenditures: General fund and all funds" (PDF). Minnesota Management and Budget Department. March 2011. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty said he brought Minnesota state spending growth down 'to about 1.7 percent per year.'". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. April 1, 2011. 
^ a b "PoliGraph: Pawlenty spending claim lacks context". MPR News. Minnesota Public Radio. January 27, 2011. 
^ Sharpiro, Walter. "The Tragedy of TIm Pawlenty: He Did Everything Right. And That's The Problem". The New Republic. Retrieved July 27, 2011. 
^ a b Salisbury, Bill (June 1, 2003). "Pawlenty wins, but risks attached – his no-new-taxes pledge may become a liability later". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ a b Scheck, Tom (September 24, 2009). "Pawlenty downplaying budget deficit predictions". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 24, 2009. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty said in 2009, 'we cut state spending in real terms for the first time in 150 years'". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. April 12, 2011. 
^ AEI said "billion", an error see original: Carlson, Arne (May 23, 2011). "The Presidency: A Bit Short Is Pawlenty". Blogspot. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Ornstein, Norman J. (May 25, 2011). "GOP Presidential Candidates Affect Agenda". American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy Research. Retrieved May 25, 2011. 
^ Wyler, Grace (May 23, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty Launches Campaign As The GOP Default Candidate". Business Insider. Retrieved May 25, 2011. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (May 23, 2011). "George's Bottom Line". ABC News. Retrieved June 9, 2011. 
^ Black, Eric (May 5, 2010). "Supreme Court overrules Pawlenty on unallotments". MinnPost. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Scheck, Tom (October 29, 2009). "Lawsuit challenges Pawlenty's budget cuts". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved October 30, 2009. 
^ Grow, Doug (December 31, 2009). "Unallotment ruling may have turned Minnesota's recent political gridlock into new political chaos". MinnPost. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ David Lillehaug and Mike McIntee (December 30, 2009). Atty David Lillehaug: Court ruling huge political setback for Gov. Pawlenty. The UpTake via MinnPost. Event occurs at 1:22. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ McIntee, Mike (December 31, 2009). Pawlenty To Appeal Unallotment Ruling. The UpTake via Twin Cities Daily Planet. Event occurs at 1:30. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ Shaw, Charley (February 9, 2010). "Pawlenty in appellate brief says he legally unalloted the budget". Politics in Minnesota. Retrieved February 9, 2010. 
^ Helgeson, Baird (February 9, 2010). "Pawlenty defends budget cuts". Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Scheck, Tom (March 15, 2010). "State's budget in hands of Supreme Court". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved March 15, 2010. 
^ Magnuson, Eric J. (May 5, 2010). "State of Minnesota in Supreme Court: A10-64" (PDF). Minnesota Judicial Branch. Archived from the original (PDF) on May 5, 2010. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Kimball, Joe (May 5, 2010). "Pawlenty responds to ruling on unallotment, urges Legislature to back his cuts". MinnPost. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (May 12, 2010). "Budget clock is ticking at the Capitol—After veto, talks deadlock and DFL calls on Pawlenty to take the lead". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Sturdevant, Lori (May 23, 2010). "Now on the trail, loaded with legislative baggage—Kelliher bears the weight of her position, while Emmer's burdens are largely of his own making". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Michael Khoo (February 5, 2004). "Pawlenty's speech puts focus on gambling". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ T.W. Budig (April 3, 2003). "Canterbury racino legislation advances in House; Pawlenty cool to more gambling". ECM Capitol Roundup. Archived from the original on May 10, 2003. 
^ Becky Glander (February 5, 2005). "Some angered at racino proposal". University Chronicle. Archived from the original on March 1, 2009. 
^ Andrew Tellijohn (March 7, 2003). "Canterbury chasing jackpot with 'racino'". Minneapolis / St. Paul Business Journal. 
^ "Indian Country is in the midst of political awakening". October 11, 2004. Retrieved December 3, 2007. 
^ Michael Khoo (May 17, 2005). "Casino issue is dying, if not dead, at Capitol". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Native American casinos". Indianz. May 23, 2005. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ "Pawlenty's talks on Twins stadium yield no action". Associated Press/MPR. January 11, 2006. 
^ Twins ballpark: What's next?. May 26, 2006. 
^ "Votetracker Minnesota Twins stadium". Minnesota Public Radio. 2006. 
^ Tom Scheck; Brandt Williams (May 22, 2006). "Twins' stadium opponents were tired of the fight; supporters weren't". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Brandt Williams (April 25, 2005). "Pohlad: Contribution to Twins ballpark 'fair, substantial'". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Legislature passes $1 billion public works bill". St. Paul Pioneer Press. June 2006. Archived from the original on March 12, 2007. Retrieved June 26, 2006. 
^ Montopoli, Brian (March 25, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty: I shut down Sharia loan program". CBS News. 
^ "Is There a Double Standard in Tim Pawlenty's Disavowal of Sharia-Compliant Mortgages?". TIME. March 25, 2011. 
^ "Mark Dayton says Gov. Tim Pawlenty cut education spending". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. July 29, 2010. 
^ a b c "2012 Presidential White Paper #2: Former Minnesota Governor Tim Pawlenty" (PDF). Club for Growth. May 24, 2011. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (December 22, 2010). "'Binge buster'—In two terms as governor, Tim Pawlenty put the brakes on state spending and set Minnesota on a path to fiscal austerity. But critics say he simply kicked budget problems down the road.". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Laura McCallum (October 31, 2003). "Social studies standards face more heat". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (December 19, 2003). "Yecke unveils second try at social studies, science standards". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Sara Evans and Lisa Norling (November 2004). "What Happened in Minnesota?". Organization of American Historians newsletter. Archived from the original on August 3, 2008. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ a b Pugmire, Tim (May 16, 2004). "Yecke blasts Minnesota's political climate for vote to oust her". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ Tim Pugmire (June 27, 2006). "Good grades would mean free college under Pawlenty plan". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Art Hughes (May 7, 2007). "Dream Act dies under threat of Pawlenty veto". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Fitzgerald, John (October 1, 2009). "Schools to Pay Millions to Cover Governor's IOU". Minnesota 2020. Retrieved July 2, 2011. 
^ a b Schumacher, Lawrence (May 3, 2010). "Pawlenty nixes college student credit transfer fix". Twin Cities Daily Planet. Retrieved May 3, 2010. 
^ a b Anderson, G. R. Jr. (February 28, 2008). "One head finally rolls". MinnPost.com. MinnPost. Retrieved February 29, 2008. 
^ Saulny, Susan (February 29, 2008). "Minnesota Transportation Chief Is Out". The New York Times. The New York Times Company. Retrieved February 29, 2008. 
^ "State House approves gas tax hike". KSTP. 2007. Retrieved August 3, 2007. 
^ Jackson, Henry C.; Mark Scolforo (August 4, 2007). "8 Reported Missing in Bridge Collapse". Washington Post. 
^ Laura McCallum (August 3, 2004). "Pawlenty finds money to jumpstart North Star rail line". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ a b Sturdevant, Lori (April 12, 2008). "Working toward the train in vain". Minneapolis Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. [permanent dead link]
^ a b c Yuen, Laura; Tom Scheck (April 7, 2008). "Pawlenty delivers a setback to the Central Corridor project". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ "Coleman: Disappointed By Gov. Vetoing LRT Money". Associated Press. April 10, 2008. Archived from the original on March 1, 2009. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Tom Weber (May 19, 2008). "Central Corridor planning moves forward". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Kaszuba, Mike (April 18, 2008). "Met Council head is in a political bind". www.startribune.com. Archived from the original on April 2, 2015. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Salisbury, Bill. "Vetoes not political? (The Political Animal)". blogs.twincities.com. Archived from the original on April 14, 2008. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Scheck, Tom (April 7, 2008). "MPR: St. Paul officials: What does Pawlenty have against us?". minnesota.publicradio.org. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Stassen-Berger, Rachel E. (June 26, 2006). "When crime jumps, politicos trade blame: experts say one elected official can't do much to raise—or lower—crime rates". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ a b Hoppin, Jason (February 10, 2010). "Pawlenty: Time to get tougher on sex crimes – Some offenders would get 25 years; others, even more". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ Ludeman, Cal (February 7, 2011). "Details on sex offender program deleted". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on April 2, 2015. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Jim Lehrer (March 22, 2006). "MINNESOTA'S IMMIGRATION DEBATE". Twin Cities Public Broadcasting. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (January 4, 2006). "Illegal immigration a 'real issue': Pawlenty defends crackdown, but not all agree with tactics". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ McCallum, Laura (September 26, 2005). "Pawlenty pumps ethanol". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 6, 2007. 
^ a b Novak, Robert (February 28, 2008). "How Not to Run for Vice President". The Washington Post. The Washington Post Company. Retrieved February 28, 2008. 
^ a b "Pawlenty’s Political Climate Change". Fact-Check.org. 
^ herb, jeremy (August 4, 2011). "Remarks highlight Pawlenty's climate shift". minneapolis star tribune. Retrieved August 10, 2012. 
^ Powell, Joy; Lopez, Patricia (August 22, 2007). "State health commissioner resigns". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on March 2, 2009. Retrieved January 12, 2008. 
^ Tom Scheck (February 16, 2005). "Measuring the success of Canadian drug imports". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 12, 2008. 
^ "The Kaiser Commission on Medicaid and the Uninsured" (PDF). The Henry J. Kaiser Family Foundation. Archived from the original (PDF) on February 4, 2011. Retrieved March 16, 2011. 
^ "Pawlenty uses veto power to cut health care". Mnmed.org. Retrieved October 31, 2010. [permanent dead link]
^ Scheck, Tom (May 15, 2009). "Pawlenty, lawmakers remain at odds over budget issues". Minnesota Public Radio News. Retrieved June 2, 2009. 
^ Williams, Chris (Associated Press) (November 18, 2009). "HCMC approves big cuts in 2010 budget". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved November 19, 2009. 
^ McIntee, Mike (February 9, 2010). "Vets To Feel Governor Pawlenty's GAMC Cuts". The Uptake. Archived from the original on August 6, 2014. Retrieved February 10, 2010. 
^ Marcotty, Josephine & Stassen-Berger, Rachel E. (September 1, 2010). "Pawlenty restricts health money". Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ a b Salisbury, Bill (October 18, 2008). "Governor will lead trade group to Israel". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Ragsdale, Jim; Welbes, John (June 19, 2004). "Fox promises consulate—Mexico president expresses wish to aid countrymen in Minnesota". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ 200 National Guard members to patrol Mexican border | Minnesota Public Radio News
^ Bjorhus, Jennifer (November 14, 2005). "Pawlenty courts Chinese investors – TRADE: Economic ties take a new direction as the Chinese begin looking for places to invest". Duluth News-Tribune. 
^ a b Smith, Dane (January 30, 2007). "Pawlenty plans trade mission to India". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on June 8, 2008. Retrieved January 30, 2007. 
^ Lopez, Patricia (June 22, 2004). "Pawlenty's trade mission—Poland and the Czech Republic: Pawlenty praises Poland's 'bright future'". Star Tribune. 
^ Von Sternberg, Bob (November 13, 2010). "Gov. Tim Pawlenty: Signing off". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on November 20, 2010. 
^ "Initiatives of NGA chairs". National Governors Association. 
^ "Past Chairs". Midwestern Governors Association. Archived from the original on May 1, 2013. 
^ Ambinder, Marc (February 9, 2005). "Conservatives Say Pawlenty Is Potential Presidential Candidate". ABC News. 
^ Will, George F. (February 24, 2008). "The Running Mate McCain Needs". The Washington Post. p. B07. 
^ Martin, Jonathan (February 17, 2008). "Steadfast McCain ally sparks veep talk". Politico. 
^ "Gov. Pawlenty announces re-election bid (feature audio)". MPR News. Minnesota Public Radio. May 31, 2006. 
^ Black, Eric; Tice, D.J. (March 14, 2007). "Pawlenty for veep: Will he or won't he?". Star Tribune. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty Announces re-election campaign (video)". WCCO-TV. May 31, 2006. Archived from the original on February 9, 2013. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ Black, Eric (February 18, 2008). "How did veep talk go so far without Pawlenty's pledge coming up?". MinnPost. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty to co-chair McCain '08 exploratory committee". KARE. Associated Press. January 15, 2007. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Pugmire, Tim (January 9, 2008). "Presidential campaigns raise volume in Minnesota". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved January 10, 2008. 
^ Hopfensperger, Jean (January 7, 2008) [updated February 5, 2008]. "Is Pawlenty's plan for immigration aimed at a VP slot?". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on January 27, 2008. Retrieved July 13, 2008. 
^ "McCain Selects His Running Mate". FOXNews.com. August 28, 2008. Archived from the original on 2008-11-02. Retrieved August 28, 2008. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty: McCain's Vice President?". Huffingtonpost.com. January 8, 2008. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ "McCain taps Alaska Gov. Palin as vice president pick". CNN Politics. CNN. August 29, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty says he never backed bailout in 2008". Politico Live. January 16, 2011. 
^ Ambinder, Marc (February 9, 2005). "Conservatives Say Pawlenty Is Potential Presidential Candidate". ABC News. Retrieved April 3, 2011. 
^ Kendra Marr (December 17, 2010). "Tim Pawlenty's regret: No third term". Politico. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ "Obama easily outpolls Pawlenty, Palin" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. July 10, 2009. Retrieved May 3, 2010. 
^ "Pawlenty rolls out new health care proposals". CNN. October 13, 2009. Retrieved May 25, 2010. 
^ Foster, Daniel (January 27, 2011). "Pence Out, Republican Presidential Field Open". National Review. 
^ Jonathan Martin (October 1, 2009). "Pawlenty preps 2012 campaign team". Politico. Retrieved June 3, 2010. 
^ "Pawlenty in Iowa: Republican party must unite to take power from Democrats | Des Moines Register Staff Blogs". Blogs.desmoinesregister.com. October 27, 2010. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ Peters, Jeremy (January 29, 2011). "Political Blogs Are Ready to Flood Campaign Trail". The New York Times. 
^ Kendra Marr (January 14, 2011). "Pawlenty: No VP thoughts this time". Politico. Retrieved January 14, 2011. 
^ Davenport, Reid (January 18, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty: If I run, it will be for the presidency". The GW Hatchet. The George Washington University. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ a b Weiner, Jay (January 18, 2011). "In campaign-like appearance, Pawlenty shows off 'Courage to Stand' ... and to sit, signing books". MinnPost. Retrieved January 18, 2011. 
^ a b Bryan Fischer and Tim Pawlenty. AFA's Bryan Fischer Interviews Tim Pawlenty. YouTube (Google). Retrieved January 17, 2011. 
^ Exclusive – Tim Pawlenty Extended Interview (Episode #16007). The Daily Show (Comedy Partners). January 12, 2010. Retrieved January 17, 2011. 
^ Duffy, J.P. (December 15, 2010). "FRC, Members of Congress, Governors, and Conservative Leaders Release Open Letter Calling for Civil Debate, End to Character Assassination". Retrieved January 30, 2011. 
^ Pawlenty, Tim (December 13, 2010). "Government Unions vs. Taxpayers". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Marr, Kendra (March 21, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty forms 2012 presidential exploratory committee". Politico. Retrieved March 21, 2011. 
^ Camia, Catalina (March 21, 2011). "Pawlenty launches committee to explore White House bid". USA Today. Retrieved March 21, 2011. 
^ Aliyah Shahid (April 13, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty to CNN's Piers Morgan: 'I'm running for President,' spokesman walks it back". Daily News (New York). Retrieved January 13, 2012.  and in context Tim Pawlenty Tells Piers Morgan: "I'm Running For President". CNN via PoliticsNewsNews via YouTube (Google). Retrieved April 15, 2011. 
^ "@CNN report of @TimPawlenty on @piersmorgan is out of context. Obviously, Pawlenty has exploratory committee to run for President. Not VP," wrote Alex Conant, his spokesman, in Wallbank, Derek (April 12, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty accidentally confirms the obvious, then walks it back". MinnPost. Retrieved April 15, 2011. 
^ "Real change is about telling hard truths". USA Today. May 23, 2011. 
^ Pawlenty 'betting it all on Iowa' in presidential run. KARE-TV. Multimedia KARE. May 23, 2011. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Tim Pawlenty – A Time for Truth (Preview of Monday's Announcement). YouTube (Google). May 22, 2011. Retrieved May 22, 2011. 
^ Shear, Michael (May 22, 2011). "Pawlenty Announces Candidacy a Day Early". The New York Times. Retrieved May 22, 2011. 
^ Seib, Gerald F. (May 23, 2011). "Is America Ready for President TPaw?". The Wall Street Journal. Dow Jones. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Reinhard, Beth (August 13, 2011). "Bachmann Boom; TPaw Bust?". National Journal. Archived from the original on October 25, 2011. Retrieved August 14, 2011. 
^ "PolitiFact: Obamacare was patterned after (Mitt Romney's) plan in Massachusetts". August 12, 2011. Retrieved August 9, 2012. 
^ Lucy Madison (June 14, 2011). "Will backing off "Obamneycare" in GOP debate hurt Pawlenty's campaign?". CBS News. Retrieved November 2, 2012. 
^ Jens Manuel Krogstad (June 14, 2011). "Pawlenty decision to back off "Obamneycare" criticism questioned". Des Moined Register. Retrieved November 2, 2012. 
^ Bakst, Brian (August 14, 2011). "Ex-Minn. Gov. Tim Pawlenty ends White House bid". The Huffington Post. Associated Press. Retrieved August 14, 2011. 
^ Memoli, Michael (2011-09-12). "Tim Pawlenty backs former rival Mitt Romney for president". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved 2011-09-12. 
^ Parker, Ashley & Barbaro, Michael (July 17, 2012). "Caution, Not Flash, as Romney Seeks His No. 2". New York Times. Retrieved July 18, 2012. 
^ "Mitt Romney loses Tim Pawlenty as campaign co-chair 45 days before election", newsday.com.
^ "Roundtable Management" Archived November 15, 2012, at the Wayback Machine., FSR webpage. Retrieved 2012-11-08.
^ Orol, Ronald D., "Pawlenty: ‘Walls of reality’ closing on Congress", MarketWatch, November 7, 2012. Retrieved 2012-11-08.
^ Art Hughes (November 6, 2002). "Pawlenty sets stage for a Capitol revolution". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Mary Pawlenty leaves bench for new job". Minnesota Public radio. Associated Press. January 4, 2007. 
^ "Minn. First Lady to Join Gilbert Mediation Center". wcco.com. Associated Press. September 2007. Archived from the original on May 18, 2008. 
^ "Tim (Timothy J.) Pawlenty". Minnesota Historical Society. 
^ Lewis, Matt (January 2011). "Tim Pawlenty on Michele Bachmann, Michael Steele . . . and Hockey". Politics Daily. Retrieved May 16, 2011. 
^ Todd, Chuck; Murray, Mark; Montanaro, Domenico (May 23, 2011). "2012: Daniels is out, T-Paw and Cain are in". First Read. MSNBC. Archived from the original on May 28, 2011. 
^ "Who's afraid of Mitt and T-Paw...". Front Row Washington. Reuters. May 20, 2011. 
^ Antle, W. James III (May 23, 2011). "TPaw and TARP, Cont'd". The American Spectator. 
^ a b "Pawlenty: An economic pro or crafty budget setter?". Fox News. Associated Press. May 25, 2011. 
^ "Klobuchar Approval Rating Highest PPP Has Found in Last Year" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. April 16, 2009. 
^ "Palin At The Top – And Bottom – for GOP Voters in 2012 – Rasmussen Reports". Rasmussen Reports. July 7, 2009. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ "SurveyUSA News Poll #16315". SurveyUSA. March 3, 2010. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ "Election 2010: Minnesota Governor". Rasmussen Reports, LLC. October 22, 2010. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ "Pawlenty Begins Race With 41% GOP Name Recognition". Gallup. March 23, 2011. 
^ "Voters tepid toward Obama, but favor him over GOP". Public Policy Polling. March 16, 2011. 
^ "Obama a lock in Minnesota" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. June 6, 2011. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1994. p. 145. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1996. pp. 155–156. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1998. pp. 142–143. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2000. p. 481. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2006. pp. 456–463. 


External links



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Tim Pawlenty.




Biography portal
Minnesota portal
Politics portal




Tim Pawlenty at Minnesota Legislators Past & Present

Profile at Project Vote Smart
Financial information (federal office) at the Federal Election Commission
Appearances on C-SPAN
Campaign contributions at Follow the Money (U.S. House)
Campaign 2002 – Minnesota Governor Minnesota Public Radio
Campaign 2006 – Tim Pawlenty Minnesota Public Radio



Minnesota House of Representatives


Preceded by
Art Seaberg
Member of the Minnesota House of Representatives
from District 38B
1993–2003
Succeeded by
Lynn Wardlow


Preceded by
Ted Winter
Majority Leader of the Minnesota House of Representatives
1999–2003
Succeeded by
Erik Paulsen


Party political offices


Preceded by
Norm Coleman
Republican nominee for Governor of Minnesota
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Emmer


Political offices


Preceded by
Jesse Ventura
Governor of Minnesota
2003–2011
Succeeded by
Mark Dayton


Preceded by
Janet Napolitano
Chair of National Governors Association
2007–2008
Succeeded by
Ed Rendell








v
t
e


Governors of Minnesota



Territorial (1849–58)



Ramsey
Gorman
Medary








State (since 1858)



Sibley
Ramsey
Swift
Miller
Marshall
Austin
Davis
Pillsbury
Hubbard
McGill
Merriam
Nelson
Clough
Lind
Van Sant
Johnson
Eberhart
Hammond
Burnquist
Preus
Christianson
Olson
Petersen
Benson
Stassen
Thye
Youngdahl
E. Anderson
Freeman
Andersen
Rolvaag
LeVander
W. Anderson
Perpich
Quie
Perpich
Carlson
Ventura
Pawlenty
Dayton












v
t
e


Chairs of the National Governors Association






Willson
McGovern
Walsh
Spry
Capper
Harrington
Allen
Sproul
Cox
Trinkle
Brewster
McMullen
Dern
Case
Pollard
Rolph
McNutt
Peery
Cochran
Stark
Vanderbilt
Stassen
O'Conor
Saltonstall
Maw
Martin
Caldwell
Hildreth
Hunt
Lane
Carlson
Lausche
Peterson
Shivers
Thornton
Kennon
Langlie
Stanley
Stratton
Collins
Boggs
McNichols
Powell
Rosellini
Anderson
Sawyer
Reed
Guy
Volpe
Ellington
Love
Hearnes
Moore
Mandel
Evans
Rampton
Ray
Andrus
Askew
Milliken
Carroll
Bowen
Busbee
Snelling
Matheson
J. Thompson
Carlin
Alexander
Clinton
Sununu
Baliles
Branstad
Gardner
Ashcroft
Romer
Campbell
Dean
T. Thompson
Miller
Voinovich
Carper
Leavitt
Glendening
Engler
Patton
Kempthorne
Warner
Huckabee
Napolitano
Pawlenty
Rendell
Douglas
Manchin
Gregoire
Heineman
Markell
Fallin
Hickenlooper
Herbert
McAuliffe
Sandoval












v
t
e


Minnesota House Majority Leaders






W. Dunn
Wilson
Rockne
Rines
Wm. Nolan
Girling
Wi. Norton
McDonough
R. Dunn
Eastvold
R. Dunn
Cina
Dirlam
Lindstrom
Anderson
Knickerbocker
Eken
Sieben
Levi
Vanasek
Wynia
Long
Welle
Anderson
Carruthers
Winter
Pawlenty
Paulsen
Sertich
Dean
Murphy
Peppin















v
t
e


(2008 ←)    United States presidential election, 2012    (→ 2016)






United States elections, 2012
Fundraising
National polls
Statewide polls (pre-2012, early 2012)
Timeline
General election debates
Newspaper endorsements
International reactions
Hurricane Sandy





Democratic Party

Convention
Primaries

Newspaper endorsements





Incumbent nominee: Barack Obama

campaign
endorsements
positions


Incumbent VP nominee: Joe Biden

positions




Challengers: Bob Ely
Keith Judd
Warren Mosler
Darcy Richardson
Jim Rogers
Vermin Supreme
Randall Terry
John Wolfe





Republican Party

Convention
Primaries
Debates

Statewide polls
National polls

Straw polls

Newspaper endorsements





Nominee: Mitt Romney

campaign
endorsements
positions


VP nominee: Paul Ryan

positions




Candidates: Michele Bachmann (campaign)
Herman Cain (campaign)
Jack Fellure
Newt Gingrich (campaign)
Stewart Greenleaf
Jon Huntsman (campaign)
Gary Johnson (campaign)
Fred Karger
Andy Martin
Thaddeus McCotter (campaign)
Jimmy McMillan
Roy Moore
Ron Paul (campaign)
Tim Pawlenty (campaign)
Rick Perry (campaign)
Buddy Roemer (campaign)
Rick Santorum (campaign)





Libertarian Party

Convention
Primaries





Nominee: Gary Johnson

campaign
positions


VP nominee: Jim Gray


Candidates: Jim Duensing
R. J. Harris
Carl Person
Sam Sloan
R. Lee Wrights





Green Party

Convention





Nominee: Jill Stein (campaign)
VP nominee: Cheri Honkala


Candidates: Stewart Alexander
Roseanne Barr
Kent Mesplay










Other third-party and independent candidates



American Independent Party



Nominee Tom Hoefling


Candidates Wiley Drake
Virgil Goode (campaign)
Edward C. Noonan
Laurie Roth





American Third Position Party



Nominee Merlin Miller
VP nominee Virginia Abernethy





America's Party



Nominee Tom Hoefling





Constitution Party

Convention





Nominee Virgil Goode (campaign)
VP nominee Jim Clymer


Candidates Darrell Castle
Laurie Roth
Robby Wells





Freedom Socialist Party



Nominee Stephen Durham





Grassroots Party



Nominee Jim Carlson





Justice Party



Nominee Rocky Anderson
VP nominee Luis J. Rodriguez





Objectivist Party



Nominee Tom Stevens





Party for Socialism and Liberation



Nominee Peta Lindsay





Peace and Freedom Party



Nominee Roseanne Barr
VP nominee Cindy Sheehan


Candidates Stewart Alexander
Rocky Anderson
Stephen Durham
Peta Lindsay





Prohibition Party



Nominee Jack Fellure


Candidates James Hedges





Reform Party



Nominee Andre Barnett


Candidates Laurence Kotlikoff
Darcy Richardson
Buddy Roemer (campaign)
Robert David Steele
Robby Wells





Socialist Equality Party



Nominee Jerry White





Socialist Workers Party



Nominee James Harris





Socialist Party



Nominee Stewart Alexander (campaign)
VP nominee Alejandro Mendoza





Independents



Candidates Lee Abramson
Randy Blythe
Jeff Boss
Robert Burck
Terry Jones
Joe Schriner





Draft movements



Michael Bloomberg (movement)













State results






Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming











Other 2012 elections: House
Senate
Gubernatorial









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 160316458
LCCN: n2010076275
SUDOC: 157114341










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Tim_Pawlenty&oldid=792355660"					
Categories: 1960 births21st-century American politiciansAmerican people of German descentAmerican people of Polish descentBaptists from the United StatesConverts to Baptist denominationsConverts to Baptist denominations from Roman CatholicismGovernors of MinnesotaLiving peopleMembers of the Minnesota House of RepresentativesMinnesota lawyersMinnesota RepublicansPoliticians from Saint Paul, MinnesotaPeople from Eagan, MinnesotaPeople from South St. Paul, MinnesotaRepublican Party state governors of the United StatesUnited States presidential candidates, 2012University of Minnesota Law School alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from July 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from November 2016Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


ČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançaisHornjoserbsceItalianoעבריתNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 26 July 2017, at 01:16.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Tim Pawlenty - Wikipedia




















 







Tim Pawlenty

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Tim Pawlenty








Chair of the National Governors Association


In office
July 23, 2007 – July 14, 2008


Preceded by
Janet Napolitano


Succeeded by
Ed Rendell


39th Governor of Minnesota


In office
January 6, 2003 – January 3, 2011


Lieutenant
Carol Molnau


Preceded by
Jesse Ventura


Succeeded by
Mark Dayton


Majority Leader of the Minnesota House of Representatives


In office
January 3, 1999 – January 3, 2003


Governor
Jesse Ventura


Preceded by
Ted Winter


Succeeded by
Erik Paulsen


Member of the Minnesota House of Representatives
from District 38B


In office
January 3, 1993 – January 3, 2003


Preceded by
Art Seaberg


Succeeded by
Lynn Wardlow





Personal details


Born
Timothy James Pawlenty
(1960-11-27) November 27, 1960 (age 56)
Saint Paul, Minnesota, U.S.


Nationality
American


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Mary Anderson


Children
2


Alma mater
University of Minnesota, Twin Cities (BA, JD)


Signature



Timothy James "Tim" Pawlenty (/pəˈlɛnti/;[1] born November 27, 1960) is president and CEO of Financial Services Roundtable, a Washington, D.C.-based industry advocacy group. He was a Republican politician who served as the 39th Governor of Minnesota (2003–2011). He previously served in the Minnesota House of Representatives (1993–2003), where he was majority leader for two terms. In 2011, he entered the campaign for the Republican presidential nomination and later was a potential vice presidential nominee before serving as co-chair of Mitt Romney's campaign.
Pawlenty was born in Saint Paul, Minnesota, and raised in nearby South St. Paul. He graduated from University of Minnesota with a B.A. in political science and a J.D. His early career included working as a labor law attorney and the vice president of a software as a service company. After settling in the city of Eagan with his wife, Pawlenty was appointed to the city's Planning Commission and was elected to the Eagan City Council at the age of 28. He won a seat as a state representative in 1992, representing District 38B in suburban Dakota County. He was re-elected four times and was voted majority leader by House Republicans in 1998.
After narrowly winning the Republican gubernatorial primary in 2002, Pawlenty won a three-way election for Governor of Minnesota, and was re-elected in 2006 by a margin of less than one percent. His campaign platform focused on balancing the budget without raising taxes. During Pawlenty's governorship, he did not raise income taxes, but did enact targeted increases in sales tax and user fees. His administration advocated for numerous public works projects, including work on the Northstar Commuter Rail Line, and the construction of Target Field, a Major League Baseball stadium in Minneapolis. He signed a bill mandating 20% ethanol in gasoline by 2013. He cut health care costs in an attempt to balance the budget, and borrowed funds from the state's K-12 education and low income programs. He signed an executive order rejecting federal funds related to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act. He also led worldwide trips for business leaders and trade delegations to explore trade opportunities. In the 2007–2008 term, he served as chairman of the National Governors Association.
Pawlenty was rumored to be a contender for both the Republican presidential and vice presidential nominations during the 2008 election, and he officially sought the 2012 Republican presidential nomination from May to August 2011. After withdrawing from that race, he became a finalist to join his party's nominee on the 2012 ticket as its vice presidential candidate.[2] Pawlenty was not selected as Mitt Romney's vice presidential candidate, but served as co-chair of Romney's campaign. In September 2012, he left Romney's campaign to become a Washington lobbyist for financial institutions.[3]



Contents


1 Early life, education, and early career
2 Minnesota House of Representatives
3 Governorship

3.1 Election, 2002
3.2 Reelection, 2006
3.3 State budget

3.3.1 Minnesota Supreme Court case


3.4 Funding projects
3.5 Education
3.6 Transportation
3.7 Crime
3.8 Energy policy and climate change
3.9 Health
3.10 Foreign relations
3.11 Other activities


4 2012 presidential campaign

4.1 Early steps
4.2 Book tour and political positions
4.3 Candidacy


5 Financial Services Roundtable
6 Personal life
7 Public image

7.1 Political views
7.2 Approval ratings
7.3 Electoral history


8 References
9 External links



Early life, education, and early career
Pawlenty was born in Saint Paul, Minnesota, to Eugene Joseph Pawlenty, and his wife, Virginia Frances (née Oldenburg).[4][5] His father, who drove a milk delivery truck, was of Polish descent, while his mother was of German ancestry.[4] His mother died of cancer when he was 16.[6] Pawlenty grew up in South St. Paul,[5] where he played ice hockey on his high school's junior varsity squad.[7]
Intending to become a dentist, Pawlenty enrolled in the University of Minnesota, the only one in his family to go beyond high school.[8] However, he changed his plans and spent the summers of 1980 and 1982 working as an intern at the office of U.S. Senator David Durenberger.[5] In 1983, he graduated with a B.A. in political science.[9] He received a Juris Doctor from the University of Minnesota Law School in 1986.[10] While in law school, he met wife, Mary Anderson, whom he married in 1987.[11]
Pawlenty first worked as a labor law attorney at the firm Rider Bennett (later Rider, Bennett, Egan & Arundel), where he had interned while a law student.[12] He later became vice president of a software as a service company, Wizmo Inc.[13][14]
Having moved to Eagan, Minnesota, a suburb of Minneapolis – Saint Paul, Pawlenty was appointed to the city's Planning Commission by Mayor Vic Ellison.[14][15] One year later, at age 28, he was elected to the City Council.[6]
Pawlenty entered state politics in 1990 as a campaign advisor for Jon Grunseth's losing bid for Minnesota governor.[6] After Pawlenty himself became governor, he appointed Grunseth's ex-wife, Vicky Tigwell, to the board of the Minneapolis−Saint Paul International Airport, an action which became an ethics and accountability issue in 2003.[16][17]
Minnesota House of Representatives
Pawlenty was elected to the Minnesota House of Representatives in 1992, winning 49.1 percent of the vote in District 38B (suburban Dakota County).[18] In the House, he authored bills instituting term limits for committee chairmen, funding for infant parenting classes, minimum sentences for repeat domestic violence offenders, and community notification for sex offenders. In response to a state budget surplus, he advocated for a tax reduction rather than expanded education funding.[19] He was reelected four times and was chosen House Majority Leader when the Republicans became the majority party in the State Legislature in 1998.[20]
Governorship
Election, 2002
Main article: Minnesota gubernatorial election, 2002
In 2002, Pawlenty wanted to run for governor, but party leaders made it clear they favored businessman Brian Sullivan.[6][21] Pawlenty then decided on the U.S. Senate, but he abandoned those plans when Vice President Dick Cheney asked him to step aside and allow former St. Paul mayor Norm Coleman to challenge Senator Paul Wellstone without Republican primary opposition.[22] Pawlenty returned to his original ambition and won a hard-fought and narrow victory over Sullivan in the Republican party primary election.[23]
In the general election, Pawlenty faced two strong opponents. His main rival was veteran Democratic–Farmer–Labor (DFL) state senator Roger Moe. Former Democratic Congressman Tim Penny ran on the Independence Party ticket (Governor Jesse Ventura, a member of the Independence Party, chose not to seek reelection). Until mid-October 2002, all three were essentially tied in the polls.[24] Pawlenty's major campaign stances included: a pledge not to raise taxes to balance the state's budget deficit (while allowing for increases in license and user fees);[24] that visa expiration dates be required to be printed on driver's licenses; that women seeking an abortion be required to wait at least 24 hours; enactment of a concealed carry gun law; and reform of the state's education requirements.[25] Pawlenty won the election with 43.8 percent of the vote.[26] His largest gains after the October three-way tie were reportedly among voters in the suburbs of Minneapolis–St. Paul.[24]
Reelection, 2006
Main article: Minnesota gubernatorial election, 2006
Governor Pawlenty ran for re-election in 2006.[27] He espoused conservative stands on issues. But conservatives criticized him on funding issues, in particular two pieces of legislation for stadiums for the Gophers and Minnesota Twins, and bond issues for public transit, including the Northstar commuter rail line.[28]
The 2006 gubernatorial race included Minnesota Attorney General Mike Hatch, of the DFL; Peter Hutchinson of the Independence Party; and Ken Pentel of the Green Party. Pawlenty won, defeating Hatch by a margin of less than one percent, though both the state House and Senate gained DFL majority.[29]
State budget
Pawlenty was elected in 2002 on a platform of balancing the state's budget without raising taxes. He emphasized his campaign and first term with the Taxpayers League of Minnesota slogan "no new taxes."[30] His governorship was characterized by a historically low rate of spending growth. According to the Minnesota Management and Budget Department, general-fund expenditures from 2004 to 2011 increased an average of 3.5 percent per two-year term, compared to an average of 21.1 percent from 1960 to 2003 (these numbers, however, are not inflation-adjusted).[31][32][33] University of Minnesota political science professor Larry Jacobs said that slowing down state spending and opposing tax increases were the "signature issue" of Pawlenty's governorship.[34]
In his first year as governor, Pawlenty inherited a projected two-year budget deficit of $4.3 billion, the largest in Minnesota's history.[35] After a contentious budget session with a Democrat-controlled Senate, he signed a package of fee increases, spending reductions, and government reorganization which eliminated the deficit. The budget reduced the rate of funding increases for state services, including transportation, social services, and welfare. It also enacted a perennial proposal to restructure city aid based on immediate need, rather than historical factors. In negotiations the governor agreed to several compromises, abandoning a desired public employee wage freeze and property tax restrictions.[35]
During his second term, Pawlenty erased a $2.7-billion deficit by cutting spending, shifting payments, and using one-time federal stimulus money.[36] His final budget (2010–2011) was the state's first two-year period since 1960 in which net government expenditures decreased. Pawlenty has claimed this as "the first time in 150 years" that spending has been cut, but fact-checkers have disputed this claim as no public budget records prior to 1960 are known to exist.[33][37]
Pawlenty has been criticized by some for providing a short-term budget solution but coming up short in his long-term strategy as governor. The state department of Management and Budget reports that the two-year budget starting in July 2011 is projected to come up $4.4 billion short.[36] Former Minnesota Governor Arne Carlson, a Republican, criticized Pawlenty's budget strategy: he borrowed more than $1 billion from the tobacco settlement (money set aside for health care), borrowed more than $1.4 billion from K-12 education funding, borrowed more than $400 [million][38] from the Health Care Access Fund for low-income families, among other short-term shifts in accounting. The result was a $5-billion deficit, the seventh largest in the United States.[39] Minnesota property taxes rose $2.5 billion, more than the previous 16 years combined, and Moody's lowered the state's bond rating.[40] Carlson told Time, "I don't think any governor has left behind a worse financial mess than he [Pawlenty] has." Pawlenty responded, "My friend governor Arne Carlson is, of course, now an Obama and John Kerry supporter."[41]
Minnesota Supreme Court case




Minnesota Supreme Court chamber at the Minnesota State Capitol


While Pawlenty said he was "confident" in his right to use unallotment, the Minnesota Supreme Court ultimately decided against him, voting 4 to 3 in a decision in May 2010.[42] His budget had been the subject of a lawsuit in Ramsey County District Court, which was decided against him. Judge Kathleen Gearin decided Pawlenty exceeded his constitutional authority in making unilateral spending cuts to a $5.3-million special dietary program that he had unalloted.[43][44] Attorney David Lillehaug said initially, "This is, I don't think it's understating this to say, this is one of the most important court cases in Minnesota legal history."[45] Pawlenty announced the following day that he would appeal;[46] he filed his defense in February,[47] and arguments were heard on March 15.[48][49] In May, the Supreme Court affirmed Judge Gearin, deciding that "Because the legislative and executive branches never enacted a balanced budget for the 2010–2011 biennium, use of the unallotment power to address the unresolved deficit exceeded the authority granted to the executive branch by the statute".[50] Pawlenty responded:[51]

I will fight to reduce spending and taxes in Minnesota and that battle continues. My commitment to the people of Minnesota remains the same: we will balance the budget without raising taxes.

After the court ruling, as the 2010 legislative session drew to a close, Pawlenty vetoed a budget which would fix a $2.9-billion deficit by adding a new tax bracket for six-figure incomes. In response to the proposal, he criticized Democrats for attempting to raise taxes in the midst of an extremely difficult economic situation.[52] Eventually, due in part to the efforts of House Speaker Margaret Kelliher, who was running for the 2010 Democratic nomination for governor of Minnesota, the General Assembly passed legislation approving nearly all the original unallotments.[53]
Funding projects
Since the Minnesota Constitution prohibits state-run gambling outside of Native territory, Pawlenty proposed negotiating with Minnesota's 11 tribes over profit-sharing of their casinos.[54] Legislators also pushed a proposal to turn Canterbury Park horse track into a racino.[55] The plan was poorly received by Northern Tribes who would operate part of the racino, citing reluctance to compete with other tribes.[56] Tribes with casinos opposed the expanded gambling and some legislators objected on moral grounds that the state shouldn't exploit problem gamblers. Politicians in heavy tribal areas feared losing campaign-finance sources if they supported the plan.[57][58] Delays by the Legislature ended with the bill being pulled from committee.[59] Tribes had spent millions lobbying legislatures in 2004.[60]
Pawlenty worked throughout 2006 to fund a Minnesota Twins baseball stadium in Minneapolis.[61] The resulting Minnesota Twins-Hennepin County ballpark bill called for an increased county sales tax which passed the state legislature and was symbolically signed in at the Hubert H. Humphrey Metrodome.[62][63] The majority of Hennepin County commissioners did not feel a referendum was necessary to approve the sales tax because of the delay it would cause. Pawlenty and the Legislature agreed, citing 10 years already of the project's debate, and exempted the county from state law requiring one in the bill.[64][65]
In June 2006, Pawlenty signed a $999.9-million public works bill that included funding for additional work on the Northstar Commuter rail line (a change in position from reservations about the idea he initially expressed), an expanded Faribault prison, a bioscience building at the University of Minnesota, and science facilities at Minnesota State University in Mankato. The bill also funded a $26-million expansion of the University of Minnesota's Carlson School of Management.[66]
In 2011, Pawlenty shut down an Islamic finance program, that was part of a larger program to increase home ownership in Minnesota, and his spokesperson said that the program accommodated the Muslim ban on interest.[67] Adam Sorensen from TIME questioned whether this was a case of double standards, pointing out New York's kosher food regulations, Blue Laws that prohibit alcohol sales on Sundays, and Pawlenty's own creation of "The Governor's Council On Faith-Based And Community Initiatives".[68]
Education
In the budget process, Pawlenty made an effort to preserve education funding while cutting other government spending. In 2009, he bolstered education funding using federal stimulus grants. Despite this, education funding fell from $9,700 to $8,400 per student (adjusted for inflation) during his tenure.[69] Pawlenty was an advocate for charter schools and was praised by the National Alliance for Public Charter Schools for his education policies. In 2010, the organization rated Minnesota #1 in the country for charter school promotion.[70]
Pawlenty oversaw the repeal of the Profile of Learning Kindergarten through 12th grade graduation requirements and sought to reinstate them during his governorship.[71] Renamed the Minnesota Academic Standards, they were guided by Department of Education commissioner Cheri Pierson Yecke. The bill's first draft raised several concerns by the education review boards including the amount of content, age-appropriateness, and a European-centric view of the social sciences portion.[72] Yecke revised and expanded material based on the response.[73] Even as both Legislative houses passed the Academic Standards bill, her confirmation as commissioner was rejected by the DFL majority Minnesota Senate.[74] She was seen as an outsider coming from Virginia and became unpopular for having pushed the academic reforms during a tight budget session as well as her critical look of Minnesota schools.[75] In her confirmation hearing, DFLers also noted concern over her conservative viewpoints.[75]
In June 2006, Pawlenty proposed the ACHIEVE program for the top 25% of high school graduates.[76] The program would pay for tuition for the first 2 years (4 years for selected fields such as science, technology, engineering and math) and would cost the state an estimated $112 million per 2-year cycle. However the program was not included in the 2007 higher education bill.[77]
Pawlenty used an accounting change called a tax shift to balance the state deficit without raising taxes. School districts statewide may unexpectedly lose $58 million in interest and reserve revenue.[78]
In 2010, Pawlenty vetoed a bill (HF 3164), which the legislature had passed 110 to 20, calling for Minnesota State Colleges & Universities (MnSCU) to revamp its credit transferring system within five years to fix "minimal loss of credits for transferring students" who had been losing between 10 and 30 percent of their credits.[79] Pawlenty found it "unnecessary" because MnSCU was fixing its system already "through internal actions and policy changes".[79]
Transportation




U.S. Representative Keith Ellison speaking at the site of the I-35W Mississippi River Bridge collapse in Minneapolis. He is flanked by Governor Pawlenty on the picture's left. To right: Mayor R. T. Rybak, Secretary of Transportation Mary Peters behind Ellison, Betty McCollum, and Senator Norm Coleman


During Pawlenty's first term, urban traffic congestion was a significant concern of voters. He appointed his lieutenant governor, Carol Molnau, as transportation commissioner, for which she was approved by the legislature in May 2004.[80] Molnau attempted to reform the transportation department, (Mn/DOT), using concepts such as "design-build". Legislators criticized Molnau's performance as transportation commissioner, citing ineffective leadership and management, and removed her from that role in February 2008, a decision Pawlenty said was motivated by partisanship.[80][81]
Pawlenty favored raising fees and imposing toll lanes on roads as the primary means of discouraging excessive traffic. During his term, the carpool lanes of Interstate 394 leading into downtown Minneapolis were converted into high-occupancy toll lanes. Pawlenty used or threatened vetoes in 2005, 2007 and 2008 on legislation funding proposed highway expansion, infrastructure repairs, road maintenance, and mass transit.[82] The 2008 veto was in spite of Pawlenty's announcement that he would consider reversing his opposition to a state gas-tax increase for funding road and bridge repairs, in the wake of the collapse of the I-35W Mississippi River bridge.[83]
Pawlenty had opposed the Northstar Commuter Rail as a legislator, but changed his position in 2004, announcing a funding plan to jump-start the project, when the Bush administration determined the rail line was deemed cost-effective and time-saving for commuters.[84]
In April 2008 during the budget bonding bill signing, Pawlenty used his line-item veto on $70 million pledged toward the building of the Central Corridor light-rail project, intended to connect Minneapolis and Saint Paul. In vetoing the expenditure, Pawlenty did not consult Peter Bell, head of the Metro Council and project leader.[85] Pawlenty stated that he vetoed the bill in order to send a message to the Legislature, which had exceeded his initial budget request, that they needed to "stay focused, be fiscally disciplined, set priorities and solve this budget crisis in a fiscally disciplined way."[86] Pawlenty however was supportive of the project and had requested the money in the bonding bill he submitted to the Minnesota State Legislature.[86] The veto disappointed some of Minnesota's congressional representatives in Washington, including Minnesota's Republican Senator Norm Coleman, who pledged to "raise my voice as strong as I can, as loud as I can. The federal commitment is there."[87] Though Pawlenty's veto might have delayed the ability of the state to receive federal matching funds for the project, Bell said the project was not derailed.[85] The Central Corridor funding issue was resolved on May 19, 2008, with the state pledging its original amount towards the project after legislators compromised with Pawlenty's budget requests.[88]
There were Republican state legislators who supported other cuts of the bonding bill, including Doug Magnus, the ranking Republican on the House Transportation Finance Division, who praised Pawlenty's "fiscal responsibility."[89] Critics, including Chris Coleman, Mayor of Saint Paul, called Pawlenty's veto "political gamesmanship," seeing the move as retribution for the Legislature's successful override of Pawlenty's veto of a transportation bonding bill.[86] They noted cuts overwhelmingly targeted Democratic districts, and Democratic stronghold Saint Paul most heavily.[90][91]
Crime
Crime in Minnesota was a high-profile political issue during Pawlenty's governorship. When crime rates in Minneapolis spiked 16 percent from 2004 to 2005, city officials blamed Pawlenty for large cuts to state aid, which they said restricted public safety resources. Pawlenty in turn criticized the capital city for poorly allocating its funding.[92]
Pawlenty made two large efforts to expand penalties for sexual offenders. In response to his first proposal in 2005, the state legislature passed a large package of sentencing reforms. One new instrument was the possibility of a life sentence without parole for serious offenders, although Pawlenty expressed disapproval at the courts' reluctance to use this option: only seven individuals received such a sentence in the first two years of implementation.[93] Pawlenty made a push for even harsher sentences in 2010, which increased the presumptive sentence for first-degree sex offenses from 12 years to 25 years and increased it further for repeat offenders. At the same time he advocated for a $90-million expansion of the state's civil commitment program for sexual offenders, maintaining that the increased criminal sentences would keep the commitment program's cost under control.[93] According to a single report in the Star Tribune, "A report on Minnesota's sex-offender program delivered to legislators in the final days of the Pawlenty administration was heavily edited by a top political appointee to reflect the former governor's skepticism about the effectiveness of treatment and to delete arguments for expanded community resources for offenders."[94]
Early in 2006, after issuing a study that estimated the cost of illegal immigration to the state as approximately $188 million, Pawlenty announced a program for changing the way the state dealt with persons who were in the United States illegally. Pawlenty said that the economic benefits of illegal immigration did not justify the illegal behavior.[95] Pawlenty's extensive proposal included the designation of 10 state law enforcement officials as the Minnesota Illegal Immigration Enforcement Team, "trained to question, detain and arrest suspected illegal immigrants" with a focus on "such crimes as human trafficking, identity theft, methamphetamine distribution and terrorism." He rounded out his proposal with tougher penalties for false identification, and instituting a fine of up to $5,000 for employers of illegal immigrants. His proposal was challenged by DFL senators who preferred increased legal immigration to punitive action.[96]
Energy policy and climate change




A United States Postal Service vehicle advertising its use of E85 fuel during the Saint Paul Winter Carnival parade in January 2007.


Minnesota has mandated a 10% mixture of gasoline and ethanol (gasohol) since 1997. Pawlenty signed into law in May 2005 a bill that will raise the minimum mandated mixture to 20% in 2013. Pawlenty has also lobbied the Governors' Ethanol Coalition to mandate higher ethanol use nationwide.[97]
Conservative Republican governors were not supportive of Pawlenty's presentation on clean energy to the governor's association, which he gave in cooperation with Ed Rendell, who was the governor of Pennsylvania and the National Governors Association's Democratic vice-chairman. With Kathleen Sebelius of Kansas, Pawlenty was co-chairman of the association's energy committee. The effort received "adamant opposition" from governors of petroleum (oil) producing states.[98]
In 2007, Governor Pawlenty signed the Next Generation Energy Act of 2007 into law and, along with six other Midwestern governors, the Midwestern Greenhouse Gas Accord. These directed state agencies to develop a plan to reduce greenhouse gases, and "develop a market-based and multi-sector cap-and-trade mechanism".[99] However, by 2009 Pawlenty had reversed his position and called cap-and-trade "overly bureaucratic" and a potential "disaster".[99] By 2011, Pawlenty's position had changed sufficiently to state "the weight of the evidence is that most of it, maybe all of it, is because of natural causes."[100]
Health
In 2004, Minnesota's Star Tribune newspaper opined that the credibility of Pawlenty's commissioner of health, Dianne Mandernach, suffered when a website posting by the department suggested that abortion might have a role in breast cancer. She also angered many when it was learned she had delayed releasing government research on cancer in miners. In 2007, Mandernach resigned.[101]
In 2005, Pawlenty asked a U.S. Senate subcommittee to allow his MinnesotaCare health plan to expand and continue allowing state residents and employees to import cheaper Canadian prescription drugs.[102]
In 2007, Pawlenty signed into law the 2007 Omnibus Health and Human Services Appropriations Bill, which provided funding for the Health Care Transformation Task Force, a panel of health care experts charged with exploring ways to reduce health care spending, improve quality, and ensure that Minnesota develops a universal health care plan by 2011.[103]
Later in his tenure he used health care funding cuts as a mechanism to balance the state budget. After years of assuring doctors that the state "sick tax" would be used only to fund health welfare programs, in 2009 Pawlenty recommended a 3% cut in physician reimbursements from the state and asked that the sick tax be put instead into the state's general budget.[104] Pawlenty used a line-item veto to remove $381 million from health and human services funding, a removal which could lead to 35,000 Minnesotans' losing their General Assistance Medical Care (GAMC) health insurance in 2011.[105] Hennepin County Medical Center—the largest provider of health care to Minnesota's poor and uninsured—closed two clinics, reduced its staff and reduced access to non-emergency services.[106] State Senator Linda Berglin wrote a bill that would extend GAMC funding.[107]
In 2010, he refused federal health care funds including more than $1 billion to expand the number of Minnesotans covered by Medicaid, $68 million for a high-risk insurance pool, $1 million to help set up an insurance exchange where consumers could shop for health coverage, and $850,000 for teenage pregnancy prevention. Pawlenty accepted a $500,000 abstinence-only sex-education grant that would require $350,000 in matching state money. Pawlenty said, "It doesn't say we have to apply for all of them."[108]
Foreign relations




Tim Pawlenty meeting Minnesota National Guard troops in Kosovo (April 12, 2008)


Pawlenty's first term coincided with the deployment of National Guardsmen from numerous states, connected with the War on Terror and the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan. During his two terms Pawlenty made trips to Iraq, Afghanistan, Bosnia, Kosovo, and Kuwait visiting Minnesota troops.[109]
Pawlenty was visited in 2004 by Mexican President Vicente Fox in talks to strengthen trade. Fox announced that his country would open a consulate in Minnesota the next year, removing the need for Mexican residents in the state to travel out of state for identification papers and other materials.[110] In mid-2006, in response to illegal immigration, Pawlenty sent Minnesota National Guardsmen to the U.S.–Mexico border at the request of the U.S. Department of Defense and the U.S. Department of Homeland Security.[111]
Pawlenty took a delegation of nearly 200 Minnesotan business, government, academic and civic leaders on a weeklong trip to China in mid-November 2005. The stated objectives were to provide a forum for companies to acquire market information, assess market potential, evaluate market entry strategies and identify potential business partners, as well as to promote Chinese investment in Minnesota.[112] Pawlenty also led Minnesota trade delegations to Canada in 2003,[113] Poland and the Czech Republic in 2004,[114] India in 2007,[113] and Israel in 2008.[109]
Other activities
Throughout his eight-year tenure, Pawlenty hosted a weekly one-hour radio show on WCCO-AM, a tradition he inherited from his predecessor as governor, Jesse Ventura.[115] Pawlenty was the chairman of the National Governors Association for the 2007–2008 term.[116] He also served as Chair of the Midwestern Governors Association in 2006.[117]
Beginning in 2005, Pawlenty was rumored in the press as a potential candidate for president of the United States.[118][119][120] When formally announcing his candidacy for a second term as Governor of Minnesota on May 31, 2006, Pawlenty said, "As to my future, if I run for governor and win, I will serve out my term for four years as governor."[121][122][123] On January 15, 2007, after being reelected, Pawlenty said, "I am committed to serving out my term as governor. That's what I am going to do."[124]
In 2007, it was announced that Pawlenty would be serving in a lead role for McCain as a national co-chair of his presidential exploratory committee[125] which led to Pawlenty's becoming co-chairman of McCain's campaign (along with Phil Gramm and Tom Loeffler).[126] In January 2008, a reporter for the Minneapolis Star Tribune suggested Pawlenty's renewed focus on his proposed immigration reform plans might be politically motivated as counterbalance to McCain's less favorable guest worker program.[127]
For many weeks, Pawlenty was widely considered to be a leading candidate for the vice-presidential nomination on the Republican ticket with John McCain in the 2008 presidential election.[128][129] In a surprise, McCain chose Alaska Governor Sarah Palin.[130]
In 2008, Pawlenty expressed support for the Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP). But in 2010 Pawlenty claimed that he had made those statements solely as a surrogate for presidential nominee McCain and never actually supported the idea himself.[131] On May 23, 2011, Pawlenty formally announced he'd run for the Republican presidential nomination, saying, “politicians are often afraid that if they're too honest, they might lose an election. I'm afraid that in 2012, if we're not honest enough, we may lose our country.”
2012 presidential campaign
Main article: Tim Pawlenty presidential campaign, 2012
Early steps
In February 2005, ABC News identified him as a potential candidate for president.[132] Pawlenty decided not to seek a third term as governor, and so was not a candidate in the November 2010 gubernatorial election.[133] In July 2009, Public Policy Polling conducted a poll that showed that President Obama was favored to win against Pawlenty in his home state of Minnesota by more than 10 points.[134] In October 2009, a CNN article suggested that Pawlenty was contemplating a 2012 White House bid.[135] Among those advising him in preparation for a potential presidential run was lobbyist and former Congressman Vin Weber.[136]
In late 2009, Pawlenty began taking steps that many saw as leading to a 2012 presidential bid.[137] He visited Iowa in November 2009 and April 2010, making political speeches.[138] In January 2011, the New York Times reported that "Few Americans, in fact, even know his name."[139] In January 2011, Pawlenty told the College Republicans group at The George Washington University "If I decide to run it would be for president, not vice president."[140][141]
Book tour and political positions




Pawlenty at a book signing in February 2011 in Phoenix, Arizona.


Pawlenty went on tour for his book Courage to Stand, and as of January 18, his book had reached #1,979 on Amazon.com's list of bestsellers.[142] Pawlenty calls himself a social conservative.[143] In his extended interview with Jon Stewart on The Daily Show, he said he thinks United States Social Security and Medicare need to be cut to balance the federal budget.[144] Pawlenty believes that state governments should outlaw abortion, except for cases of rape, incest, and to save a woman's life. He thinks the United States Supreme Court decided Roe v. Wade wrongly, abortion being a state, not a federal, matter. He opposes same-sex marriage and civil unions, and said on talk radio "... I have been a public supporter of maintaining Don't ask, don't tell and I would support reinstating it as well".[143]
In December 2010, Pawlenty was one of three U.S. governors who publicly declared solidarity with the Christian-right group Family Research Council.[145]
Pawlenty's tour was in Minneapolis, San Francisco and Dallas, and it ended January in Iowa where the Iowa Caucuses were scheduled for February 6, 2012. "That will come up fast," he said, "if I do run." In Minneapolis, speaking to Pat Kessler of WCCO-TV who asked about his feelings regarding a potential run for president by Representative Michele Bachmann, "I have a lot of respect for Michele Bachmann … Whether she runs or not, it's gonna be a big field. There's gonna be five, six, seven, eight people running … Whoever wants to run can run. The more, the merrier."[142]
In a December 2010 column in The Wall Street Journal, Pawlenty argued in favor of the historical benefits of "private sector" labor unions and strongly against "public sector" labor unions, whose collective bargaining rights he would like to see curbed: "The rise of the labor movement in the early 20th century was a triumph for America's working class. In an era of deep economic anxiety, unions stood up for hard-working but vulnerable families, protecting them from physical and economic exploitation." He also criticized modern unions: "The moral case for unions—protecting working families from exploitation—does not apply to public employment... Unionized public employees are making more money, receiving more generous benefits, and enjoying greater job security than the working families forced to pay for it with ever-higher taxes, deficits and debt."[146]
Candidacy
On March 21, 2011, Pawlenty announced, via Facebook, that he had formed an exploratory committee in preparation for a potential run for the 2012 Republican presidential nomination.[147][148]
On April 12, 2011, Pawlenty said clearly on CNN's Piers Morgan Tonight that he was "running for president" and not for vice president, adding that a formal announcement would be given in several weeks.[149] On Twitter, his spokesman said CNN took his comments out of context.[150]
On May 23, 2011, Pawlenty launched his candidacy for president in a speech in Iowa stating: "I'm going to try something a little unusual in politics. I'm just going to tell the truth."[151][152] A YouTube video[153] appeared a day before.[154] The Wall Street Journal wrote of his candidacy, and the luck he experienced in the GOP's field, that Pawlenty has a "golden chance to become the chief rival to... Mitt Romney".[155]
Pawlenty finished third in the Ames Straw Poll on August 13, 2011,[156] behind the winner Michele Bachmann and the runner-up Ron Paul. Before the Ames debate, he took a more aggressive stance against Romney, including the coining the term "Obamneycare".[157] When pressed by John King during CNN's June 13, 2011 debate to address why he used the word, he backed off.[158] However, he denied that he backed off.[159] The following day he announced his decision to withdraw from the presidential race.[160] On September 12, 2011, Pawlenty announced his endorsement of former Governor Mitt Romney of Massachusetts, as well as his position as national co-chair for Romney's campaign.[161] Romney retired over $400,000 of Pawlenty's campaign debt.[162]
Financial Services Roundtable
On September 20, 2012, Pawlenty's advisor Brian McClung announced to Associated Press that Pawlenty would resign as the co-chairman of Mitt Romney's electoral campaign. He was to head the Financial Services Roundtable (FSR), a financial service industry lobby group in Washington, D.C. He would not be running in the 2014 gubernatorial election in Minnesota nor in the state's 2014 senatorial election.[163] He assumed the positions of President & CEO. He replaced Steve Bartlett, a former U.S. Representative from Texas who had held the positions since 1999.[164]
In November 2012, Pawlenty said that "Republicans and Democrats will have to reconcile their differences on spending and taxes because the 'walls of reality are closing in on them'" relative to the federal government's looming "fiscal cliff". Presenting himself as not from Wall Street or from Washington and, having previously criticized “entrenched financial interests”, he said he could "bring a fresh and new voice to those debates”. He also "refuted assertions that implementation of the Dodd-Frank Act, legislation enacted roughly 27 months [earlier] in response to the financial crisis, ha[d] been delayed because of lobbying".[165]
Personal life




Tim Pawlenty with his wife, Mary


Pawlenty and his wife Mary have two daughters, Anna and Mara. Mary was appointed as a judge of the Dakota County District Court in Hastings, Minnesota, in 1994. After he was elected governor in 2002, the family remained at their Eagan home instead of moving into the Governor's residence because of his wife's requirement to live in her judicial district.[166] In 2007, she left her judicial position to become General Counsel of the National Arbitration Forum, a dispute-resolution company based in Minneapolis.[167] She stayed on only briefly before departing for another dispute-resolution company, the Gilbert Mediation Center.[168]
Pawlenty was raised a Roman Catholic. His conversion to an Evangelical Protestant faith has been attributed to his wife Mary, who is a member of Wooddale Church in Eden Prairie, Minnesota,[169] a member congregation of the Minnesota Baptist Conference. In a January 2011 interview, Mr. Pawlenty stated, "I love and respect and admire the Catholic Church. I still attend Mass once in a while there. The church I now attend is an interdenominational church which has got many former Catholics in it, and so we share the Christian faith and the Bible. I had to reconcile my faith life with my wife so we could have a consistent, integrated family faith life."[170]
Pawlenty frequently uses (and is referred to by) the mononym "TPaw" or "T-Paw".[171][172][173]
Public image
Political views
Pawlenty is generally considered a conservative on the American political spectrum. With regard to his economic record, he has drawn mixed reviews from fiscally conservative interest groups.[174] The lobbying group Taxpayers League of Minnesota gave Pawlenty an average approval score of 80% during his years as a state legislator, while the Cato Institute think-tank gave him scores ranging from C to A across his eight years as governor.[70] In February 2008, Washington Post columnist Robert Novak wrote that Pawlenty was the most conservative Minnesota governor since Governor Theodore Christianson in the 1920s.[98] A 2011 white paper by the Club for Growth, analyzing Pawlenty as a presidential candidate, found his political stance difficult to identify. The group praised him for reduced growth in spending and taxation, but found that he "has some simply inexcusable tax hikes in his record" and questioned his support of proposals such as "mandatory vegetable oil in gasoline, cap and trade, and a statewide smoking ban."[70] Chris Edwards, a director at Cato, speculated that Pawlenty's rightward tack in his second term was related to his impending presidential run.[174]
Approval ratings
In April 2009, 46% of Minnesotans approved of Pawlenty, while 40% disapproved.[175] Among registered Republicans nationwide in July 2009, 38% had a favorable view of him while 33% didn't according to a Rasmussen Reports survey.[176] In March 2010 42% of Minnesotans approved of Pawlenty, while 52% disapproved.[177]
In October 2010 a Rasmussen report showed that Pawlenty had a 49% approval rating among Minnesotans with 49% disapproving.[178] A March 2011 survey by Gallup stated that Pawlenty began his Presidential run with only 41% name recognition in the GOP.[179] Also in March 2011, the Public Policy Polling (PPP) agency found that nationwide voters had a net negative view of Pawlenty, with 15% viewing him favorably verses 33% unfavorably.[180] In a 2011 PPP poll of registered Minnesota voters conducted from May 27–30, 42% of Minnesotans had a favorable opinion of Pawlenty, while 52% had an unfavorable opinion of him. In the presidential race, President Obama lead Pawlenty by 51% to 43%, suggesting Pawlenty could lose his home state to President Obama were he the 2012 GOP nominee.[181]
Electoral history

Minnesota District 38B state representative elections, 1992–2000

Year
Republican
DFL
Constitution
Total
Source


 
 
 


Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %


1992
Tim Pawlenty
9,610
49.1%
Linda Rother
8,773
44.8%
James Russell McMahon
253
1.3%
19,583
[18]


1994
Tim Pawlenty
12,172
81.0%
None
None
15,022
[182]


1996
Tim Pawlenty
14,747
74.4%
None
None
19,822
[183]


1998
Tim Pawlenty
9,118
48.5%
Leo Brisbois
7,819
41.6%
None
18,809
[184]


2000
Tim Pawlenty
13,779
59.6%
Gary Moore
7,239
31.3%
None
23,100
[185]



Minnesota gubernatorial elections, 2002–2006

Year
Republican
DFL
Independence
Green
Total
Source


 
 
 
 


Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %


2002
Tim Pawlenty
999,473
43.8%
Roger Moe
821,268
36.0%
Tim Penny
364,534
16.0%
Ken Pentel
50,589
2.2%
2,282,860
[26]


2006
Tim Pawlenty
1,028,568
46.4%
Mike Hatch
1,007,460
45.4%
Peter Hutchinson
141,735
6.4%
Ken Pentel
10,800
0.5%
2,217,818
[186]


References


^ Baenen, Jeff. "Minnesota Pronunciation Guide". Associated Press in Minnesota. Retrieved July 4, 2011. 
^ Streitfeld, Rachel (August 12, 2012). "Ryan's clandestine journey to Romney's ticket went from 'surreal to real'". CNN. Retrieved 2012-08-15. 
^ Knox, Olivier (September 20, 2012). "Pawlenty quits as Romney campaign co-chair". Yahoo! News. 
^ a b Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Tim Pawlenty". wargs.com. 
^ a b c Davey, Monica (August 7, 2008). "Pawlenty Looks to National Stage". The New York Times. Retrieved June 1, 2011. 
^ a b c d "Campaign 2002: Governor Tim Pawlenty". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Jim Walsh (January 28, 2004). "Grant Hart recalls his old classmate, Tim Pawlenty". City Pages. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Sharpiro, Walter. "The Tragedy of Tim Pawlenty: He did everything right. And that was the problem". The New Republic. Retrieved July 26, 2011. 
^ Political Science Dept of College of Liberal Arts (July 5, 2008). "PoliSci Alumni". University of Minnesota. 
^ "Empowered with a New Degree, Class of '08 Sets Forth – 120th Commencement Ceremony". University of Minnesota Law School. February 11, 2008. 
^ Melo, Frederick (January 5, 2007). "Mary Pawlenty leaves bench—First Lady will be top counsel for mediation firm". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ "Pawlenty Biography". 2012 Republican Candidates: Comparing the 2012 Republican Candidates. Retrieved July 26, 2011. 
^ "Main page". Wizmo. 
^ a b Tom Squitieri (November 7, 2002). "His plans changed, but message didn't". USA TODAY. 
^ "What's next for Tim Pawlenty?". MinnPost. September 8, 2008. Retrieved September 10, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (July 16, 2003). "DFLer slams "Grunseth groupies"". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ State Senator Sandra L. Pappas (July 21, 2003). "Legislators Call for Full and Complete Disclosure from Governor Pawlenty" (Press release). MN State Legislature press release (via Internet Archive). Archived from the original on September 19, 2004. 
^ a b Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1992. p. 146. 
^ Sherman, Amy (October 16, 1998). "38B candidates' ideas differ on surplus, education; incumbent faces unusual challenge". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ "Legislators Past and Present". Minnesota Legislative Reference Library. Retrieved August 23, 2007. 
^ Laura McCallum (June 12, 2002). "Campaign 2002 profile: Brian Sullivan". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Smith, Dane (April 19, 2001). "Cheney advises Pawlenty not to run for Senate; Majority leader bows to request from White House". Star Tribune. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (September 13, 2002). "Tim Pawlenty". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ a b c Grant, Ashley; Associated Press (November 6, 2002). "Pawlenty elected Minnesota governor—Republican breaks out of three-way race". Grand Forks Herald. p. A-05. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ Coleman, Toni et al. (January 5, 2003). "Your guide to the 2003 legislature: issues to watch". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A8. CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
"Major Minnesota issues". Grand Forks Herald. Associated Press. January 5, 2003. p. A-07. 
^ a b Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2002. pp. 322–325. 
^ Hohmann, James. "Once a goalie, Tim Pawlenty plays offense". Politico. Capitol News. Retrieved April 20, 2011. 
^ Laura McCallum (June 2, 2006). "Pawlenty accepts Republican endorsement for re-election". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Laura McCallum (November 8, 2006). "Hatch concedes; Pawlenty barely wins re-election". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Britt Robson (January 19, 2005). "Minnesota Eats Itself Another Pawlenty budget, another round of bloodletting". City Pages. Retrieved August 31, 2008. 
^ "Historical expenditures: General fund and all funds" (PDF). Minnesota Management and Budget Department. March 2011. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty said he brought Minnesota state spending growth down 'to about 1.7 percent per year.'". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. April 1, 2011. 
^ a b "PoliGraph: Pawlenty spending claim lacks context". MPR News. Minnesota Public Radio. January 27, 2011. 
^ Sharpiro, Walter. "The Tragedy of TIm Pawlenty: He Did Everything Right. And That's The Problem". The New Republic. Retrieved July 27, 2011. 
^ a b Salisbury, Bill (June 1, 2003). "Pawlenty wins, but risks attached – his no-new-taxes pledge may become a liability later". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ a b Scheck, Tom (September 24, 2009). "Pawlenty downplaying budget deficit predictions". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 24, 2009. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty said in 2009, 'we cut state spending in real terms for the first time in 150 years'". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. April 12, 2011. 
^ AEI said "billion", an error see original: Carlson, Arne (May 23, 2011). "The Presidency: A Bit Short Is Pawlenty". Blogspot. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Ornstein, Norman J. (May 25, 2011). "GOP Presidential Candidates Affect Agenda". American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy Research. Retrieved May 25, 2011. 
^ Wyler, Grace (May 23, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty Launches Campaign As The GOP Default Candidate". Business Insider. Retrieved May 25, 2011. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (May 23, 2011). "George's Bottom Line". ABC News. Retrieved June 9, 2011. 
^ Black, Eric (May 5, 2010). "Supreme Court overrules Pawlenty on unallotments". MinnPost. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Scheck, Tom (October 29, 2009). "Lawsuit challenges Pawlenty's budget cuts". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved October 30, 2009. 
^ Grow, Doug (December 31, 2009). "Unallotment ruling may have turned Minnesota's recent political gridlock into new political chaos". MinnPost. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ David Lillehaug and Mike McIntee (December 30, 2009). Atty David Lillehaug: Court ruling huge political setback for Gov. Pawlenty. The UpTake via MinnPost. Event occurs at 1:22. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ McIntee, Mike (December 31, 2009). Pawlenty To Appeal Unallotment Ruling. The UpTake via Twin Cities Daily Planet. Event occurs at 1:30. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ Shaw, Charley (February 9, 2010). "Pawlenty in appellate brief says he legally unalloted the budget". Politics in Minnesota. Retrieved February 9, 2010. 
^ Helgeson, Baird (February 9, 2010). "Pawlenty defends budget cuts". Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Scheck, Tom (March 15, 2010). "State's budget in hands of Supreme Court". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved March 15, 2010. 
^ Magnuson, Eric J. (May 5, 2010). "State of Minnesota in Supreme Court: A10-64" (PDF). Minnesota Judicial Branch. Archived from the original (PDF) on May 5, 2010. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Kimball, Joe (May 5, 2010). "Pawlenty responds to ruling on unallotment, urges Legislature to back his cuts". MinnPost. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (May 12, 2010). "Budget clock is ticking at the Capitol—After veto, talks deadlock and DFL calls on Pawlenty to take the lead". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Sturdevant, Lori (May 23, 2010). "Now on the trail, loaded with legislative baggage—Kelliher bears the weight of her position, while Emmer's burdens are largely of his own making". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Michael Khoo (February 5, 2004). "Pawlenty's speech puts focus on gambling". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ T.W. Budig (April 3, 2003). "Canterbury racino legislation advances in House; Pawlenty cool to more gambling". ECM Capitol Roundup. Archived from the original on May 10, 2003. 
^ Becky Glander (February 5, 2005). "Some angered at racino proposal". University Chronicle. Archived from the original on March 1, 2009. 
^ Andrew Tellijohn (March 7, 2003). "Canterbury chasing jackpot with 'racino'". Minneapolis / St. Paul Business Journal. 
^ "Indian Country is in the midst of political awakening". October 11, 2004. Retrieved December 3, 2007. 
^ Michael Khoo (May 17, 2005). "Casino issue is dying, if not dead, at Capitol". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Native American casinos". Indianz. May 23, 2005. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ "Pawlenty's talks on Twins stadium yield no action". Associated Press/MPR. January 11, 2006. 
^ Twins ballpark: What's next?. May 26, 2006. 
^ "Votetracker Minnesota Twins stadium". Minnesota Public Radio. 2006. 
^ Tom Scheck; Brandt Williams (May 22, 2006). "Twins' stadium opponents were tired of the fight; supporters weren't". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Brandt Williams (April 25, 2005). "Pohlad: Contribution to Twins ballpark 'fair, substantial'". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Legislature passes $1 billion public works bill". St. Paul Pioneer Press. June 2006. Archived from the original on March 12, 2007. Retrieved June 26, 2006. 
^ Montopoli, Brian (March 25, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty: I shut down Sharia loan program". CBS News. 
^ "Is There a Double Standard in Tim Pawlenty's Disavowal of Sharia-Compliant Mortgages?". TIME. March 25, 2011. 
^ "Mark Dayton says Gov. Tim Pawlenty cut education spending". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. July 29, 2010. 
^ a b c "2012 Presidential White Paper #2: Former Minnesota Governor Tim Pawlenty" (PDF). Club for Growth. May 24, 2011. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (December 22, 2010). "'Binge buster'—In two terms as governor, Tim Pawlenty put the brakes on state spending and set Minnesota on a path to fiscal austerity. But critics say he simply kicked budget problems down the road.". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Laura McCallum (October 31, 2003). "Social studies standards face more heat". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (December 19, 2003). "Yecke unveils second try at social studies, science standards". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Sara Evans and Lisa Norling (November 2004). "What Happened in Minnesota?". Organization of American Historians newsletter. Archived from the original on August 3, 2008. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ a b Pugmire, Tim (May 16, 2004). "Yecke blasts Minnesota's political climate for vote to oust her". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ Tim Pugmire (June 27, 2006). "Good grades would mean free college under Pawlenty plan". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Art Hughes (May 7, 2007). "Dream Act dies under threat of Pawlenty veto". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Fitzgerald, John (October 1, 2009). "Schools to Pay Millions to Cover Governor's IOU". Minnesota 2020. Retrieved July 2, 2011. 
^ a b Schumacher, Lawrence (May 3, 2010). "Pawlenty nixes college student credit transfer fix". Twin Cities Daily Planet. Retrieved May 3, 2010. 
^ a b Anderson, G. R. Jr. (February 28, 2008). "One head finally rolls". MinnPost.com. MinnPost. Retrieved February 29, 2008. 
^ Saulny, Susan (February 29, 2008). "Minnesota Transportation Chief Is Out". The New York Times. The New York Times Company. Retrieved February 29, 2008. 
^ "State House approves gas tax hike". KSTP. 2007. Retrieved August 3, 2007. 
^ Jackson, Henry C.; Mark Scolforo (August 4, 2007). "8 Reported Missing in Bridge Collapse". Washington Post. 
^ Laura McCallum (August 3, 2004). "Pawlenty finds money to jumpstart North Star rail line". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ a b Sturdevant, Lori (April 12, 2008). "Working toward the train in vain". Minneapolis Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. [permanent dead link]
^ a b c Yuen, Laura; Tom Scheck (April 7, 2008). "Pawlenty delivers a setback to the Central Corridor project". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ "Coleman: Disappointed By Gov. Vetoing LRT Money". Associated Press. April 10, 2008. Archived from the original on March 1, 2009. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Tom Weber (May 19, 2008). "Central Corridor planning moves forward". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Kaszuba, Mike (April 18, 2008). "Met Council head is in a political bind". www.startribune.com. Archived from the original on April 2, 2015. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Salisbury, Bill. "Vetoes not political? (The Political Animal)". blogs.twincities.com. Archived from the original on April 14, 2008. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Scheck, Tom (April 7, 2008). "MPR: St. Paul officials: What does Pawlenty have against us?". minnesota.publicradio.org. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Stassen-Berger, Rachel E. (June 26, 2006). "When crime jumps, politicos trade blame: experts say one elected official can't do much to raise—or lower—crime rates". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ a b Hoppin, Jason (February 10, 2010). "Pawlenty: Time to get tougher on sex crimes – Some offenders would get 25 years; others, even more". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ Ludeman, Cal (February 7, 2011). "Details on sex offender program deleted". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on April 2, 2015. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Jim Lehrer (March 22, 2006). "MINNESOTA'S IMMIGRATION DEBATE". Twin Cities Public Broadcasting. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (January 4, 2006). "Illegal immigration a 'real issue': Pawlenty defends crackdown, but not all agree with tactics". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ McCallum, Laura (September 26, 2005). "Pawlenty pumps ethanol". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 6, 2007. 
^ a b Novak, Robert (February 28, 2008). "How Not to Run for Vice President". The Washington Post. The Washington Post Company. Retrieved February 28, 2008. 
^ a b "Pawlenty’s Political Climate Change". Fact-Check.org. 
^ herb, jeremy (August 4, 2011). "Remarks highlight Pawlenty's climate shift". minneapolis star tribune. Retrieved August 10, 2012. 
^ Powell, Joy; Lopez, Patricia (August 22, 2007). "State health commissioner resigns". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on March 2, 2009. Retrieved January 12, 2008. 
^ Tom Scheck (February 16, 2005). "Measuring the success of Canadian drug imports". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 12, 2008. 
^ "The Kaiser Commission on Medicaid and the Uninsured" (PDF). The Henry J. Kaiser Family Foundation. Archived from the original (PDF) on February 4, 2011. Retrieved March 16, 2011. 
^ "Pawlenty uses veto power to cut health care". Mnmed.org. Retrieved October 31, 2010. [permanent dead link]
^ Scheck, Tom (May 15, 2009). "Pawlenty, lawmakers remain at odds over budget issues". Minnesota Public Radio News. Retrieved June 2, 2009. 
^ Williams, Chris (Associated Press) (November 18, 2009). "HCMC approves big cuts in 2010 budget". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved November 19, 2009. 
^ McIntee, Mike (February 9, 2010). "Vets To Feel Governor Pawlenty's GAMC Cuts". The Uptake. Archived from the original on August 6, 2014. Retrieved February 10, 2010. 
^ Marcotty, Josephine & Stassen-Berger, Rachel E. (September 1, 2010). "Pawlenty restricts health money". Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ a b Salisbury, Bill (October 18, 2008). "Governor will lead trade group to Israel". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Ragsdale, Jim; Welbes, John (June 19, 2004). "Fox promises consulate—Mexico president expresses wish to aid countrymen in Minnesota". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ 200 National Guard members to patrol Mexican border | Minnesota Public Radio News
^ Bjorhus, Jennifer (November 14, 2005). "Pawlenty courts Chinese investors – TRADE: Economic ties take a new direction as the Chinese begin looking for places to invest". Duluth News-Tribune. 
^ a b Smith, Dane (January 30, 2007). "Pawlenty plans trade mission to India". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on June 8, 2008. Retrieved January 30, 2007. 
^ Lopez, Patricia (June 22, 2004). "Pawlenty's trade mission—Poland and the Czech Republic: Pawlenty praises Poland's 'bright future'". Star Tribune. 
^ Von Sternberg, Bob (November 13, 2010). "Gov. Tim Pawlenty: Signing off". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on November 20, 2010. 
^ "Initiatives of NGA chairs". National Governors Association. 
^ "Past Chairs". Midwestern Governors Association. Archived from the original on May 1, 2013. 
^ Ambinder, Marc (February 9, 2005). "Conservatives Say Pawlenty Is Potential Presidential Candidate". ABC News. 
^ Will, George F. (February 24, 2008). "The Running Mate McCain Needs". The Washington Post. p. B07. 
^ Martin, Jonathan (February 17, 2008). "Steadfast McCain ally sparks veep talk". Politico. 
^ "Gov. Pawlenty announces re-election bid (feature audio)". MPR News. Minnesota Public Radio. May 31, 2006. 
^ Black, Eric; Tice, D.J. (March 14, 2007). "Pawlenty for veep: Will he or won't he?". Star Tribune. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty Announces re-election campaign (video)". WCCO-TV. May 31, 2006. Archived from the original on February 9, 2013. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ Black, Eric (February 18, 2008). "How did veep talk go so far without Pawlenty's pledge coming up?". MinnPost. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty to co-chair McCain '08 exploratory committee". KARE. Associated Press. January 15, 2007. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Pugmire, Tim (January 9, 2008). "Presidential campaigns raise volume in Minnesota". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved January 10, 2008. 
^ Hopfensperger, Jean (January 7, 2008) [updated February 5, 2008]. "Is Pawlenty's plan for immigration aimed at a VP slot?". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on January 27, 2008. Retrieved July 13, 2008. 
^ "McCain Selects His Running Mate". FOXNews.com. August 28, 2008. Archived from the original on 2008-11-02. Retrieved August 28, 2008. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty: McCain's Vice President?". Huffingtonpost.com. January 8, 2008. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ "McCain taps Alaska Gov. Palin as vice president pick". CNN Politics. CNN. August 29, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty says he never backed bailout in 2008". Politico Live. January 16, 2011. 
^ Ambinder, Marc (February 9, 2005). "Conservatives Say Pawlenty Is Potential Presidential Candidate". ABC News. Retrieved April 3, 2011. 
^ Kendra Marr (December 17, 2010). "Tim Pawlenty's regret: No third term". Politico. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ "Obama easily outpolls Pawlenty, Palin" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. July 10, 2009. Retrieved May 3, 2010. 
^ "Pawlenty rolls out new health care proposals". CNN. October 13, 2009. Retrieved May 25, 2010. 
^ Foster, Daniel (January 27, 2011). "Pence Out, Republican Presidential Field Open". National Review. 
^ Jonathan Martin (October 1, 2009). "Pawlenty preps 2012 campaign team". Politico. Retrieved June 3, 2010. 
^ "Pawlenty in Iowa: Republican party must unite to take power from Democrats | Des Moines Register Staff Blogs". Blogs.desmoinesregister.com. October 27, 2010. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ Peters, Jeremy (January 29, 2011). "Political Blogs Are Ready to Flood Campaign Trail". The New York Times. 
^ Kendra Marr (January 14, 2011). "Pawlenty: No VP thoughts this time". Politico. Retrieved January 14, 2011. 
^ Davenport, Reid (January 18, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty: If I run, it will be for the presidency". The GW Hatchet. The George Washington University. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ a b Weiner, Jay (January 18, 2011). "In campaign-like appearance, Pawlenty shows off 'Courage to Stand' ... and to sit, signing books". MinnPost. Retrieved January 18, 2011. 
^ a b Bryan Fischer and Tim Pawlenty. AFA's Bryan Fischer Interviews Tim Pawlenty. YouTube (Google). Retrieved January 17, 2011. 
^ Exclusive – Tim Pawlenty Extended Interview (Episode #16007). The Daily Show (Comedy Partners). January 12, 2010. Retrieved January 17, 2011. 
^ Duffy, J.P. (December 15, 2010). "FRC, Members of Congress, Governors, and Conservative Leaders Release Open Letter Calling for Civil Debate, End to Character Assassination". Retrieved January 30, 2011. 
^ Pawlenty, Tim (December 13, 2010). "Government Unions vs. Taxpayers". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Marr, Kendra (March 21, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty forms 2012 presidential exploratory committee". Politico. Retrieved March 21, 2011. 
^ Camia, Catalina (March 21, 2011). "Pawlenty launches committee to explore White House bid". USA Today. Retrieved March 21, 2011. 
^ Aliyah Shahid (April 13, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty to CNN's Piers Morgan: 'I'm running for President,' spokesman walks it back". Daily News (New York). Retrieved January 13, 2012.  and in context Tim Pawlenty Tells Piers Morgan: "I'm Running For President". CNN via PoliticsNewsNews via YouTube (Google). Retrieved April 15, 2011. 
^ "@CNN report of @TimPawlenty on @piersmorgan is out of context. Obviously, Pawlenty has exploratory committee to run for President. Not VP," wrote Alex Conant, his spokesman, in Wallbank, Derek (April 12, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty accidentally confirms the obvious, then walks it back". MinnPost. Retrieved April 15, 2011. 
^ "Real change is about telling hard truths". USA Today. May 23, 2011. 
^ Pawlenty 'betting it all on Iowa' in presidential run. KARE-TV. Multimedia KARE. May 23, 2011. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Tim Pawlenty – A Time for Truth (Preview of Monday's Announcement). YouTube (Google). May 22, 2011. Retrieved May 22, 2011. 
^ Shear, Michael (May 22, 2011). "Pawlenty Announces Candidacy a Day Early". The New York Times. Retrieved May 22, 2011. 
^ Seib, Gerald F. (May 23, 2011). "Is America Ready for President TPaw?". The Wall Street Journal. Dow Jones. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Reinhard, Beth (August 13, 2011). "Bachmann Boom; TPaw Bust?". National Journal. Archived from the original on October 25, 2011. Retrieved August 14, 2011. 
^ "PolitiFact: Obamacare was patterned after (Mitt Romney's) plan in Massachusetts". August 12, 2011. Retrieved August 9, 2012. 
^ Lucy Madison (June 14, 2011). "Will backing off "Obamneycare" in GOP debate hurt Pawlenty's campaign?". CBS News. Retrieved November 2, 2012. 
^ Jens Manuel Krogstad (June 14, 2011). "Pawlenty decision to back off "Obamneycare" criticism questioned". Des Moined Register. Retrieved November 2, 2012. 
^ Bakst, Brian (August 14, 2011). "Ex-Minn. Gov. Tim Pawlenty ends White House bid". The Huffington Post. Associated Press. Retrieved August 14, 2011. 
^ Memoli, Michael (2011-09-12). "Tim Pawlenty backs former rival Mitt Romney for president". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved 2011-09-12. 
^ Parker, Ashley & Barbaro, Michael (July 17, 2012). "Caution, Not Flash, as Romney Seeks His No. 2". New York Times. Retrieved July 18, 2012. 
^ "Mitt Romney loses Tim Pawlenty as campaign co-chair 45 days before election", newsday.com.
^ "Roundtable Management" Archived November 15, 2012, at the Wayback Machine., FSR webpage. Retrieved 2012-11-08.
^ Orol, Ronald D., "Pawlenty: ‘Walls of reality’ closing on Congress", MarketWatch, November 7, 2012. Retrieved 2012-11-08.
^ Art Hughes (November 6, 2002). "Pawlenty sets stage for a Capitol revolution". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Mary Pawlenty leaves bench for new job". Minnesota Public radio. Associated Press. January 4, 2007. 
^ "Minn. First Lady to Join Gilbert Mediation Center". wcco.com. Associated Press. September 2007. Archived from the original on May 18, 2008. 
^ "Tim (Timothy J.) Pawlenty". Minnesota Historical Society. 
^ Lewis, Matt (January 2011). "Tim Pawlenty on Michele Bachmann, Michael Steele . . . and Hockey". Politics Daily. Retrieved May 16, 2011. 
^ Todd, Chuck; Murray, Mark; Montanaro, Domenico (May 23, 2011). "2012: Daniels is out, T-Paw and Cain are in". First Read. MSNBC. Archived from the original on May 28, 2011. 
^ "Who's afraid of Mitt and T-Paw...". Front Row Washington. Reuters. May 20, 2011. 
^ Antle, W. James III (May 23, 2011). "TPaw and TARP, Cont'd". The American Spectator. 
^ a b "Pawlenty: An economic pro or crafty budget setter?". Fox News. Associated Press. May 25, 2011. 
^ "Klobuchar Approval Rating Highest PPP Has Found in Last Year" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. April 16, 2009. 
^ "Palin At The Top – And Bottom – for GOP Voters in 2012 – Rasmussen Reports". Rasmussen Reports. July 7, 2009. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ "SurveyUSA News Poll #16315". SurveyUSA. March 3, 2010. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ "Election 2010: Minnesota Governor". Rasmussen Reports, LLC. October 22, 2010. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ "Pawlenty Begins Race With 41% GOP Name Recognition". Gallup. March 23, 2011. 
^ "Voters tepid toward Obama, but favor him over GOP". Public Policy Polling. March 16, 2011. 
^ "Obama a lock in Minnesota" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. June 6, 2011. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1994. p. 145. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1996. pp. 155–156. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1998. pp. 142–143. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2000. p. 481. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2006. pp. 456–463. 


External links



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Tim Pawlenty.




Biography portal
Minnesota portal
Politics portal




Tim Pawlenty at Minnesota Legislators Past & Present

Profile at Project Vote Smart
Financial information (federal office) at the Federal Election Commission
Appearances on C-SPAN
Campaign contributions at Follow the Money (U.S. House)
Campaign 2002 – Minnesota Governor Minnesota Public Radio
Campaign 2006 – Tim Pawlenty Minnesota Public Radio



Minnesota House of Representatives


Preceded by
Art Seaberg
Member of the Minnesota House of Representatives
from District 38B
1993–2003
Succeeded by
Lynn Wardlow


Preceded by
Ted Winter
Majority Leader of the Minnesota House of Representatives
1999–2003
Succeeded by
Erik Paulsen


Party political offices


Preceded by
Norm Coleman
Republican nominee for Governor of Minnesota
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Emmer


Political offices


Preceded by
Jesse Ventura
Governor of Minnesota
2003–2011
Succeeded by
Mark Dayton


Preceded by
Janet Napolitano
Chair of National Governors Association
2007–2008
Succeeded by
Ed Rendell








v
t
e


Governors of Minnesota



Territorial (1849–58)



Ramsey
Gorman
Medary








State (since 1858)



Sibley
Ramsey
Swift
Miller
Marshall
Austin
Davis
Pillsbury
Hubbard
McGill
Merriam
Nelson
Clough
Lind
Van Sant
Johnson
Eberhart
Hammond
Burnquist
Preus
Christianson
Olson
Petersen
Benson
Stassen
Thye
Youngdahl
E. Anderson
Freeman
Andersen
Rolvaag
LeVander
W. Anderson
Perpich
Quie
Perpich
Carlson
Ventura
Pawlenty
Dayton












v
t
e


Chairs of the National Governors Association






Willson
McGovern
Walsh
Spry
Capper
Harrington
Allen
Sproul
Cox
Trinkle
Brewster
McMullen
Dern
Case
Pollard
Rolph
McNutt
Peery
Cochran
Stark
Vanderbilt
Stassen
O'Conor
Saltonstall
Maw
Martin
Caldwell
Hildreth
Hunt
Lane
Carlson
Lausche
Peterson
Shivers
Thornton
Kennon
Langlie
Stanley
Stratton
Collins
Boggs
McNichols
Powell
Rosellini
Anderson
Sawyer
Reed
Guy
Volpe
Ellington
Love
Hearnes
Moore
Mandel
Evans
Rampton
Ray
Andrus
Askew
Milliken
Carroll
Bowen
Busbee
Snelling
Matheson
J. Thompson
Carlin
Alexander
Clinton
Sununu
Baliles
Branstad
Gardner
Ashcroft
Romer
Campbell
Dean
T. Thompson
Miller
Voinovich
Carper
Leavitt
Glendening
Engler
Patton
Kempthorne
Warner
Huckabee
Napolitano
Pawlenty
Rendell
Douglas
Manchin
Gregoire
Heineman
Markell
Fallin
Hickenlooper
Herbert
McAuliffe
Sandoval












v
t
e


Minnesota House Majority Leaders






W. Dunn
Wilson
Rockne
Rines
Wm. Nolan
Girling
Wi. Norton
McDonough
R. Dunn
Eastvold
R. Dunn
Cina
Dirlam
Lindstrom
Anderson
Knickerbocker
Eken
Sieben
Levi
Vanasek
Wynia
Long
Welle
Anderson
Carruthers
Winter
Pawlenty
Paulsen
Sertich
Dean
Murphy
Peppin















v
t
e


(2008 ←)    United States presidential election, 2012    (→ 2016)






United States elections, 2012
Fundraising
National polls
Statewide polls (pre-2012, early 2012)
Timeline
General election debates
Newspaper endorsements
International reactions
Hurricane Sandy





Democratic Party

Convention
Primaries

Newspaper endorsements





Incumbent nominee: Barack Obama

campaign
endorsements
positions


Incumbent VP nominee: Joe Biden

positions




Challengers: Bob Ely
Keith Judd
Warren Mosler
Darcy Richardson
Jim Rogers
Vermin Supreme
Randall Terry
John Wolfe





Republican Party

Convention
Primaries
Debates

Statewide polls
National polls

Straw polls

Newspaper endorsements





Nominee: Mitt Romney

campaign
endorsements
positions


VP nominee: Paul Ryan

positions




Candidates: Michele Bachmann (campaign)
Herman Cain (campaign)
Jack Fellure
Newt Gingrich (campaign)
Stewart Greenleaf
Jon Huntsman (campaign)
Gary Johnson (campaign)
Fred Karger
Andy Martin
Thaddeus McCotter (campaign)
Jimmy McMillan
Roy Moore
Ron Paul (campaign)
Tim Pawlenty (campaign)
Rick Perry (campaign)
Buddy Roemer (campaign)
Rick Santorum (campaign)





Libertarian Party

Convention
Primaries





Nominee: Gary Johnson

campaign
positions


VP nominee: Jim Gray


Candidates: Jim Duensing
R. J. Harris
Carl Person
Sam Sloan
R. Lee Wrights





Green Party

Convention





Nominee: Jill Stein (campaign)
VP nominee: Cheri Honkala


Candidates: Stewart Alexander
Roseanne Barr
Kent Mesplay










Other third-party and independent candidates



American Independent Party



Nominee Tom Hoefling


Candidates Wiley Drake
Virgil Goode (campaign)
Edward C. Noonan
Laurie Roth





American Third Position Party



Nominee Merlin Miller
VP nominee Virginia Abernethy





America's Party



Nominee Tom Hoefling





Constitution Party

Convention





Nominee Virgil Goode (campaign)
VP nominee Jim Clymer


Candidates Darrell Castle
Laurie Roth
Robby Wells





Freedom Socialist Party



Nominee Stephen Durham





Grassroots Party



Nominee Jim Carlson





Justice Party



Nominee Rocky Anderson
VP nominee Luis J. Rodriguez





Objectivist Party



Nominee Tom Stevens





Party for Socialism and Liberation



Nominee Peta Lindsay





Peace and Freedom Party



Nominee Roseanne Barr
VP nominee Cindy Sheehan


Candidates Stewart Alexander
Rocky Anderson
Stephen Durham
Peta Lindsay





Prohibition Party



Nominee Jack Fellure


Candidates James Hedges





Reform Party



Nominee Andre Barnett


Candidates Laurence Kotlikoff
Darcy Richardson
Buddy Roemer (campaign)
Robert David Steele
Robby Wells





Socialist Equality Party



Nominee Jerry White





Socialist Workers Party



Nominee James Harris





Socialist Party



Nominee Stewart Alexander (campaign)
VP nominee Alejandro Mendoza





Independents



Candidates Lee Abramson
Randy Blythe
Jeff Boss
Robert Burck
Terry Jones
Joe Schriner





Draft movements



Michael Bloomberg (movement)













State results






Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming











Other 2012 elections: House
Senate
Gubernatorial









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 160316458
LCCN: n2010076275
SUDOC: 157114341










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Tim_Pawlenty&oldid=792355660"					
Categories: 1960 births21st-century American politiciansAmerican people of German descentAmerican people of Polish descentBaptists from the United StatesConverts to Baptist denominationsConverts to Baptist denominations from Roman CatholicismGovernors of MinnesotaLiving peopleMembers of the Minnesota House of RepresentativesMinnesota lawyersMinnesota RepublicansPoliticians from Saint Paul, MinnesotaPeople from Eagan, MinnesotaPeople from South St. Paul, MinnesotaRepublican Party state governors of the United StatesUnited States presidential candidates, 2012University of Minnesota Law School alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from July 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from November 2016Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


ČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançaisHornjoserbsceItalianoעבריתNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 26 July 2017, at 01:16.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Tim Pawlenty - Wikipedia




















 







Tim Pawlenty

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Tim Pawlenty








Chair of the National Governors Association


In office
July 23, 2007 – July 14, 2008


Preceded by
Janet Napolitano


Succeeded by
Ed Rendell


39th Governor of Minnesota


In office
January 6, 2003 – January 3, 2011


Lieutenant
Carol Molnau


Preceded by
Jesse Ventura


Succeeded by
Mark Dayton


Majority Leader of the Minnesota House of Representatives


In office
January 3, 1999 – January 3, 2003


Governor
Jesse Ventura


Preceded by
Ted Winter


Succeeded by
Erik Paulsen


Member of the Minnesota House of Representatives
from District 38B


In office
January 3, 1993 – January 3, 2003


Preceded by
Art Seaberg


Succeeded by
Lynn Wardlow





Personal details


Born
Timothy James Pawlenty
(1960-11-27) November 27, 1960 (age 56)
Saint Paul, Minnesota, U.S.


Nationality
American


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Mary Anderson


Children
2


Alma mater
University of Minnesota, Twin Cities (BA, JD)


Signature



Timothy James "Tim" Pawlenty (/pəˈlɛnti/;[1] born November 27, 1960) is president and CEO of Financial Services Roundtable, a Washington, D.C.-based industry advocacy group. He was a Republican politician who served as the 39th Governor of Minnesota (2003–2011). He previously served in the Minnesota House of Representatives (1993–2003), where he was majority leader for two terms. In 2011, he entered the campaign for the Republican presidential nomination and later was a potential vice presidential nominee before serving as co-chair of Mitt Romney's campaign.
Pawlenty was born in Saint Paul, Minnesota, and raised in nearby South St. Paul. He graduated from University of Minnesota with a B.A. in political science and a J.D. His early career included working as a labor law attorney and the vice president of a software as a service company. After settling in the city of Eagan with his wife, Pawlenty was appointed to the city's Planning Commission and was elected to the Eagan City Council at the age of 28. He won a seat as a state representative in 1992, representing District 38B in suburban Dakota County. He was re-elected four times and was voted majority leader by House Republicans in 1998.
After narrowly winning the Republican gubernatorial primary in 2002, Pawlenty won a three-way election for Governor of Minnesota, and was re-elected in 2006 by a margin of less than one percent. His campaign platform focused on balancing the budget without raising taxes. During Pawlenty's governorship, he did not raise income taxes, but did enact targeted increases in sales tax and user fees. His administration advocated for numerous public works projects, including work on the Northstar Commuter Rail Line, and the construction of Target Field, a Major League Baseball stadium in Minneapolis. He signed a bill mandating 20% ethanol in gasoline by 2013. He cut health care costs in an attempt to balance the budget, and borrowed funds from the state's K-12 education and low income programs. He signed an executive order rejecting federal funds related to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act. He also led worldwide trips for business leaders and trade delegations to explore trade opportunities. In the 2007–2008 term, he served as chairman of the National Governors Association.
Pawlenty was rumored to be a contender for both the Republican presidential and vice presidential nominations during the 2008 election, and he officially sought the 2012 Republican presidential nomination from May to August 2011. After withdrawing from that race, he became a finalist to join his party's nominee on the 2012 ticket as its vice presidential candidate.[2] Pawlenty was not selected as Mitt Romney's vice presidential candidate, but served as co-chair of Romney's campaign. In September 2012, he left Romney's campaign to become a Washington lobbyist for financial institutions.[3]



Contents


1 Early life, education, and early career
2 Minnesota House of Representatives
3 Governorship

3.1 Election, 2002
3.2 Reelection, 2006
3.3 State budget

3.3.1 Minnesota Supreme Court case


3.4 Funding projects
3.5 Education
3.6 Transportation
3.7 Crime
3.8 Energy policy and climate change
3.9 Health
3.10 Foreign relations
3.11 Other activities


4 2012 presidential campaign

4.1 Early steps
4.2 Book tour and political positions
4.3 Candidacy


5 Financial Services Roundtable
6 Personal life
7 Public image

7.1 Political views
7.2 Approval ratings
7.3 Electoral history


8 References
9 External links



Early life, education, and early career
Pawlenty was born in Saint Paul, Minnesota, to Eugene Joseph Pawlenty, and his wife, Virginia Frances (née Oldenburg).[4][5] His father, who drove a milk delivery truck, was of Polish descent, while his mother was of German ancestry.[4] His mother died of cancer when he was 16.[6] Pawlenty grew up in South St. Paul,[5] where he played ice hockey on his high school's junior varsity squad.[7]
Intending to become a dentist, Pawlenty enrolled in the University of Minnesota, the only one in his family to go beyond high school.[8] However, he changed his plans and spent the summers of 1980 and 1982 working as an intern at the office of U.S. Senator David Durenberger.[5] In 1983, he graduated with a B.A. in political science.[9] He received a Juris Doctor from the University of Minnesota Law School in 1986.[10] While in law school, he met wife, Mary Anderson, whom he married in 1987.[11]
Pawlenty first worked as a labor law attorney at the firm Rider Bennett (later Rider, Bennett, Egan & Arundel), where he had interned while a law student.[12] He later became vice president of a software as a service company, Wizmo Inc.[13][14]
Having moved to Eagan, Minnesota, a suburb of Minneapolis – Saint Paul, Pawlenty was appointed to the city's Planning Commission by Mayor Vic Ellison.[14][15] One year later, at age 28, he was elected to the City Council.[6]
Pawlenty entered state politics in 1990 as a campaign advisor for Jon Grunseth's losing bid for Minnesota governor.[6] After Pawlenty himself became governor, he appointed Grunseth's ex-wife, Vicky Tigwell, to the board of the Minneapolis−Saint Paul International Airport, an action which became an ethics and accountability issue in 2003.[16][17]
Minnesota House of Representatives
Pawlenty was elected to the Minnesota House of Representatives in 1992, winning 49.1 percent of the vote in District 38B (suburban Dakota County).[18] In the House, he authored bills instituting term limits for committee chairmen, funding for infant parenting classes, minimum sentences for repeat domestic violence offenders, and community notification for sex offenders. In response to a state budget surplus, he advocated for a tax reduction rather than expanded education funding.[19] He was reelected four times and was chosen House Majority Leader when the Republicans became the majority party in the State Legislature in 1998.[20]
Governorship
Election, 2002
Main article: Minnesota gubernatorial election, 2002
In 2002, Pawlenty wanted to run for governor, but party leaders made it clear they favored businessman Brian Sullivan.[6][21] Pawlenty then decided on the U.S. Senate, but he abandoned those plans when Vice President Dick Cheney asked him to step aside and allow former St. Paul mayor Norm Coleman to challenge Senator Paul Wellstone without Republican primary opposition.[22] Pawlenty returned to his original ambition and won a hard-fought and narrow victory over Sullivan in the Republican party primary election.[23]
In the general election, Pawlenty faced two strong opponents. His main rival was veteran Democratic–Farmer–Labor (DFL) state senator Roger Moe. Former Democratic Congressman Tim Penny ran on the Independence Party ticket (Governor Jesse Ventura, a member of the Independence Party, chose not to seek reelection). Until mid-October 2002, all three were essentially tied in the polls.[24] Pawlenty's major campaign stances included: a pledge not to raise taxes to balance the state's budget deficit (while allowing for increases in license and user fees);[24] that visa expiration dates be required to be printed on driver's licenses; that women seeking an abortion be required to wait at least 24 hours; enactment of a concealed carry gun law; and reform of the state's education requirements.[25] Pawlenty won the election with 43.8 percent of the vote.[26] His largest gains after the October three-way tie were reportedly among voters in the suburbs of Minneapolis–St. Paul.[24]
Reelection, 2006
Main article: Minnesota gubernatorial election, 2006
Governor Pawlenty ran for re-election in 2006.[27] He espoused conservative stands on issues. But conservatives criticized him on funding issues, in particular two pieces of legislation for stadiums for the Gophers and Minnesota Twins, and bond issues for public transit, including the Northstar commuter rail line.[28]
The 2006 gubernatorial race included Minnesota Attorney General Mike Hatch, of the DFL; Peter Hutchinson of the Independence Party; and Ken Pentel of the Green Party. Pawlenty won, defeating Hatch by a margin of less than one percent, though both the state House and Senate gained DFL majority.[29]
State budget
Pawlenty was elected in 2002 on a platform of balancing the state's budget without raising taxes. He emphasized his campaign and first term with the Taxpayers League of Minnesota slogan "no new taxes."[30] His governorship was characterized by a historically low rate of spending growth. According to the Minnesota Management and Budget Department, general-fund expenditures from 2004 to 2011 increased an average of 3.5 percent per two-year term, compared to an average of 21.1 percent from 1960 to 2003 (these numbers, however, are not inflation-adjusted).[31][32][33] University of Minnesota political science professor Larry Jacobs said that slowing down state spending and opposing tax increases were the "signature issue" of Pawlenty's governorship.[34]
In his first year as governor, Pawlenty inherited a projected two-year budget deficit of $4.3 billion, the largest in Minnesota's history.[35] After a contentious budget session with a Democrat-controlled Senate, he signed a package of fee increases, spending reductions, and government reorganization which eliminated the deficit. The budget reduced the rate of funding increases for state services, including transportation, social services, and welfare. It also enacted a perennial proposal to restructure city aid based on immediate need, rather than historical factors. In negotiations the governor agreed to several compromises, abandoning a desired public employee wage freeze and property tax restrictions.[35]
During his second term, Pawlenty erased a $2.7-billion deficit by cutting spending, shifting payments, and using one-time federal stimulus money.[36] His final budget (2010–2011) was the state's first two-year period since 1960 in which net government expenditures decreased. Pawlenty has claimed this as "the first time in 150 years" that spending has been cut, but fact-checkers have disputed this claim as no public budget records prior to 1960 are known to exist.[33][37]
Pawlenty has been criticized by some for providing a short-term budget solution but coming up short in his long-term strategy as governor. The state department of Management and Budget reports that the two-year budget starting in July 2011 is projected to come up $4.4 billion short.[36] Former Minnesota Governor Arne Carlson, a Republican, criticized Pawlenty's budget strategy: he borrowed more than $1 billion from the tobacco settlement (money set aside for health care), borrowed more than $1.4 billion from K-12 education funding, borrowed more than $400 [million][38] from the Health Care Access Fund for low-income families, among other short-term shifts in accounting. The result was a $5-billion deficit, the seventh largest in the United States.[39] Minnesota property taxes rose $2.5 billion, more than the previous 16 years combined, and Moody's lowered the state's bond rating.[40] Carlson told Time, "I don't think any governor has left behind a worse financial mess than he [Pawlenty] has." Pawlenty responded, "My friend governor Arne Carlson is, of course, now an Obama and John Kerry supporter."[41]
Minnesota Supreme Court case




Minnesota Supreme Court chamber at the Minnesota State Capitol


While Pawlenty said he was "confident" in his right to use unallotment, the Minnesota Supreme Court ultimately decided against him, voting 4 to 3 in a decision in May 2010.[42] His budget had been the subject of a lawsuit in Ramsey County District Court, which was decided against him. Judge Kathleen Gearin decided Pawlenty exceeded his constitutional authority in making unilateral spending cuts to a $5.3-million special dietary program that he had unalloted.[43][44] Attorney David Lillehaug said initially, "This is, I don't think it's understating this to say, this is one of the most important court cases in Minnesota legal history."[45] Pawlenty announced the following day that he would appeal;[46] he filed his defense in February,[47] and arguments were heard on March 15.[48][49] In May, the Supreme Court affirmed Judge Gearin, deciding that "Because the legislative and executive branches never enacted a balanced budget for the 2010–2011 biennium, use of the unallotment power to address the unresolved deficit exceeded the authority granted to the executive branch by the statute".[50] Pawlenty responded:[51]

I will fight to reduce spending and taxes in Minnesota and that battle continues. My commitment to the people of Minnesota remains the same: we will balance the budget without raising taxes.

After the court ruling, as the 2010 legislative session drew to a close, Pawlenty vetoed a budget which would fix a $2.9-billion deficit by adding a new tax bracket for six-figure incomes. In response to the proposal, he criticized Democrats for attempting to raise taxes in the midst of an extremely difficult economic situation.[52] Eventually, due in part to the efforts of House Speaker Margaret Kelliher, who was running for the 2010 Democratic nomination for governor of Minnesota, the General Assembly passed legislation approving nearly all the original unallotments.[53]
Funding projects
Since the Minnesota Constitution prohibits state-run gambling outside of Native territory, Pawlenty proposed negotiating with Minnesota's 11 tribes over profit-sharing of their casinos.[54] Legislators also pushed a proposal to turn Canterbury Park horse track into a racino.[55] The plan was poorly received by Northern Tribes who would operate part of the racino, citing reluctance to compete with other tribes.[56] Tribes with casinos opposed the expanded gambling and some legislators objected on moral grounds that the state shouldn't exploit problem gamblers. Politicians in heavy tribal areas feared losing campaign-finance sources if they supported the plan.[57][58] Delays by the Legislature ended with the bill being pulled from committee.[59] Tribes had spent millions lobbying legislatures in 2004.[60]
Pawlenty worked throughout 2006 to fund a Minnesota Twins baseball stadium in Minneapolis.[61] The resulting Minnesota Twins-Hennepin County ballpark bill called for an increased county sales tax which passed the state legislature and was symbolically signed in at the Hubert H. Humphrey Metrodome.[62][63] The majority of Hennepin County commissioners did not feel a referendum was necessary to approve the sales tax because of the delay it would cause. Pawlenty and the Legislature agreed, citing 10 years already of the project's debate, and exempted the county from state law requiring one in the bill.[64][65]
In June 2006, Pawlenty signed a $999.9-million public works bill that included funding for additional work on the Northstar Commuter rail line (a change in position from reservations about the idea he initially expressed), an expanded Faribault prison, a bioscience building at the University of Minnesota, and science facilities at Minnesota State University in Mankato. The bill also funded a $26-million expansion of the University of Minnesota's Carlson School of Management.[66]
In 2011, Pawlenty shut down an Islamic finance program, that was part of a larger program to increase home ownership in Minnesota, and his spokesperson said that the program accommodated the Muslim ban on interest.[67] Adam Sorensen from TIME questioned whether this was a case of double standards, pointing out New York's kosher food regulations, Blue Laws that prohibit alcohol sales on Sundays, and Pawlenty's own creation of "The Governor's Council On Faith-Based And Community Initiatives".[68]
Education
In the budget process, Pawlenty made an effort to preserve education funding while cutting other government spending. In 2009, he bolstered education funding using federal stimulus grants. Despite this, education funding fell from $9,700 to $8,400 per student (adjusted for inflation) during his tenure.[69] Pawlenty was an advocate for charter schools and was praised by the National Alliance for Public Charter Schools for his education policies. In 2010, the organization rated Minnesota #1 in the country for charter school promotion.[70]
Pawlenty oversaw the repeal of the Profile of Learning Kindergarten through 12th grade graduation requirements and sought to reinstate them during his governorship.[71] Renamed the Minnesota Academic Standards, they were guided by Department of Education commissioner Cheri Pierson Yecke. The bill's first draft raised several concerns by the education review boards including the amount of content, age-appropriateness, and a European-centric view of the social sciences portion.[72] Yecke revised and expanded material based on the response.[73] Even as both Legislative houses passed the Academic Standards bill, her confirmation as commissioner was rejected by the DFL majority Minnesota Senate.[74] She was seen as an outsider coming from Virginia and became unpopular for having pushed the academic reforms during a tight budget session as well as her critical look of Minnesota schools.[75] In her confirmation hearing, DFLers also noted concern over her conservative viewpoints.[75]
In June 2006, Pawlenty proposed the ACHIEVE program for the top 25% of high school graduates.[76] The program would pay for tuition for the first 2 years (4 years for selected fields such as science, technology, engineering and math) and would cost the state an estimated $112 million per 2-year cycle. However the program was not included in the 2007 higher education bill.[77]
Pawlenty used an accounting change called a tax shift to balance the state deficit without raising taxes. School districts statewide may unexpectedly lose $58 million in interest and reserve revenue.[78]
In 2010, Pawlenty vetoed a bill (HF 3164), which the legislature had passed 110 to 20, calling for Minnesota State Colleges & Universities (MnSCU) to revamp its credit transferring system within five years to fix "minimal loss of credits for transferring students" who had been losing between 10 and 30 percent of their credits.[79] Pawlenty found it "unnecessary" because MnSCU was fixing its system already "through internal actions and policy changes".[79]
Transportation




U.S. Representative Keith Ellison speaking at the site of the I-35W Mississippi River Bridge collapse in Minneapolis. He is flanked by Governor Pawlenty on the picture's left. To right: Mayor R. T. Rybak, Secretary of Transportation Mary Peters behind Ellison, Betty McCollum, and Senator Norm Coleman


During Pawlenty's first term, urban traffic congestion was a significant concern of voters. He appointed his lieutenant governor, Carol Molnau, as transportation commissioner, for which she was approved by the legislature in May 2004.[80] Molnau attempted to reform the transportation department, (Mn/DOT), using concepts such as "design-build". Legislators criticized Molnau's performance as transportation commissioner, citing ineffective leadership and management, and removed her from that role in February 2008, a decision Pawlenty said was motivated by partisanship.[80][81]
Pawlenty favored raising fees and imposing toll lanes on roads as the primary means of discouraging excessive traffic. During his term, the carpool lanes of Interstate 394 leading into downtown Minneapolis were converted into high-occupancy toll lanes. Pawlenty used or threatened vetoes in 2005, 2007 and 2008 on legislation funding proposed highway expansion, infrastructure repairs, road maintenance, and mass transit.[82] The 2008 veto was in spite of Pawlenty's announcement that he would consider reversing his opposition to a state gas-tax increase for funding road and bridge repairs, in the wake of the collapse of the I-35W Mississippi River bridge.[83]
Pawlenty had opposed the Northstar Commuter Rail as a legislator, but changed his position in 2004, announcing a funding plan to jump-start the project, when the Bush administration determined the rail line was deemed cost-effective and time-saving for commuters.[84]
In April 2008 during the budget bonding bill signing, Pawlenty used his line-item veto on $70 million pledged toward the building of the Central Corridor light-rail project, intended to connect Minneapolis and Saint Paul. In vetoing the expenditure, Pawlenty did not consult Peter Bell, head of the Metro Council and project leader.[85] Pawlenty stated that he vetoed the bill in order to send a message to the Legislature, which had exceeded his initial budget request, that they needed to "stay focused, be fiscally disciplined, set priorities and solve this budget crisis in a fiscally disciplined way."[86] Pawlenty however was supportive of the project and had requested the money in the bonding bill he submitted to the Minnesota State Legislature.[86] The veto disappointed some of Minnesota's congressional representatives in Washington, including Minnesota's Republican Senator Norm Coleman, who pledged to "raise my voice as strong as I can, as loud as I can. The federal commitment is there."[87] Though Pawlenty's veto might have delayed the ability of the state to receive federal matching funds for the project, Bell said the project was not derailed.[85] The Central Corridor funding issue was resolved on May 19, 2008, with the state pledging its original amount towards the project after legislators compromised with Pawlenty's budget requests.[88]
There were Republican state legislators who supported other cuts of the bonding bill, including Doug Magnus, the ranking Republican on the House Transportation Finance Division, who praised Pawlenty's "fiscal responsibility."[89] Critics, including Chris Coleman, Mayor of Saint Paul, called Pawlenty's veto "political gamesmanship," seeing the move as retribution for the Legislature's successful override of Pawlenty's veto of a transportation bonding bill.[86] They noted cuts overwhelmingly targeted Democratic districts, and Democratic stronghold Saint Paul most heavily.[90][91]
Crime
Crime in Minnesota was a high-profile political issue during Pawlenty's governorship. When crime rates in Minneapolis spiked 16 percent from 2004 to 2005, city officials blamed Pawlenty for large cuts to state aid, which they said restricted public safety resources. Pawlenty in turn criticized the capital city for poorly allocating its funding.[92]
Pawlenty made two large efforts to expand penalties for sexual offenders. In response to his first proposal in 2005, the state legislature passed a large package of sentencing reforms. One new instrument was the possibility of a life sentence without parole for serious offenders, although Pawlenty expressed disapproval at the courts' reluctance to use this option: only seven individuals received such a sentence in the first two years of implementation.[93] Pawlenty made a push for even harsher sentences in 2010, which increased the presumptive sentence for first-degree sex offenses from 12 years to 25 years and increased it further for repeat offenders. At the same time he advocated for a $90-million expansion of the state's civil commitment program for sexual offenders, maintaining that the increased criminal sentences would keep the commitment program's cost under control.[93] According to a single report in the Star Tribune, "A report on Minnesota's sex-offender program delivered to legislators in the final days of the Pawlenty administration was heavily edited by a top political appointee to reflect the former governor's skepticism about the effectiveness of treatment and to delete arguments for expanded community resources for offenders."[94]
Early in 2006, after issuing a study that estimated the cost of illegal immigration to the state as approximately $188 million, Pawlenty announced a program for changing the way the state dealt with persons who were in the United States illegally. Pawlenty said that the economic benefits of illegal immigration did not justify the illegal behavior.[95] Pawlenty's extensive proposal included the designation of 10 state law enforcement officials as the Minnesota Illegal Immigration Enforcement Team, "trained to question, detain and arrest suspected illegal immigrants" with a focus on "such crimes as human trafficking, identity theft, methamphetamine distribution and terrorism." He rounded out his proposal with tougher penalties for false identification, and instituting a fine of up to $5,000 for employers of illegal immigrants. His proposal was challenged by DFL senators who preferred increased legal immigration to punitive action.[96]
Energy policy and climate change




A United States Postal Service vehicle advertising its use of E85 fuel during the Saint Paul Winter Carnival parade in January 2007.


Minnesota has mandated a 10% mixture of gasoline and ethanol (gasohol) since 1997. Pawlenty signed into law in May 2005 a bill that will raise the minimum mandated mixture to 20% in 2013. Pawlenty has also lobbied the Governors' Ethanol Coalition to mandate higher ethanol use nationwide.[97]
Conservative Republican governors were not supportive of Pawlenty's presentation on clean energy to the governor's association, which he gave in cooperation with Ed Rendell, who was the governor of Pennsylvania and the National Governors Association's Democratic vice-chairman. With Kathleen Sebelius of Kansas, Pawlenty was co-chairman of the association's energy committee. The effort received "adamant opposition" from governors of petroleum (oil) producing states.[98]
In 2007, Governor Pawlenty signed the Next Generation Energy Act of 2007 into law and, along with six other Midwestern governors, the Midwestern Greenhouse Gas Accord. These directed state agencies to develop a plan to reduce greenhouse gases, and "develop a market-based and multi-sector cap-and-trade mechanism".[99] However, by 2009 Pawlenty had reversed his position and called cap-and-trade "overly bureaucratic" and a potential "disaster".[99] By 2011, Pawlenty's position had changed sufficiently to state "the weight of the evidence is that most of it, maybe all of it, is because of natural causes."[100]
Health
In 2004, Minnesota's Star Tribune newspaper opined that the credibility of Pawlenty's commissioner of health, Dianne Mandernach, suffered when a website posting by the department suggested that abortion might have a role in breast cancer. She also angered many when it was learned she had delayed releasing government research on cancer in miners. In 2007, Mandernach resigned.[101]
In 2005, Pawlenty asked a U.S. Senate subcommittee to allow his MinnesotaCare health plan to expand and continue allowing state residents and employees to import cheaper Canadian prescription drugs.[102]
In 2007, Pawlenty signed into law the 2007 Omnibus Health and Human Services Appropriations Bill, which provided funding for the Health Care Transformation Task Force, a panel of health care experts charged with exploring ways to reduce health care spending, improve quality, and ensure that Minnesota develops a universal health care plan by 2011.[103]
Later in his tenure he used health care funding cuts as a mechanism to balance the state budget. After years of assuring doctors that the state "sick tax" would be used only to fund health welfare programs, in 2009 Pawlenty recommended a 3% cut in physician reimbursements from the state and asked that the sick tax be put instead into the state's general budget.[104] Pawlenty used a line-item veto to remove $381 million from health and human services funding, a removal which could lead to 35,000 Minnesotans' losing their General Assistance Medical Care (GAMC) health insurance in 2011.[105] Hennepin County Medical Center—the largest provider of health care to Minnesota's poor and uninsured—closed two clinics, reduced its staff and reduced access to non-emergency services.[106] State Senator Linda Berglin wrote a bill that would extend GAMC funding.[107]
In 2010, he refused federal health care funds including more than $1 billion to expand the number of Minnesotans covered by Medicaid, $68 million for a high-risk insurance pool, $1 million to help set up an insurance exchange where consumers could shop for health coverage, and $850,000 for teenage pregnancy prevention. Pawlenty accepted a $500,000 abstinence-only sex-education grant that would require $350,000 in matching state money. Pawlenty said, "It doesn't say we have to apply for all of them."[108]
Foreign relations




Tim Pawlenty meeting Minnesota National Guard troops in Kosovo (April 12, 2008)


Pawlenty's first term coincided with the deployment of National Guardsmen from numerous states, connected with the War on Terror and the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan. During his two terms Pawlenty made trips to Iraq, Afghanistan, Bosnia, Kosovo, and Kuwait visiting Minnesota troops.[109]
Pawlenty was visited in 2004 by Mexican President Vicente Fox in talks to strengthen trade. Fox announced that his country would open a consulate in Minnesota the next year, removing the need for Mexican residents in the state to travel out of state for identification papers and other materials.[110] In mid-2006, in response to illegal immigration, Pawlenty sent Minnesota National Guardsmen to the U.S.–Mexico border at the request of the U.S. Department of Defense and the U.S. Department of Homeland Security.[111]
Pawlenty took a delegation of nearly 200 Minnesotan business, government, academic and civic leaders on a weeklong trip to China in mid-November 2005. The stated objectives were to provide a forum for companies to acquire market information, assess market potential, evaluate market entry strategies and identify potential business partners, as well as to promote Chinese investment in Minnesota.[112] Pawlenty also led Minnesota trade delegations to Canada in 2003,[113] Poland and the Czech Republic in 2004,[114] India in 2007,[113] and Israel in 2008.[109]
Other activities
Throughout his eight-year tenure, Pawlenty hosted a weekly one-hour radio show on WCCO-AM, a tradition he inherited from his predecessor as governor, Jesse Ventura.[115] Pawlenty was the chairman of the National Governors Association for the 2007–2008 term.[116] He also served as Chair of the Midwestern Governors Association in 2006.[117]
Beginning in 2005, Pawlenty was rumored in the press as a potential candidate for president of the United States.[118][119][120] When formally announcing his candidacy for a second term as Governor of Minnesota on May 31, 2006, Pawlenty said, "As to my future, if I run for governor and win, I will serve out my term for four years as governor."[121][122][123] On January 15, 2007, after being reelected, Pawlenty said, "I am committed to serving out my term as governor. That's what I am going to do."[124]
In 2007, it was announced that Pawlenty would be serving in a lead role for McCain as a national co-chair of his presidential exploratory committee[125] which led to Pawlenty's becoming co-chairman of McCain's campaign (along with Phil Gramm and Tom Loeffler).[126] In January 2008, a reporter for the Minneapolis Star Tribune suggested Pawlenty's renewed focus on his proposed immigration reform plans might be politically motivated as counterbalance to McCain's less favorable guest worker program.[127]
For many weeks, Pawlenty was widely considered to be a leading candidate for the vice-presidential nomination on the Republican ticket with John McCain in the 2008 presidential election.[128][129] In a surprise, McCain chose Alaska Governor Sarah Palin.[130]
In 2008, Pawlenty expressed support for the Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP). But in 2010 Pawlenty claimed that he had made those statements solely as a surrogate for presidential nominee McCain and never actually supported the idea himself.[131] On May 23, 2011, Pawlenty formally announced he'd run for the Republican presidential nomination, saying, “politicians are often afraid that if they're too honest, they might lose an election. I'm afraid that in 2012, if we're not honest enough, we may lose our country.”
2012 presidential campaign
Main article: Tim Pawlenty presidential campaign, 2012
Early steps
In February 2005, ABC News identified him as a potential candidate for president.[132] Pawlenty decided not to seek a third term as governor, and so was not a candidate in the November 2010 gubernatorial election.[133] In July 2009, Public Policy Polling conducted a poll that showed that President Obama was favored to win against Pawlenty in his home state of Minnesota by more than 10 points.[134] In October 2009, a CNN article suggested that Pawlenty was contemplating a 2012 White House bid.[135] Among those advising him in preparation for a potential presidential run was lobbyist and former Congressman Vin Weber.[136]
In late 2009, Pawlenty began taking steps that many saw as leading to a 2012 presidential bid.[137] He visited Iowa in November 2009 and April 2010, making political speeches.[138] In January 2011, the New York Times reported that "Few Americans, in fact, even know his name."[139] In January 2011, Pawlenty told the College Republicans group at The George Washington University "If I decide to run it would be for president, not vice president."[140][141]
Book tour and political positions




Pawlenty at a book signing in February 2011 in Phoenix, Arizona.


Pawlenty went on tour for his book Courage to Stand, and as of January 18, his book had reached #1,979 on Amazon.com's list of bestsellers.[142] Pawlenty calls himself a social conservative.[143] In his extended interview with Jon Stewart on The Daily Show, he said he thinks United States Social Security and Medicare need to be cut to balance the federal budget.[144] Pawlenty believes that state governments should outlaw abortion, except for cases of rape, incest, and to save a woman's life. He thinks the United States Supreme Court decided Roe v. Wade wrongly, abortion being a state, not a federal, matter. He opposes same-sex marriage and civil unions, and said on talk radio "... I have been a public supporter of maintaining Don't ask, don't tell and I would support reinstating it as well".[143]
In December 2010, Pawlenty was one of three U.S. governors who publicly declared solidarity with the Christian-right group Family Research Council.[145]
Pawlenty's tour was in Minneapolis, San Francisco and Dallas, and it ended January in Iowa where the Iowa Caucuses were scheduled for February 6, 2012. "That will come up fast," he said, "if I do run." In Minneapolis, speaking to Pat Kessler of WCCO-TV who asked about his feelings regarding a potential run for president by Representative Michele Bachmann, "I have a lot of respect for Michele Bachmann … Whether she runs or not, it's gonna be a big field. There's gonna be five, six, seven, eight people running … Whoever wants to run can run. The more, the merrier."[142]
In a December 2010 column in The Wall Street Journal, Pawlenty argued in favor of the historical benefits of "private sector" labor unions and strongly against "public sector" labor unions, whose collective bargaining rights he would like to see curbed: "The rise of the labor movement in the early 20th century was a triumph for America's working class. In an era of deep economic anxiety, unions stood up for hard-working but vulnerable families, protecting them from physical and economic exploitation." He also criticized modern unions: "The moral case for unions—protecting working families from exploitation—does not apply to public employment... Unionized public employees are making more money, receiving more generous benefits, and enjoying greater job security than the working families forced to pay for it with ever-higher taxes, deficits and debt."[146]
Candidacy
On March 21, 2011, Pawlenty announced, via Facebook, that he had formed an exploratory committee in preparation for a potential run for the 2012 Republican presidential nomination.[147][148]
On April 12, 2011, Pawlenty said clearly on CNN's Piers Morgan Tonight that he was "running for president" and not for vice president, adding that a formal announcement would be given in several weeks.[149] On Twitter, his spokesman said CNN took his comments out of context.[150]
On May 23, 2011, Pawlenty launched his candidacy for president in a speech in Iowa stating: "I'm going to try something a little unusual in politics. I'm just going to tell the truth."[151][152] A YouTube video[153] appeared a day before.[154] The Wall Street Journal wrote of his candidacy, and the luck he experienced in the GOP's field, that Pawlenty has a "golden chance to become the chief rival to... Mitt Romney".[155]
Pawlenty finished third in the Ames Straw Poll on August 13, 2011,[156] behind the winner Michele Bachmann and the runner-up Ron Paul. Before the Ames debate, he took a more aggressive stance against Romney, including the coining the term "Obamneycare".[157] When pressed by John King during CNN's June 13, 2011 debate to address why he used the word, he backed off.[158] However, he denied that he backed off.[159] The following day he announced his decision to withdraw from the presidential race.[160] On September 12, 2011, Pawlenty announced his endorsement of former Governor Mitt Romney of Massachusetts, as well as his position as national co-chair for Romney's campaign.[161] Romney retired over $400,000 of Pawlenty's campaign debt.[162]
Financial Services Roundtable
On September 20, 2012, Pawlenty's advisor Brian McClung announced to Associated Press that Pawlenty would resign as the co-chairman of Mitt Romney's electoral campaign. He was to head the Financial Services Roundtable (FSR), a financial service industry lobby group in Washington, D.C. He would not be running in the 2014 gubernatorial election in Minnesota nor in the state's 2014 senatorial election.[163] He assumed the positions of President & CEO. He replaced Steve Bartlett, a former U.S. Representative from Texas who had held the positions since 1999.[164]
In November 2012, Pawlenty said that "Republicans and Democrats will have to reconcile their differences on spending and taxes because the 'walls of reality are closing in on them'" relative to the federal government's looming "fiscal cliff". Presenting himself as not from Wall Street or from Washington and, having previously criticized “entrenched financial interests”, he said he could "bring a fresh and new voice to those debates”. He also "refuted assertions that implementation of the Dodd-Frank Act, legislation enacted roughly 27 months [earlier] in response to the financial crisis, ha[d] been delayed because of lobbying".[165]
Personal life




Tim Pawlenty with his wife, Mary


Pawlenty and his wife Mary have two daughters, Anna and Mara. Mary was appointed as a judge of the Dakota County District Court in Hastings, Minnesota, in 1994. After he was elected governor in 2002, the family remained at their Eagan home instead of moving into the Governor's residence because of his wife's requirement to live in her judicial district.[166] In 2007, she left her judicial position to become General Counsel of the National Arbitration Forum, a dispute-resolution company based in Minneapolis.[167] She stayed on only briefly before departing for another dispute-resolution company, the Gilbert Mediation Center.[168]
Pawlenty was raised a Roman Catholic. His conversion to an Evangelical Protestant faith has been attributed to his wife Mary, who is a member of Wooddale Church in Eden Prairie, Minnesota,[169] a member congregation of the Minnesota Baptist Conference. In a January 2011 interview, Mr. Pawlenty stated, "I love and respect and admire the Catholic Church. I still attend Mass once in a while there. The church I now attend is an interdenominational church which has got many former Catholics in it, and so we share the Christian faith and the Bible. I had to reconcile my faith life with my wife so we could have a consistent, integrated family faith life."[170]
Pawlenty frequently uses (and is referred to by) the mononym "TPaw" or "T-Paw".[171][172][173]
Public image
Political views
Pawlenty is generally considered a conservative on the American political spectrum. With regard to his economic record, he has drawn mixed reviews from fiscally conservative interest groups.[174] The lobbying group Taxpayers League of Minnesota gave Pawlenty an average approval score of 80% during his years as a state legislator, while the Cato Institute think-tank gave him scores ranging from C to A across his eight years as governor.[70] In February 2008, Washington Post columnist Robert Novak wrote that Pawlenty was the most conservative Minnesota governor since Governor Theodore Christianson in the 1920s.[98] A 2011 white paper by the Club for Growth, analyzing Pawlenty as a presidential candidate, found his political stance difficult to identify. The group praised him for reduced growth in spending and taxation, but found that he "has some simply inexcusable tax hikes in his record" and questioned his support of proposals such as "mandatory vegetable oil in gasoline, cap and trade, and a statewide smoking ban."[70] Chris Edwards, a director at Cato, speculated that Pawlenty's rightward tack in his second term was related to his impending presidential run.[174]
Approval ratings
In April 2009, 46% of Minnesotans approved of Pawlenty, while 40% disapproved.[175] Among registered Republicans nationwide in July 2009, 38% had a favorable view of him while 33% didn't according to a Rasmussen Reports survey.[176] In March 2010 42% of Minnesotans approved of Pawlenty, while 52% disapproved.[177]
In October 2010 a Rasmussen report showed that Pawlenty had a 49% approval rating among Minnesotans with 49% disapproving.[178] A March 2011 survey by Gallup stated that Pawlenty began his Presidential run with only 41% name recognition in the GOP.[179] Also in March 2011, the Public Policy Polling (PPP) agency found that nationwide voters had a net negative view of Pawlenty, with 15% viewing him favorably verses 33% unfavorably.[180] In a 2011 PPP poll of registered Minnesota voters conducted from May 27–30, 42% of Minnesotans had a favorable opinion of Pawlenty, while 52% had an unfavorable opinion of him. In the presidential race, President Obama lead Pawlenty by 51% to 43%, suggesting Pawlenty could lose his home state to President Obama were he the 2012 GOP nominee.[181]
Electoral history

Minnesota District 38B state representative elections, 1992–2000

Year
Republican
DFL
Constitution
Total
Source


 
 
 


Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %


1992
Tim Pawlenty
9,610
49.1%
Linda Rother
8,773
44.8%
James Russell McMahon
253
1.3%
19,583
[18]


1994
Tim Pawlenty
12,172
81.0%
None
None
15,022
[182]


1996
Tim Pawlenty
14,747
74.4%
None
None
19,822
[183]


1998
Tim Pawlenty
9,118
48.5%
Leo Brisbois
7,819
41.6%
None
18,809
[184]


2000
Tim Pawlenty
13,779
59.6%
Gary Moore
7,239
31.3%
None
23,100
[185]



Minnesota gubernatorial elections, 2002–2006

Year
Republican
DFL
Independence
Green
Total
Source


 
 
 
 


Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %


2002
Tim Pawlenty
999,473
43.8%
Roger Moe
821,268
36.0%
Tim Penny
364,534
16.0%
Ken Pentel
50,589
2.2%
2,282,860
[26]


2006
Tim Pawlenty
1,028,568
46.4%
Mike Hatch
1,007,460
45.4%
Peter Hutchinson
141,735
6.4%
Ken Pentel
10,800
0.5%
2,217,818
[186]


References


^ Baenen, Jeff. "Minnesota Pronunciation Guide". Associated Press in Minnesota. Retrieved July 4, 2011. 
^ Streitfeld, Rachel (August 12, 2012). "Ryan's clandestine journey to Romney's ticket went from 'surreal to real'". CNN. Retrieved 2012-08-15. 
^ Knox, Olivier (September 20, 2012). "Pawlenty quits as Romney campaign co-chair". Yahoo! News. 
^ a b Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Tim Pawlenty". wargs.com. 
^ a b c Davey, Monica (August 7, 2008). "Pawlenty Looks to National Stage". The New York Times. Retrieved June 1, 2011. 
^ a b c d "Campaign 2002: Governor Tim Pawlenty". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Jim Walsh (January 28, 2004). "Grant Hart recalls his old classmate, Tim Pawlenty". City Pages. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Sharpiro, Walter. "The Tragedy of Tim Pawlenty: He did everything right. And that was the problem". The New Republic. Retrieved July 26, 2011. 
^ Political Science Dept of College of Liberal Arts (July 5, 2008). "PoliSci Alumni". University of Minnesota. 
^ "Empowered with a New Degree, Class of '08 Sets Forth – 120th Commencement Ceremony". University of Minnesota Law School. February 11, 2008. 
^ Melo, Frederick (January 5, 2007). "Mary Pawlenty leaves bench—First Lady will be top counsel for mediation firm". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ "Pawlenty Biography". 2012 Republican Candidates: Comparing the 2012 Republican Candidates. Retrieved July 26, 2011. 
^ "Main page". Wizmo. 
^ a b Tom Squitieri (November 7, 2002). "His plans changed, but message didn't". USA TODAY. 
^ "What's next for Tim Pawlenty?". MinnPost. September 8, 2008. Retrieved September 10, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (July 16, 2003). "DFLer slams "Grunseth groupies"". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ State Senator Sandra L. Pappas (July 21, 2003). "Legislators Call for Full and Complete Disclosure from Governor Pawlenty" (Press release). MN State Legislature press release (via Internet Archive). Archived from the original on September 19, 2004. 
^ a b Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1992. p. 146. 
^ Sherman, Amy (October 16, 1998). "38B candidates' ideas differ on surplus, education; incumbent faces unusual challenge". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ "Legislators Past and Present". Minnesota Legislative Reference Library. Retrieved August 23, 2007. 
^ Laura McCallum (June 12, 2002). "Campaign 2002 profile: Brian Sullivan". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Smith, Dane (April 19, 2001). "Cheney advises Pawlenty not to run for Senate; Majority leader bows to request from White House". Star Tribune. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (September 13, 2002). "Tim Pawlenty". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ a b c Grant, Ashley; Associated Press (November 6, 2002). "Pawlenty elected Minnesota governor—Republican breaks out of three-way race". Grand Forks Herald. p. A-05. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ Coleman, Toni et al. (January 5, 2003). "Your guide to the 2003 legislature: issues to watch". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A8. CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
"Major Minnesota issues". Grand Forks Herald. Associated Press. January 5, 2003. p. A-07. 
^ a b Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2002. pp. 322–325. 
^ Hohmann, James. "Once a goalie, Tim Pawlenty plays offense". Politico. Capitol News. Retrieved April 20, 2011. 
^ Laura McCallum (June 2, 2006). "Pawlenty accepts Republican endorsement for re-election". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Laura McCallum (November 8, 2006). "Hatch concedes; Pawlenty barely wins re-election". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Britt Robson (January 19, 2005). "Minnesota Eats Itself Another Pawlenty budget, another round of bloodletting". City Pages. Retrieved August 31, 2008. 
^ "Historical expenditures: General fund and all funds" (PDF). Minnesota Management and Budget Department. March 2011. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty said he brought Minnesota state spending growth down 'to about 1.7 percent per year.'". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. April 1, 2011. 
^ a b "PoliGraph: Pawlenty spending claim lacks context". MPR News. Minnesota Public Radio. January 27, 2011. 
^ Sharpiro, Walter. "The Tragedy of TIm Pawlenty: He Did Everything Right. And That's The Problem". The New Republic. Retrieved July 27, 2011. 
^ a b Salisbury, Bill (June 1, 2003). "Pawlenty wins, but risks attached – his no-new-taxes pledge may become a liability later". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ a b Scheck, Tom (September 24, 2009). "Pawlenty downplaying budget deficit predictions". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 24, 2009. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty said in 2009, 'we cut state spending in real terms for the first time in 150 years'". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. April 12, 2011. 
^ AEI said "billion", an error see original: Carlson, Arne (May 23, 2011). "The Presidency: A Bit Short Is Pawlenty". Blogspot. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Ornstein, Norman J. (May 25, 2011). "GOP Presidential Candidates Affect Agenda". American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy Research. Retrieved May 25, 2011. 
^ Wyler, Grace (May 23, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty Launches Campaign As The GOP Default Candidate". Business Insider. Retrieved May 25, 2011. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (May 23, 2011). "George's Bottom Line". ABC News. Retrieved June 9, 2011. 
^ Black, Eric (May 5, 2010). "Supreme Court overrules Pawlenty on unallotments". MinnPost. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Scheck, Tom (October 29, 2009). "Lawsuit challenges Pawlenty's budget cuts". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved October 30, 2009. 
^ Grow, Doug (December 31, 2009). "Unallotment ruling may have turned Minnesota's recent political gridlock into new political chaos". MinnPost. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ David Lillehaug and Mike McIntee (December 30, 2009). Atty David Lillehaug: Court ruling huge political setback for Gov. Pawlenty. The UpTake via MinnPost. Event occurs at 1:22. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ McIntee, Mike (December 31, 2009). Pawlenty To Appeal Unallotment Ruling. The UpTake via Twin Cities Daily Planet. Event occurs at 1:30. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ Shaw, Charley (February 9, 2010). "Pawlenty in appellate brief says he legally unalloted the budget". Politics in Minnesota. Retrieved February 9, 2010. 
^ Helgeson, Baird (February 9, 2010). "Pawlenty defends budget cuts". Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Scheck, Tom (March 15, 2010). "State's budget in hands of Supreme Court". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved March 15, 2010. 
^ Magnuson, Eric J. (May 5, 2010). "State of Minnesota in Supreme Court: A10-64" (PDF). Minnesota Judicial Branch. Archived from the original (PDF) on May 5, 2010. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Kimball, Joe (May 5, 2010). "Pawlenty responds to ruling on unallotment, urges Legislature to back his cuts". MinnPost. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (May 12, 2010). "Budget clock is ticking at the Capitol—After veto, talks deadlock and DFL calls on Pawlenty to take the lead". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Sturdevant, Lori (May 23, 2010). "Now on the trail, loaded with legislative baggage—Kelliher bears the weight of her position, while Emmer's burdens are largely of his own making". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Michael Khoo (February 5, 2004). "Pawlenty's speech puts focus on gambling". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ T.W. Budig (April 3, 2003). "Canterbury racino legislation advances in House; Pawlenty cool to more gambling". ECM Capitol Roundup. Archived from the original on May 10, 2003. 
^ Becky Glander (February 5, 2005). "Some angered at racino proposal". University Chronicle. Archived from the original on March 1, 2009. 
^ Andrew Tellijohn (March 7, 2003). "Canterbury chasing jackpot with 'racino'". Minneapolis / St. Paul Business Journal. 
^ "Indian Country is in the midst of political awakening". October 11, 2004. Retrieved December 3, 2007. 
^ Michael Khoo (May 17, 2005). "Casino issue is dying, if not dead, at Capitol". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Native American casinos". Indianz. May 23, 2005. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ "Pawlenty's talks on Twins stadium yield no action". Associated Press/MPR. January 11, 2006. 
^ Twins ballpark: What's next?. May 26, 2006. 
^ "Votetracker Minnesota Twins stadium". Minnesota Public Radio. 2006. 
^ Tom Scheck; Brandt Williams (May 22, 2006). "Twins' stadium opponents were tired of the fight; supporters weren't". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Brandt Williams (April 25, 2005). "Pohlad: Contribution to Twins ballpark 'fair, substantial'". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Legislature passes $1 billion public works bill". St. Paul Pioneer Press. June 2006. Archived from the original on March 12, 2007. Retrieved June 26, 2006. 
^ Montopoli, Brian (March 25, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty: I shut down Sharia loan program". CBS News. 
^ "Is There a Double Standard in Tim Pawlenty's Disavowal of Sharia-Compliant Mortgages?". TIME. March 25, 2011. 
^ "Mark Dayton says Gov. Tim Pawlenty cut education spending". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. July 29, 2010. 
^ a b c "2012 Presidential White Paper #2: Former Minnesota Governor Tim Pawlenty" (PDF). Club for Growth. May 24, 2011. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (December 22, 2010). "'Binge buster'—In two terms as governor, Tim Pawlenty put the brakes on state spending and set Minnesota on a path to fiscal austerity. But critics say he simply kicked budget problems down the road.". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Laura McCallum (October 31, 2003). "Social studies standards face more heat". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (December 19, 2003). "Yecke unveils second try at social studies, science standards". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Sara Evans and Lisa Norling (November 2004). "What Happened in Minnesota?". Organization of American Historians newsletter. Archived from the original on August 3, 2008. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ a b Pugmire, Tim (May 16, 2004). "Yecke blasts Minnesota's political climate for vote to oust her". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ Tim Pugmire (June 27, 2006). "Good grades would mean free college under Pawlenty plan". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Art Hughes (May 7, 2007). "Dream Act dies under threat of Pawlenty veto". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Fitzgerald, John (October 1, 2009). "Schools to Pay Millions to Cover Governor's IOU". Minnesota 2020. Retrieved July 2, 2011. 
^ a b Schumacher, Lawrence (May 3, 2010). "Pawlenty nixes college student credit transfer fix". Twin Cities Daily Planet. Retrieved May 3, 2010. 
^ a b Anderson, G. R. Jr. (February 28, 2008). "One head finally rolls". MinnPost.com. MinnPost. Retrieved February 29, 2008. 
^ Saulny, Susan (February 29, 2008). "Minnesota Transportation Chief Is Out". The New York Times. The New York Times Company. Retrieved February 29, 2008. 
^ "State House approves gas tax hike". KSTP. 2007. Retrieved August 3, 2007. 
^ Jackson, Henry C.; Mark Scolforo (August 4, 2007). "8 Reported Missing in Bridge Collapse". Washington Post. 
^ Laura McCallum (August 3, 2004). "Pawlenty finds money to jumpstart North Star rail line". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ a b Sturdevant, Lori (April 12, 2008). "Working toward the train in vain". Minneapolis Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. [permanent dead link]
^ a b c Yuen, Laura; Tom Scheck (April 7, 2008). "Pawlenty delivers a setback to the Central Corridor project". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ "Coleman: Disappointed By Gov. Vetoing LRT Money". Associated Press. April 10, 2008. Archived from the original on March 1, 2009. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Tom Weber (May 19, 2008). "Central Corridor planning moves forward". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Kaszuba, Mike (April 18, 2008). "Met Council head is in a political bind". www.startribune.com. Archived from the original on April 2, 2015. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Salisbury, Bill. "Vetoes not political? (The Political Animal)". blogs.twincities.com. Archived from the original on April 14, 2008. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Scheck, Tom (April 7, 2008). "MPR: St. Paul officials: What does Pawlenty have against us?". minnesota.publicradio.org. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Stassen-Berger, Rachel E. (June 26, 2006). "When crime jumps, politicos trade blame: experts say one elected official can't do much to raise—or lower—crime rates". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ a b Hoppin, Jason (February 10, 2010). "Pawlenty: Time to get tougher on sex crimes – Some offenders would get 25 years; others, even more". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ Ludeman, Cal (February 7, 2011). "Details on sex offender program deleted". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on April 2, 2015. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Jim Lehrer (March 22, 2006). "MINNESOTA'S IMMIGRATION DEBATE". Twin Cities Public Broadcasting. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (January 4, 2006). "Illegal immigration a 'real issue': Pawlenty defends crackdown, but not all agree with tactics". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ McCallum, Laura (September 26, 2005). "Pawlenty pumps ethanol". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 6, 2007. 
^ a b Novak, Robert (February 28, 2008). "How Not to Run for Vice President". The Washington Post. The Washington Post Company. Retrieved February 28, 2008. 
^ a b "Pawlenty’s Political Climate Change". Fact-Check.org. 
^ herb, jeremy (August 4, 2011). "Remarks highlight Pawlenty's climate shift". minneapolis star tribune. Retrieved August 10, 2012. 
^ Powell, Joy; Lopez, Patricia (August 22, 2007). "State health commissioner resigns". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on March 2, 2009. Retrieved January 12, 2008. 
^ Tom Scheck (February 16, 2005). "Measuring the success of Canadian drug imports". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 12, 2008. 
^ "The Kaiser Commission on Medicaid and the Uninsured" (PDF). The Henry J. Kaiser Family Foundation. Archived from the original (PDF) on February 4, 2011. Retrieved March 16, 2011. 
^ "Pawlenty uses veto power to cut health care". Mnmed.org. Retrieved October 31, 2010. [permanent dead link]
^ Scheck, Tom (May 15, 2009). "Pawlenty, lawmakers remain at odds over budget issues". Minnesota Public Radio News. Retrieved June 2, 2009. 
^ Williams, Chris (Associated Press) (November 18, 2009). "HCMC approves big cuts in 2010 budget". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved November 19, 2009. 
^ McIntee, Mike (February 9, 2010). "Vets To Feel Governor Pawlenty's GAMC Cuts". The Uptake. Archived from the original on August 6, 2014. Retrieved February 10, 2010. 
^ Marcotty, Josephine & Stassen-Berger, Rachel E. (September 1, 2010). "Pawlenty restricts health money". Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ a b Salisbury, Bill (October 18, 2008). "Governor will lead trade group to Israel". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Ragsdale, Jim; Welbes, John (June 19, 2004). "Fox promises consulate—Mexico president expresses wish to aid countrymen in Minnesota". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ 200 National Guard members to patrol Mexican border | Minnesota Public Radio News
^ Bjorhus, Jennifer (November 14, 2005). "Pawlenty courts Chinese investors – TRADE: Economic ties take a new direction as the Chinese begin looking for places to invest". Duluth News-Tribune. 
^ a b Smith, Dane (January 30, 2007). "Pawlenty plans trade mission to India". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on June 8, 2008. Retrieved January 30, 2007. 
^ Lopez, Patricia (June 22, 2004). "Pawlenty's trade mission—Poland and the Czech Republic: Pawlenty praises Poland's 'bright future'". Star Tribune. 
^ Von Sternberg, Bob (November 13, 2010). "Gov. Tim Pawlenty: Signing off". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on November 20, 2010. 
^ "Initiatives of NGA chairs". National Governors Association. 
^ "Past Chairs". Midwestern Governors Association. Archived from the original on May 1, 2013. 
^ Ambinder, Marc (February 9, 2005). "Conservatives Say Pawlenty Is Potential Presidential Candidate". ABC News. 
^ Will, George F. (February 24, 2008). "The Running Mate McCain Needs". The Washington Post. p. B07. 
^ Martin, Jonathan (February 17, 2008). "Steadfast McCain ally sparks veep talk". Politico. 
^ "Gov. Pawlenty announces re-election bid (feature audio)". MPR News. Minnesota Public Radio. May 31, 2006. 
^ Black, Eric; Tice, D.J. (March 14, 2007). "Pawlenty for veep: Will he or won't he?". Star Tribune. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty Announces re-election campaign (video)". WCCO-TV. May 31, 2006. Archived from the original on February 9, 2013. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ Black, Eric (February 18, 2008). "How did veep talk go so far without Pawlenty's pledge coming up?". MinnPost. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty to co-chair McCain '08 exploratory committee". KARE. Associated Press. January 15, 2007. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Pugmire, Tim (January 9, 2008). "Presidential campaigns raise volume in Minnesota". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved January 10, 2008. 
^ Hopfensperger, Jean (January 7, 2008) [updated February 5, 2008]. "Is Pawlenty's plan for immigration aimed at a VP slot?". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on January 27, 2008. Retrieved July 13, 2008. 
^ "McCain Selects His Running Mate". FOXNews.com. August 28, 2008. Archived from the original on 2008-11-02. Retrieved August 28, 2008. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty: McCain's Vice President?". Huffingtonpost.com. January 8, 2008. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ "McCain taps Alaska Gov. Palin as vice president pick". CNN Politics. CNN. August 29, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty says he never backed bailout in 2008". Politico Live. January 16, 2011. 
^ Ambinder, Marc (February 9, 2005). "Conservatives Say Pawlenty Is Potential Presidential Candidate". ABC News. Retrieved April 3, 2011. 
^ Kendra Marr (December 17, 2010). "Tim Pawlenty's regret: No third term". Politico. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ "Obama easily outpolls Pawlenty, Palin" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. July 10, 2009. Retrieved May 3, 2010. 
^ "Pawlenty rolls out new health care proposals". CNN. October 13, 2009. Retrieved May 25, 2010. 
^ Foster, Daniel (January 27, 2011). "Pence Out, Republican Presidential Field Open". National Review. 
^ Jonathan Martin (October 1, 2009). "Pawlenty preps 2012 campaign team". Politico. Retrieved June 3, 2010. 
^ "Pawlenty in Iowa: Republican party must unite to take power from Democrats | Des Moines Register Staff Blogs". Blogs.desmoinesregister.com. October 27, 2010. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ Peters, Jeremy (January 29, 2011). "Political Blogs Are Ready to Flood Campaign Trail". The New York Times. 
^ Kendra Marr (January 14, 2011). "Pawlenty: No VP thoughts this time". Politico. Retrieved January 14, 2011. 
^ Davenport, Reid (January 18, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty: If I run, it will be for the presidency". The GW Hatchet. The George Washington University. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ a b Weiner, Jay (January 18, 2011). "In campaign-like appearance, Pawlenty shows off 'Courage to Stand' ... and to sit, signing books". MinnPost. Retrieved January 18, 2011. 
^ a b Bryan Fischer and Tim Pawlenty. AFA's Bryan Fischer Interviews Tim Pawlenty. YouTube (Google). Retrieved January 17, 2011. 
^ Exclusive – Tim Pawlenty Extended Interview (Episode #16007). The Daily Show (Comedy Partners). January 12, 2010. Retrieved January 17, 2011. 
^ Duffy, J.P. (December 15, 2010). "FRC, Members of Congress, Governors, and Conservative Leaders Release Open Letter Calling for Civil Debate, End to Character Assassination". Retrieved January 30, 2011. 
^ Pawlenty, Tim (December 13, 2010). "Government Unions vs. Taxpayers". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Marr, Kendra (March 21, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty forms 2012 presidential exploratory committee". Politico. Retrieved March 21, 2011. 
^ Camia, Catalina (March 21, 2011). "Pawlenty launches committee to explore White House bid". USA Today. Retrieved March 21, 2011. 
^ Aliyah Shahid (April 13, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty to CNN's Piers Morgan: 'I'm running for President,' spokesman walks it back". Daily News (New York). Retrieved January 13, 2012.  and in context Tim Pawlenty Tells Piers Morgan: "I'm Running For President". CNN via PoliticsNewsNews via YouTube (Google). Retrieved April 15, 2011. 
^ "@CNN report of @TimPawlenty on @piersmorgan is out of context. Obviously, Pawlenty has exploratory committee to run for President. Not VP," wrote Alex Conant, his spokesman, in Wallbank, Derek (April 12, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty accidentally confirms the obvious, then walks it back". MinnPost. Retrieved April 15, 2011. 
^ "Real change is about telling hard truths". USA Today. May 23, 2011. 
^ Pawlenty 'betting it all on Iowa' in presidential run. KARE-TV. Multimedia KARE. May 23, 2011. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Tim Pawlenty – A Time for Truth (Preview of Monday's Announcement). YouTube (Google). May 22, 2011. Retrieved May 22, 2011. 
^ Shear, Michael (May 22, 2011). "Pawlenty Announces Candidacy a Day Early". The New York Times. Retrieved May 22, 2011. 
^ Seib, Gerald F. (May 23, 2011). "Is America Ready for President TPaw?". The Wall Street Journal. Dow Jones. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Reinhard, Beth (August 13, 2011). "Bachmann Boom; TPaw Bust?". National Journal. Archived from the original on October 25, 2011. Retrieved August 14, 2011. 
^ "PolitiFact: Obamacare was patterned after (Mitt Romney's) plan in Massachusetts". August 12, 2011. Retrieved August 9, 2012. 
^ Lucy Madison (June 14, 2011). "Will backing off "Obamneycare" in GOP debate hurt Pawlenty's campaign?". CBS News. Retrieved November 2, 2012. 
^ Jens Manuel Krogstad (June 14, 2011). "Pawlenty decision to back off "Obamneycare" criticism questioned". Des Moined Register. Retrieved November 2, 2012. 
^ Bakst, Brian (August 14, 2011). "Ex-Minn. Gov. Tim Pawlenty ends White House bid". The Huffington Post. Associated Press. Retrieved August 14, 2011. 
^ Memoli, Michael (2011-09-12). "Tim Pawlenty backs former rival Mitt Romney for president". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved 2011-09-12. 
^ Parker, Ashley & Barbaro, Michael (July 17, 2012). "Caution, Not Flash, as Romney Seeks His No. 2". New York Times. Retrieved July 18, 2012. 
^ "Mitt Romney loses Tim Pawlenty as campaign co-chair 45 days before election", newsday.com.
^ "Roundtable Management" Archived November 15, 2012, at the Wayback Machine., FSR webpage. Retrieved 2012-11-08.
^ Orol, Ronald D., "Pawlenty: ‘Walls of reality’ closing on Congress", MarketWatch, November 7, 2012. Retrieved 2012-11-08.
^ Art Hughes (November 6, 2002). "Pawlenty sets stage for a Capitol revolution". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Mary Pawlenty leaves bench for new job". Minnesota Public radio. Associated Press. January 4, 2007. 
^ "Minn. First Lady to Join Gilbert Mediation Center". wcco.com. Associated Press. September 2007. Archived from the original on May 18, 2008. 
^ "Tim (Timothy J.) Pawlenty". Minnesota Historical Society. 
^ Lewis, Matt (January 2011). "Tim Pawlenty on Michele Bachmann, Michael Steele . . . and Hockey". Politics Daily. Retrieved May 16, 2011. 
^ Todd, Chuck; Murray, Mark; Montanaro, Domenico (May 23, 2011). "2012: Daniels is out, T-Paw and Cain are in". First Read. MSNBC. Archived from the original on May 28, 2011. 
^ "Who's afraid of Mitt and T-Paw...". Front Row Washington. Reuters. May 20, 2011. 
^ Antle, W. James III (May 23, 2011). "TPaw and TARP, Cont'd". The American Spectator. 
^ a b "Pawlenty: An economic pro or crafty budget setter?". Fox News. Associated Press. May 25, 2011. 
^ "Klobuchar Approval Rating Highest PPP Has Found in Last Year" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. April 16, 2009. 
^ "Palin At The Top – And Bottom – for GOP Voters in 2012 – Rasmussen Reports". Rasmussen Reports. July 7, 2009. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ "SurveyUSA News Poll #16315". SurveyUSA. March 3, 2010. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ "Election 2010: Minnesota Governor". Rasmussen Reports, LLC. October 22, 2010. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ "Pawlenty Begins Race With 41% GOP Name Recognition". Gallup. March 23, 2011. 
^ "Voters tepid toward Obama, but favor him over GOP". Public Policy Polling. March 16, 2011. 
^ "Obama a lock in Minnesota" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. June 6, 2011. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1994. p. 145. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1996. pp. 155–156. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1998. pp. 142–143. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2000. p. 481. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2006. pp. 456–463. 


External links



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Tim Pawlenty.




Biography portal
Minnesota portal
Politics portal




Tim Pawlenty at Minnesota Legislators Past & Present

Profile at Project Vote Smart
Financial information (federal office) at the Federal Election Commission
Appearances on C-SPAN
Campaign contributions at Follow the Money (U.S. House)
Campaign 2002 – Minnesota Governor Minnesota Public Radio
Campaign 2006 – Tim Pawlenty Minnesota Public Radio



Minnesota House of Representatives


Preceded by
Art Seaberg
Member of the Minnesota House of Representatives
from District 38B
1993–2003
Succeeded by
Lynn Wardlow


Preceded by
Ted Winter
Majority Leader of the Minnesota House of Representatives
1999–2003
Succeeded by
Erik Paulsen


Party political offices


Preceded by
Norm Coleman
Republican nominee for Governor of Minnesota
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Emmer


Political offices


Preceded by
Jesse Ventura
Governor of Minnesota
2003–2011
Succeeded by
Mark Dayton


Preceded by
Janet Napolitano
Chair of National Governors Association
2007–2008
Succeeded by
Ed Rendell








v
t
e


Governors of Minnesota



Territorial (1849–58)



Ramsey
Gorman
Medary








State (since 1858)



Sibley
Ramsey
Swift
Miller
Marshall
Austin
Davis
Pillsbury
Hubbard
McGill
Merriam
Nelson
Clough
Lind
Van Sant
Johnson
Eberhart
Hammond
Burnquist
Preus
Christianson
Olson
Petersen
Benson
Stassen
Thye
Youngdahl
E. Anderson
Freeman
Andersen
Rolvaag
LeVander
W. Anderson
Perpich
Quie
Perpich
Carlson
Ventura
Pawlenty
Dayton












v
t
e


Chairs of the National Governors Association






Willson
McGovern
Walsh
Spry
Capper
Harrington
Allen
Sproul
Cox
Trinkle
Brewster
McMullen
Dern
Case
Pollard
Rolph
McNutt
Peery
Cochran
Stark
Vanderbilt
Stassen
O'Conor
Saltonstall
Maw
Martin
Caldwell
Hildreth
Hunt
Lane
Carlson
Lausche
Peterson
Shivers
Thornton
Kennon
Langlie
Stanley
Stratton
Collins
Boggs
McNichols
Powell
Rosellini
Anderson
Sawyer
Reed
Guy
Volpe
Ellington
Love
Hearnes
Moore
Mandel
Evans
Rampton
Ray
Andrus
Askew
Milliken
Carroll
Bowen
Busbee
Snelling
Matheson
J. Thompson
Carlin
Alexander
Clinton
Sununu
Baliles
Branstad
Gardner
Ashcroft
Romer
Campbell
Dean
T. Thompson
Miller
Voinovich
Carper
Leavitt
Glendening
Engler
Patton
Kempthorne
Warner
Huckabee
Napolitano
Pawlenty
Rendell
Douglas
Manchin
Gregoire
Heineman
Markell
Fallin
Hickenlooper
Herbert
McAuliffe
Sandoval












v
t
e


Minnesota House Majority Leaders






W. Dunn
Wilson
Rockne
Rines
Wm. Nolan
Girling
Wi. Norton
McDonough
R. Dunn
Eastvold
R. Dunn
Cina
Dirlam
Lindstrom
Anderson
Knickerbocker
Eken
Sieben
Levi
Vanasek
Wynia
Long
Welle
Anderson
Carruthers
Winter
Pawlenty
Paulsen
Sertich
Dean
Murphy
Peppin















v
t
e


(2008 ←)    United States presidential election, 2012    (→ 2016)






United States elections, 2012
Fundraising
National polls
Statewide polls (pre-2012, early 2012)
Timeline
General election debates
Newspaper endorsements
International reactions
Hurricane Sandy





Democratic Party

Convention
Primaries

Newspaper endorsements





Incumbent nominee: Barack Obama

campaign
endorsements
positions


Incumbent VP nominee: Joe Biden

positions




Challengers: Bob Ely
Keith Judd
Warren Mosler
Darcy Richardson
Jim Rogers
Vermin Supreme
Randall Terry
John Wolfe





Republican Party

Convention
Primaries
Debates

Statewide polls
National polls

Straw polls

Newspaper endorsements





Nominee: Mitt Romney

campaign
endorsements
positions


VP nominee: Paul Ryan

positions




Candidates: Michele Bachmann (campaign)
Herman Cain (campaign)
Jack Fellure
Newt Gingrich (campaign)
Stewart Greenleaf
Jon Huntsman (campaign)
Gary Johnson (campaign)
Fred Karger
Andy Martin
Thaddeus McCotter (campaign)
Jimmy McMillan
Roy Moore
Ron Paul (campaign)
Tim Pawlenty (campaign)
Rick Perry (campaign)
Buddy Roemer (campaign)
Rick Santorum (campaign)





Libertarian Party

Convention
Primaries





Nominee: Gary Johnson

campaign
positions


VP nominee: Jim Gray


Candidates: Jim Duensing
R. J. Harris
Carl Person
Sam Sloan
R. Lee Wrights





Green Party

Convention





Nominee: Jill Stein (campaign)
VP nominee: Cheri Honkala


Candidates: Stewart Alexander
Roseanne Barr
Kent Mesplay










Other third-party and independent candidates



American Independent Party



Nominee Tom Hoefling


Candidates Wiley Drake
Virgil Goode (campaign)
Edward C. Noonan
Laurie Roth





American Third Position Party



Nominee Merlin Miller
VP nominee Virginia Abernethy





America's Party



Nominee Tom Hoefling





Constitution Party

Convention





Nominee Virgil Goode (campaign)
VP nominee Jim Clymer


Candidates Darrell Castle
Laurie Roth
Robby Wells





Freedom Socialist Party



Nominee Stephen Durham





Grassroots Party



Nominee Jim Carlson





Justice Party



Nominee Rocky Anderson
VP nominee Luis J. Rodriguez





Objectivist Party



Nominee Tom Stevens





Party for Socialism and Liberation



Nominee Peta Lindsay





Peace and Freedom Party



Nominee Roseanne Barr
VP nominee Cindy Sheehan


Candidates Stewart Alexander
Rocky Anderson
Stephen Durham
Peta Lindsay





Prohibition Party



Nominee Jack Fellure


Candidates James Hedges





Reform Party



Nominee Andre Barnett


Candidates Laurence Kotlikoff
Darcy Richardson
Buddy Roemer (campaign)
Robert David Steele
Robby Wells





Socialist Equality Party



Nominee Jerry White





Socialist Workers Party



Nominee James Harris





Socialist Party



Nominee Stewart Alexander (campaign)
VP nominee Alejandro Mendoza





Independents



Candidates Lee Abramson
Randy Blythe
Jeff Boss
Robert Burck
Terry Jones
Joe Schriner





Draft movements



Michael Bloomberg (movement)













State results






Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming











Other 2012 elections: House
Senate
Gubernatorial









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 160316458
LCCN: n2010076275
SUDOC: 157114341










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Tim_Pawlenty&oldid=792355660"					
Categories: 1960 births21st-century American politiciansAmerican people of German descentAmerican people of Polish descentBaptists from the United StatesConverts to Baptist denominationsConverts to Baptist denominations from Roman CatholicismGovernors of MinnesotaLiving peopleMembers of the Minnesota House of RepresentativesMinnesota lawyersMinnesota RepublicansPoliticians from Saint Paul, MinnesotaPeople from Eagan, MinnesotaPeople from South St. Paul, MinnesotaRepublican Party state governors of the United StatesUnited States presidential candidates, 2012University of Minnesota Law School alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from July 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from November 2016Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


ČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançaisHornjoserbsceItalianoעבריתNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 26 July 2017, at 01:16.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Tim Pawlenty - Wikipedia




















 







Tim Pawlenty

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Tim Pawlenty








Chair of the National Governors Association


In office
July 23, 2007 – July 14, 2008


Preceded by
Janet Napolitano


Succeeded by
Ed Rendell


39th Governor of Minnesota


In office
January 6, 2003 – January 3, 2011


Lieutenant
Carol Molnau


Preceded by
Jesse Ventura


Succeeded by
Mark Dayton


Majority Leader of the Minnesota House of Representatives


In office
January 3, 1999 – January 3, 2003


Governor
Jesse Ventura


Preceded by
Ted Winter


Succeeded by
Erik Paulsen


Member of the Minnesota House of Representatives
from District 38B


In office
January 3, 1993 – January 3, 2003


Preceded by
Art Seaberg


Succeeded by
Lynn Wardlow





Personal details


Born
Timothy James Pawlenty
(1960-11-27) November 27, 1960 (age 56)
Saint Paul, Minnesota, U.S.


Nationality
American


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Mary Anderson


Children
2


Alma mater
University of Minnesota, Twin Cities (BA, JD)


Signature



Timothy James "Tim" Pawlenty (/pəˈlɛnti/;[1] born November 27, 1960) is president and CEO of Financial Services Roundtable, a Washington, D.C.-based industry advocacy group. He was a Republican politician who served as the 39th Governor of Minnesota (2003–2011). He previously served in the Minnesota House of Representatives (1993–2003), where he was majority leader for two terms. In 2011, he entered the campaign for the Republican presidential nomination and later was a potential vice presidential nominee before serving as co-chair of Mitt Romney's campaign.
Pawlenty was born in Saint Paul, Minnesota, and raised in nearby South St. Paul. He graduated from University of Minnesota with a B.A. in political science and a J.D. His early career included working as a labor law attorney and the vice president of a software as a service company. After settling in the city of Eagan with his wife, Pawlenty was appointed to the city's Planning Commission and was elected to the Eagan City Council at the age of 28. He won a seat as a state representative in 1992, representing District 38B in suburban Dakota County. He was re-elected four times and was voted majority leader by House Republicans in 1998.
After narrowly winning the Republican gubernatorial primary in 2002, Pawlenty won a three-way election for Governor of Minnesota, and was re-elected in 2006 by a margin of less than one percent. His campaign platform focused on balancing the budget without raising taxes. During Pawlenty's governorship, he did not raise income taxes, but did enact targeted increases in sales tax and user fees. His administration advocated for numerous public works projects, including work on the Northstar Commuter Rail Line, and the construction of Target Field, a Major League Baseball stadium in Minneapolis. He signed a bill mandating 20% ethanol in gasoline by 2013. He cut health care costs in an attempt to balance the budget, and borrowed funds from the state's K-12 education and low income programs. He signed an executive order rejecting federal funds related to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act. He also led worldwide trips for business leaders and trade delegations to explore trade opportunities. In the 2007–2008 term, he served as chairman of the National Governors Association.
Pawlenty was rumored to be a contender for both the Republican presidential and vice presidential nominations during the 2008 election, and he officially sought the 2012 Republican presidential nomination from May to August 2011. After withdrawing from that race, he became a finalist to join his party's nominee on the 2012 ticket as its vice presidential candidate.[2] Pawlenty was not selected as Mitt Romney's vice presidential candidate, but served as co-chair of Romney's campaign. In September 2012, he left Romney's campaign to become a Washington lobbyist for financial institutions.[3]



Contents


1 Early life, education, and early career
2 Minnesota House of Representatives
3 Governorship

3.1 Election, 2002
3.2 Reelection, 2006
3.3 State budget

3.3.1 Minnesota Supreme Court case


3.4 Funding projects
3.5 Education
3.6 Transportation
3.7 Crime
3.8 Energy policy and climate change
3.9 Health
3.10 Foreign relations
3.11 Other activities


4 2012 presidential campaign

4.1 Early steps
4.2 Book tour and political positions
4.3 Candidacy


5 Financial Services Roundtable
6 Personal life
7 Public image

7.1 Political views
7.2 Approval ratings
7.3 Electoral history


8 References
9 External links



Early life, education, and early career
Pawlenty was born in Saint Paul, Minnesota, to Eugene Joseph Pawlenty, and his wife, Virginia Frances (née Oldenburg).[4][5] His father, who drove a milk delivery truck, was of Polish descent, while his mother was of German ancestry.[4] His mother died of cancer when he was 16.[6] Pawlenty grew up in South St. Paul,[5] where he played ice hockey on his high school's junior varsity squad.[7]
Intending to become a dentist, Pawlenty enrolled in the University of Minnesota, the only one in his family to go beyond high school.[8] However, he changed his plans and spent the summers of 1980 and 1982 working as an intern at the office of U.S. Senator David Durenberger.[5] In 1983, he graduated with a B.A. in political science.[9] He received a Juris Doctor from the University of Minnesota Law School in 1986.[10] While in law school, he met wife, Mary Anderson, whom he married in 1987.[11]
Pawlenty first worked as a labor law attorney at the firm Rider Bennett (later Rider, Bennett, Egan & Arundel), where he had interned while a law student.[12] He later became vice president of a software as a service company, Wizmo Inc.[13][14]
Having moved to Eagan, Minnesota, a suburb of Minneapolis – Saint Paul, Pawlenty was appointed to the city's Planning Commission by Mayor Vic Ellison.[14][15] One year later, at age 28, he was elected to the City Council.[6]
Pawlenty entered state politics in 1990 as a campaign advisor for Jon Grunseth's losing bid for Minnesota governor.[6] After Pawlenty himself became governor, he appointed Grunseth's ex-wife, Vicky Tigwell, to the board of the Minneapolis−Saint Paul International Airport, an action which became an ethics and accountability issue in 2003.[16][17]
Minnesota House of Representatives
Pawlenty was elected to the Minnesota House of Representatives in 1992, winning 49.1 percent of the vote in District 38B (suburban Dakota County).[18] In the House, he authored bills instituting term limits for committee chairmen, funding for infant parenting classes, minimum sentences for repeat domestic violence offenders, and community notification for sex offenders. In response to a state budget surplus, he advocated for a tax reduction rather than expanded education funding.[19] He was reelected four times and was chosen House Majority Leader when the Republicans became the majority party in the State Legislature in 1998.[20]
Governorship
Election, 2002
Main article: Minnesota gubernatorial election, 2002
In 2002, Pawlenty wanted to run for governor, but party leaders made it clear they favored businessman Brian Sullivan.[6][21] Pawlenty then decided on the U.S. Senate, but he abandoned those plans when Vice President Dick Cheney asked him to step aside and allow former St. Paul mayor Norm Coleman to challenge Senator Paul Wellstone without Republican primary opposition.[22] Pawlenty returned to his original ambition and won a hard-fought and narrow victory over Sullivan in the Republican party primary election.[23]
In the general election, Pawlenty faced two strong opponents. His main rival was veteran Democratic–Farmer–Labor (DFL) state senator Roger Moe. Former Democratic Congressman Tim Penny ran on the Independence Party ticket (Governor Jesse Ventura, a member of the Independence Party, chose not to seek reelection). Until mid-October 2002, all three were essentially tied in the polls.[24] Pawlenty's major campaign stances included: a pledge not to raise taxes to balance the state's budget deficit (while allowing for increases in license and user fees);[24] that visa expiration dates be required to be printed on driver's licenses; that women seeking an abortion be required to wait at least 24 hours; enactment of a concealed carry gun law; and reform of the state's education requirements.[25] Pawlenty won the election with 43.8 percent of the vote.[26] His largest gains after the October three-way tie were reportedly among voters in the suburbs of Minneapolis–St. Paul.[24]
Reelection, 2006
Main article: Minnesota gubernatorial election, 2006
Governor Pawlenty ran for re-election in 2006.[27] He espoused conservative stands on issues. But conservatives criticized him on funding issues, in particular two pieces of legislation for stadiums for the Gophers and Minnesota Twins, and bond issues for public transit, including the Northstar commuter rail line.[28]
The 2006 gubernatorial race included Minnesota Attorney General Mike Hatch, of the DFL; Peter Hutchinson of the Independence Party; and Ken Pentel of the Green Party. Pawlenty won, defeating Hatch by a margin of less than one percent, though both the state House and Senate gained DFL majority.[29]
State budget
Pawlenty was elected in 2002 on a platform of balancing the state's budget without raising taxes. He emphasized his campaign and first term with the Taxpayers League of Minnesota slogan "no new taxes."[30] His governorship was characterized by a historically low rate of spending growth. According to the Minnesota Management and Budget Department, general-fund expenditures from 2004 to 2011 increased an average of 3.5 percent per two-year term, compared to an average of 21.1 percent from 1960 to 2003 (these numbers, however, are not inflation-adjusted).[31][32][33] University of Minnesota political science professor Larry Jacobs said that slowing down state spending and opposing tax increases were the "signature issue" of Pawlenty's governorship.[34]
In his first year as governor, Pawlenty inherited a projected two-year budget deficit of $4.3 billion, the largest in Minnesota's history.[35] After a contentious budget session with a Democrat-controlled Senate, he signed a package of fee increases, spending reductions, and government reorganization which eliminated the deficit. The budget reduced the rate of funding increases for state services, including transportation, social services, and welfare. It also enacted a perennial proposal to restructure city aid based on immediate need, rather than historical factors. In negotiations the governor agreed to several compromises, abandoning a desired public employee wage freeze and property tax restrictions.[35]
During his second term, Pawlenty erased a $2.7-billion deficit by cutting spending, shifting payments, and using one-time federal stimulus money.[36] His final budget (2010–2011) was the state's first two-year period since 1960 in which net government expenditures decreased. Pawlenty has claimed this as "the first time in 150 years" that spending has been cut, but fact-checkers have disputed this claim as no public budget records prior to 1960 are known to exist.[33][37]
Pawlenty has been criticized by some for providing a short-term budget solution but coming up short in his long-term strategy as governor. The state department of Management and Budget reports that the two-year budget starting in July 2011 is projected to come up $4.4 billion short.[36] Former Minnesota Governor Arne Carlson, a Republican, criticized Pawlenty's budget strategy: he borrowed more than $1 billion from the tobacco settlement (money set aside for health care), borrowed more than $1.4 billion from K-12 education funding, borrowed more than $400 [million][38] from the Health Care Access Fund for low-income families, among other short-term shifts in accounting. The result was a $5-billion deficit, the seventh largest in the United States.[39] Minnesota property taxes rose $2.5 billion, more than the previous 16 years combined, and Moody's lowered the state's bond rating.[40] Carlson told Time, "I don't think any governor has left behind a worse financial mess than he [Pawlenty] has." Pawlenty responded, "My friend governor Arne Carlson is, of course, now an Obama and John Kerry supporter."[41]
Minnesota Supreme Court case




Minnesota Supreme Court chamber at the Minnesota State Capitol


While Pawlenty said he was "confident" in his right to use unallotment, the Minnesota Supreme Court ultimately decided against him, voting 4 to 3 in a decision in May 2010.[42] His budget had been the subject of a lawsuit in Ramsey County District Court, which was decided against him. Judge Kathleen Gearin decided Pawlenty exceeded his constitutional authority in making unilateral spending cuts to a $5.3-million special dietary program that he had unalloted.[43][44] Attorney David Lillehaug said initially, "This is, I don't think it's understating this to say, this is one of the most important court cases in Minnesota legal history."[45] Pawlenty announced the following day that he would appeal;[46] he filed his defense in February,[47] and arguments were heard on March 15.[48][49] In May, the Supreme Court affirmed Judge Gearin, deciding that "Because the legislative and executive branches never enacted a balanced budget for the 2010–2011 biennium, use of the unallotment power to address the unresolved deficit exceeded the authority granted to the executive branch by the statute".[50] Pawlenty responded:[51]

I will fight to reduce spending and taxes in Minnesota and that battle continues. My commitment to the people of Minnesota remains the same: we will balance the budget without raising taxes.

After the court ruling, as the 2010 legislative session drew to a close, Pawlenty vetoed a budget which would fix a $2.9-billion deficit by adding a new tax bracket for six-figure incomes. In response to the proposal, he criticized Democrats for attempting to raise taxes in the midst of an extremely difficult economic situation.[52] Eventually, due in part to the efforts of House Speaker Margaret Kelliher, who was running for the 2010 Democratic nomination for governor of Minnesota, the General Assembly passed legislation approving nearly all the original unallotments.[53]
Funding projects
Since the Minnesota Constitution prohibits state-run gambling outside of Native territory, Pawlenty proposed negotiating with Minnesota's 11 tribes over profit-sharing of their casinos.[54] Legislators also pushed a proposal to turn Canterbury Park horse track into a racino.[55] The plan was poorly received by Northern Tribes who would operate part of the racino, citing reluctance to compete with other tribes.[56] Tribes with casinos opposed the expanded gambling and some legislators objected on moral grounds that the state shouldn't exploit problem gamblers. Politicians in heavy tribal areas feared losing campaign-finance sources if they supported the plan.[57][58] Delays by the Legislature ended with the bill being pulled from committee.[59] Tribes had spent millions lobbying legislatures in 2004.[60]
Pawlenty worked throughout 2006 to fund a Minnesota Twins baseball stadium in Minneapolis.[61] The resulting Minnesota Twins-Hennepin County ballpark bill called for an increased county sales tax which passed the state legislature and was symbolically signed in at the Hubert H. Humphrey Metrodome.[62][63] The majority of Hennepin County commissioners did not feel a referendum was necessary to approve the sales tax because of the delay it would cause. Pawlenty and the Legislature agreed, citing 10 years already of the project's debate, and exempted the county from state law requiring one in the bill.[64][65]
In June 2006, Pawlenty signed a $999.9-million public works bill that included funding for additional work on the Northstar Commuter rail line (a change in position from reservations about the idea he initially expressed), an expanded Faribault prison, a bioscience building at the University of Minnesota, and science facilities at Minnesota State University in Mankato. The bill also funded a $26-million expansion of the University of Minnesota's Carlson School of Management.[66]
In 2011, Pawlenty shut down an Islamic finance program, that was part of a larger program to increase home ownership in Minnesota, and his spokesperson said that the program accommodated the Muslim ban on interest.[67] Adam Sorensen from TIME questioned whether this was a case of double standards, pointing out New York's kosher food regulations, Blue Laws that prohibit alcohol sales on Sundays, and Pawlenty's own creation of "The Governor's Council On Faith-Based And Community Initiatives".[68]
Education
In the budget process, Pawlenty made an effort to preserve education funding while cutting other government spending. In 2009, he bolstered education funding using federal stimulus grants. Despite this, education funding fell from $9,700 to $8,400 per student (adjusted for inflation) during his tenure.[69] Pawlenty was an advocate for charter schools and was praised by the National Alliance for Public Charter Schools for his education policies. In 2010, the organization rated Minnesota #1 in the country for charter school promotion.[70]
Pawlenty oversaw the repeal of the Profile of Learning Kindergarten through 12th grade graduation requirements and sought to reinstate them during his governorship.[71] Renamed the Minnesota Academic Standards, they were guided by Department of Education commissioner Cheri Pierson Yecke. The bill's first draft raised several concerns by the education review boards including the amount of content, age-appropriateness, and a European-centric view of the social sciences portion.[72] Yecke revised and expanded material based on the response.[73] Even as both Legislative houses passed the Academic Standards bill, her confirmation as commissioner was rejected by the DFL majority Minnesota Senate.[74] She was seen as an outsider coming from Virginia and became unpopular for having pushed the academic reforms during a tight budget session as well as her critical look of Minnesota schools.[75] In her confirmation hearing, DFLers also noted concern over her conservative viewpoints.[75]
In June 2006, Pawlenty proposed the ACHIEVE program for the top 25% of high school graduates.[76] The program would pay for tuition for the first 2 years (4 years for selected fields such as science, technology, engineering and math) and would cost the state an estimated $112 million per 2-year cycle. However the program was not included in the 2007 higher education bill.[77]
Pawlenty used an accounting change called a tax shift to balance the state deficit without raising taxes. School districts statewide may unexpectedly lose $58 million in interest and reserve revenue.[78]
In 2010, Pawlenty vetoed a bill (HF 3164), which the legislature had passed 110 to 20, calling for Minnesota State Colleges & Universities (MnSCU) to revamp its credit transferring system within five years to fix "minimal loss of credits for transferring students" who had been losing between 10 and 30 percent of their credits.[79] Pawlenty found it "unnecessary" because MnSCU was fixing its system already "through internal actions and policy changes".[79]
Transportation




U.S. Representative Keith Ellison speaking at the site of the I-35W Mississippi River Bridge collapse in Minneapolis. He is flanked by Governor Pawlenty on the picture's left. To right: Mayor R. T. Rybak, Secretary of Transportation Mary Peters behind Ellison, Betty McCollum, and Senator Norm Coleman


During Pawlenty's first term, urban traffic congestion was a significant concern of voters. He appointed his lieutenant governor, Carol Molnau, as transportation commissioner, for which she was approved by the legislature in May 2004.[80] Molnau attempted to reform the transportation department, (Mn/DOT), using concepts such as "design-build". Legislators criticized Molnau's performance as transportation commissioner, citing ineffective leadership and management, and removed her from that role in February 2008, a decision Pawlenty said was motivated by partisanship.[80][81]
Pawlenty favored raising fees and imposing toll lanes on roads as the primary means of discouraging excessive traffic. During his term, the carpool lanes of Interstate 394 leading into downtown Minneapolis were converted into high-occupancy toll lanes. Pawlenty used or threatened vetoes in 2005, 2007 and 2008 on legislation funding proposed highway expansion, infrastructure repairs, road maintenance, and mass transit.[82] The 2008 veto was in spite of Pawlenty's announcement that he would consider reversing his opposition to a state gas-tax increase for funding road and bridge repairs, in the wake of the collapse of the I-35W Mississippi River bridge.[83]
Pawlenty had opposed the Northstar Commuter Rail as a legislator, but changed his position in 2004, announcing a funding plan to jump-start the project, when the Bush administration determined the rail line was deemed cost-effective and time-saving for commuters.[84]
In April 2008 during the budget bonding bill signing, Pawlenty used his line-item veto on $70 million pledged toward the building of the Central Corridor light-rail project, intended to connect Minneapolis and Saint Paul. In vetoing the expenditure, Pawlenty did not consult Peter Bell, head of the Metro Council and project leader.[85] Pawlenty stated that he vetoed the bill in order to send a message to the Legislature, which had exceeded his initial budget request, that they needed to "stay focused, be fiscally disciplined, set priorities and solve this budget crisis in a fiscally disciplined way."[86] Pawlenty however was supportive of the project and had requested the money in the bonding bill he submitted to the Minnesota State Legislature.[86] The veto disappointed some of Minnesota's congressional representatives in Washington, including Minnesota's Republican Senator Norm Coleman, who pledged to "raise my voice as strong as I can, as loud as I can. The federal commitment is there."[87] Though Pawlenty's veto might have delayed the ability of the state to receive federal matching funds for the project, Bell said the project was not derailed.[85] The Central Corridor funding issue was resolved on May 19, 2008, with the state pledging its original amount towards the project after legislators compromised with Pawlenty's budget requests.[88]
There were Republican state legislators who supported other cuts of the bonding bill, including Doug Magnus, the ranking Republican on the House Transportation Finance Division, who praised Pawlenty's "fiscal responsibility."[89] Critics, including Chris Coleman, Mayor of Saint Paul, called Pawlenty's veto "political gamesmanship," seeing the move as retribution for the Legislature's successful override of Pawlenty's veto of a transportation bonding bill.[86] They noted cuts overwhelmingly targeted Democratic districts, and Democratic stronghold Saint Paul most heavily.[90][91]
Crime
Crime in Minnesota was a high-profile political issue during Pawlenty's governorship. When crime rates in Minneapolis spiked 16 percent from 2004 to 2005, city officials blamed Pawlenty for large cuts to state aid, which they said restricted public safety resources. Pawlenty in turn criticized the capital city for poorly allocating its funding.[92]
Pawlenty made two large efforts to expand penalties for sexual offenders. In response to his first proposal in 2005, the state legislature passed a large package of sentencing reforms. One new instrument was the possibility of a life sentence without parole for serious offenders, although Pawlenty expressed disapproval at the courts' reluctance to use this option: only seven individuals received such a sentence in the first two years of implementation.[93] Pawlenty made a push for even harsher sentences in 2010, which increased the presumptive sentence for first-degree sex offenses from 12 years to 25 years and increased it further for repeat offenders. At the same time he advocated for a $90-million expansion of the state's civil commitment program for sexual offenders, maintaining that the increased criminal sentences would keep the commitment program's cost under control.[93] According to a single report in the Star Tribune, "A report on Minnesota's sex-offender program delivered to legislators in the final days of the Pawlenty administration was heavily edited by a top political appointee to reflect the former governor's skepticism about the effectiveness of treatment and to delete arguments for expanded community resources for offenders."[94]
Early in 2006, after issuing a study that estimated the cost of illegal immigration to the state as approximately $188 million, Pawlenty announced a program for changing the way the state dealt with persons who were in the United States illegally. Pawlenty said that the economic benefits of illegal immigration did not justify the illegal behavior.[95] Pawlenty's extensive proposal included the designation of 10 state law enforcement officials as the Minnesota Illegal Immigration Enforcement Team, "trained to question, detain and arrest suspected illegal immigrants" with a focus on "such crimes as human trafficking, identity theft, methamphetamine distribution and terrorism." He rounded out his proposal with tougher penalties for false identification, and instituting a fine of up to $5,000 for employers of illegal immigrants. His proposal was challenged by DFL senators who preferred increased legal immigration to punitive action.[96]
Energy policy and climate change




A United States Postal Service vehicle advertising its use of E85 fuel during the Saint Paul Winter Carnival parade in January 2007.


Minnesota has mandated a 10% mixture of gasoline and ethanol (gasohol) since 1997. Pawlenty signed into law in May 2005 a bill that will raise the minimum mandated mixture to 20% in 2013. Pawlenty has also lobbied the Governors' Ethanol Coalition to mandate higher ethanol use nationwide.[97]
Conservative Republican governors were not supportive of Pawlenty's presentation on clean energy to the governor's association, which he gave in cooperation with Ed Rendell, who was the governor of Pennsylvania and the National Governors Association's Democratic vice-chairman. With Kathleen Sebelius of Kansas, Pawlenty was co-chairman of the association's energy committee. The effort received "adamant opposition" from governors of petroleum (oil) producing states.[98]
In 2007, Governor Pawlenty signed the Next Generation Energy Act of 2007 into law and, along with six other Midwestern governors, the Midwestern Greenhouse Gas Accord. These directed state agencies to develop a plan to reduce greenhouse gases, and "develop a market-based and multi-sector cap-and-trade mechanism".[99] However, by 2009 Pawlenty had reversed his position and called cap-and-trade "overly bureaucratic" and a potential "disaster".[99] By 2011, Pawlenty's position had changed sufficiently to state "the weight of the evidence is that most of it, maybe all of it, is because of natural causes."[100]
Health
In 2004, Minnesota's Star Tribune newspaper opined that the credibility of Pawlenty's commissioner of health, Dianne Mandernach, suffered when a website posting by the department suggested that abortion might have a role in breast cancer. She also angered many when it was learned she had delayed releasing government research on cancer in miners. In 2007, Mandernach resigned.[101]
In 2005, Pawlenty asked a U.S. Senate subcommittee to allow his MinnesotaCare health plan to expand and continue allowing state residents and employees to import cheaper Canadian prescription drugs.[102]
In 2007, Pawlenty signed into law the 2007 Omnibus Health and Human Services Appropriations Bill, which provided funding for the Health Care Transformation Task Force, a panel of health care experts charged with exploring ways to reduce health care spending, improve quality, and ensure that Minnesota develops a universal health care plan by 2011.[103]
Later in his tenure he used health care funding cuts as a mechanism to balance the state budget. After years of assuring doctors that the state "sick tax" would be used only to fund health welfare programs, in 2009 Pawlenty recommended a 3% cut in physician reimbursements from the state and asked that the sick tax be put instead into the state's general budget.[104] Pawlenty used a line-item veto to remove $381 million from health and human services funding, a removal which could lead to 35,000 Minnesotans' losing their General Assistance Medical Care (GAMC) health insurance in 2011.[105] Hennepin County Medical Center—the largest provider of health care to Minnesota's poor and uninsured—closed two clinics, reduced its staff and reduced access to non-emergency services.[106] State Senator Linda Berglin wrote a bill that would extend GAMC funding.[107]
In 2010, he refused federal health care funds including more than $1 billion to expand the number of Minnesotans covered by Medicaid, $68 million for a high-risk insurance pool, $1 million to help set up an insurance exchange where consumers could shop for health coverage, and $850,000 for teenage pregnancy prevention. Pawlenty accepted a $500,000 abstinence-only sex-education grant that would require $350,000 in matching state money. Pawlenty said, "It doesn't say we have to apply for all of them."[108]
Foreign relations




Tim Pawlenty meeting Minnesota National Guard troops in Kosovo (April 12, 2008)


Pawlenty's first term coincided with the deployment of National Guardsmen from numerous states, connected with the War on Terror and the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan. During his two terms Pawlenty made trips to Iraq, Afghanistan, Bosnia, Kosovo, and Kuwait visiting Minnesota troops.[109]
Pawlenty was visited in 2004 by Mexican President Vicente Fox in talks to strengthen trade. Fox announced that his country would open a consulate in Minnesota the next year, removing the need for Mexican residents in the state to travel out of state for identification papers and other materials.[110] In mid-2006, in response to illegal immigration, Pawlenty sent Minnesota National Guardsmen to the U.S.–Mexico border at the request of the U.S. Department of Defense and the U.S. Department of Homeland Security.[111]
Pawlenty took a delegation of nearly 200 Minnesotan business, government, academic and civic leaders on a weeklong trip to China in mid-November 2005. The stated objectives were to provide a forum for companies to acquire market information, assess market potential, evaluate market entry strategies and identify potential business partners, as well as to promote Chinese investment in Minnesota.[112] Pawlenty also led Minnesota trade delegations to Canada in 2003,[113] Poland and the Czech Republic in 2004,[114] India in 2007,[113] and Israel in 2008.[109]
Other activities
Throughout his eight-year tenure, Pawlenty hosted a weekly one-hour radio show on WCCO-AM, a tradition he inherited from his predecessor as governor, Jesse Ventura.[115] Pawlenty was the chairman of the National Governors Association for the 2007–2008 term.[116] He also served as Chair of the Midwestern Governors Association in 2006.[117]
Beginning in 2005, Pawlenty was rumored in the press as a potential candidate for president of the United States.[118][119][120] When formally announcing his candidacy for a second term as Governor of Minnesota on May 31, 2006, Pawlenty said, "As to my future, if I run for governor and win, I will serve out my term for four years as governor."[121][122][123] On January 15, 2007, after being reelected, Pawlenty said, "I am committed to serving out my term as governor. That's what I am going to do."[124]
In 2007, it was announced that Pawlenty would be serving in a lead role for McCain as a national co-chair of his presidential exploratory committee[125] which led to Pawlenty's becoming co-chairman of McCain's campaign (along with Phil Gramm and Tom Loeffler).[126] In January 2008, a reporter for the Minneapolis Star Tribune suggested Pawlenty's renewed focus on his proposed immigration reform plans might be politically motivated as counterbalance to McCain's less favorable guest worker program.[127]
For many weeks, Pawlenty was widely considered to be a leading candidate for the vice-presidential nomination on the Republican ticket with John McCain in the 2008 presidential election.[128][129] In a surprise, McCain chose Alaska Governor Sarah Palin.[130]
In 2008, Pawlenty expressed support for the Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP). But in 2010 Pawlenty claimed that he had made those statements solely as a surrogate for presidential nominee McCain and never actually supported the idea himself.[131] On May 23, 2011, Pawlenty formally announced he'd run for the Republican presidential nomination, saying, “politicians are often afraid that if they're too honest, they might lose an election. I'm afraid that in 2012, if we're not honest enough, we may lose our country.”
2012 presidential campaign
Main article: Tim Pawlenty presidential campaign, 2012
Early steps
In February 2005, ABC News identified him as a potential candidate for president.[132] Pawlenty decided not to seek a third term as governor, and so was not a candidate in the November 2010 gubernatorial election.[133] In July 2009, Public Policy Polling conducted a poll that showed that President Obama was favored to win against Pawlenty in his home state of Minnesota by more than 10 points.[134] In October 2009, a CNN article suggested that Pawlenty was contemplating a 2012 White House bid.[135] Among those advising him in preparation for a potential presidential run was lobbyist and former Congressman Vin Weber.[136]
In late 2009, Pawlenty began taking steps that many saw as leading to a 2012 presidential bid.[137] He visited Iowa in November 2009 and April 2010, making political speeches.[138] In January 2011, the New York Times reported that "Few Americans, in fact, even know his name."[139] In January 2011, Pawlenty told the College Republicans group at The George Washington University "If I decide to run it would be for president, not vice president."[140][141]
Book tour and political positions




Pawlenty at a book signing in February 2011 in Phoenix, Arizona.


Pawlenty went on tour for his book Courage to Stand, and as of January 18, his book had reached #1,979 on Amazon.com's list of bestsellers.[142] Pawlenty calls himself a social conservative.[143] In his extended interview with Jon Stewart on The Daily Show, he said he thinks United States Social Security and Medicare need to be cut to balance the federal budget.[144] Pawlenty believes that state governments should outlaw abortion, except for cases of rape, incest, and to save a woman's life. He thinks the United States Supreme Court decided Roe v. Wade wrongly, abortion being a state, not a federal, matter. He opposes same-sex marriage and civil unions, and said on talk radio "... I have been a public supporter of maintaining Don't ask, don't tell and I would support reinstating it as well".[143]
In December 2010, Pawlenty was one of three U.S. governors who publicly declared solidarity with the Christian-right group Family Research Council.[145]
Pawlenty's tour was in Minneapolis, San Francisco and Dallas, and it ended January in Iowa where the Iowa Caucuses were scheduled for February 6, 2012. "That will come up fast," he said, "if I do run." In Minneapolis, speaking to Pat Kessler of WCCO-TV who asked about his feelings regarding a potential run for president by Representative Michele Bachmann, "I have a lot of respect for Michele Bachmann … Whether she runs or not, it's gonna be a big field. There's gonna be five, six, seven, eight people running … Whoever wants to run can run. The more, the merrier."[142]
In a December 2010 column in The Wall Street Journal, Pawlenty argued in favor of the historical benefits of "private sector" labor unions and strongly against "public sector" labor unions, whose collective bargaining rights he would like to see curbed: "The rise of the labor movement in the early 20th century was a triumph for America's working class. In an era of deep economic anxiety, unions stood up for hard-working but vulnerable families, protecting them from physical and economic exploitation." He also criticized modern unions: "The moral case for unions—protecting working families from exploitation—does not apply to public employment... Unionized public employees are making more money, receiving more generous benefits, and enjoying greater job security than the working families forced to pay for it with ever-higher taxes, deficits and debt."[146]
Candidacy
On March 21, 2011, Pawlenty announced, via Facebook, that he had formed an exploratory committee in preparation for a potential run for the 2012 Republican presidential nomination.[147][148]
On April 12, 2011, Pawlenty said clearly on CNN's Piers Morgan Tonight that he was "running for president" and not for vice president, adding that a formal announcement would be given in several weeks.[149] On Twitter, his spokesman said CNN took his comments out of context.[150]
On May 23, 2011, Pawlenty launched his candidacy for president in a speech in Iowa stating: "I'm going to try something a little unusual in politics. I'm just going to tell the truth."[151][152] A YouTube video[153] appeared a day before.[154] The Wall Street Journal wrote of his candidacy, and the luck he experienced in the GOP's field, that Pawlenty has a "golden chance to become the chief rival to... Mitt Romney".[155]
Pawlenty finished third in the Ames Straw Poll on August 13, 2011,[156] behind the winner Michele Bachmann and the runner-up Ron Paul. Before the Ames debate, he took a more aggressive stance against Romney, including the coining the term "Obamneycare".[157] When pressed by John King during CNN's June 13, 2011 debate to address why he used the word, he backed off.[158] However, he denied that he backed off.[159] The following day he announced his decision to withdraw from the presidential race.[160] On September 12, 2011, Pawlenty announced his endorsement of former Governor Mitt Romney of Massachusetts, as well as his position as national co-chair for Romney's campaign.[161] Romney retired over $400,000 of Pawlenty's campaign debt.[162]
Financial Services Roundtable
On September 20, 2012, Pawlenty's advisor Brian McClung announced to Associated Press that Pawlenty would resign as the co-chairman of Mitt Romney's electoral campaign. He was to head the Financial Services Roundtable (FSR), a financial service industry lobby group in Washington, D.C. He would not be running in the 2014 gubernatorial election in Minnesota nor in the state's 2014 senatorial election.[163] He assumed the positions of President & CEO. He replaced Steve Bartlett, a former U.S. Representative from Texas who had held the positions since 1999.[164]
In November 2012, Pawlenty said that "Republicans and Democrats will have to reconcile their differences on spending and taxes because the 'walls of reality are closing in on them'" relative to the federal government's looming "fiscal cliff". Presenting himself as not from Wall Street or from Washington and, having previously criticized “entrenched financial interests”, he said he could "bring a fresh and new voice to those debates”. He also "refuted assertions that implementation of the Dodd-Frank Act, legislation enacted roughly 27 months [earlier] in response to the financial crisis, ha[d] been delayed because of lobbying".[165]
Personal life




Tim Pawlenty with his wife, Mary


Pawlenty and his wife Mary have two daughters, Anna and Mara. Mary was appointed as a judge of the Dakota County District Court in Hastings, Minnesota, in 1994. After he was elected governor in 2002, the family remained at their Eagan home instead of moving into the Governor's residence because of his wife's requirement to live in her judicial district.[166] In 2007, she left her judicial position to become General Counsel of the National Arbitration Forum, a dispute-resolution company based in Minneapolis.[167] She stayed on only briefly before departing for another dispute-resolution company, the Gilbert Mediation Center.[168]
Pawlenty was raised a Roman Catholic. His conversion to an Evangelical Protestant faith has been attributed to his wife Mary, who is a member of Wooddale Church in Eden Prairie, Minnesota,[169] a member congregation of the Minnesota Baptist Conference. In a January 2011 interview, Mr. Pawlenty stated, "I love and respect and admire the Catholic Church. I still attend Mass once in a while there. The church I now attend is an interdenominational church which has got many former Catholics in it, and so we share the Christian faith and the Bible. I had to reconcile my faith life with my wife so we could have a consistent, integrated family faith life."[170]
Pawlenty frequently uses (and is referred to by) the mononym "TPaw" or "T-Paw".[171][172][173]
Public image
Political views
Pawlenty is generally considered a conservative on the American political spectrum. With regard to his economic record, he has drawn mixed reviews from fiscally conservative interest groups.[174] The lobbying group Taxpayers League of Minnesota gave Pawlenty an average approval score of 80% during his years as a state legislator, while the Cato Institute think-tank gave him scores ranging from C to A across his eight years as governor.[70] In February 2008, Washington Post columnist Robert Novak wrote that Pawlenty was the most conservative Minnesota governor since Governor Theodore Christianson in the 1920s.[98] A 2011 white paper by the Club for Growth, analyzing Pawlenty as a presidential candidate, found his political stance difficult to identify. The group praised him for reduced growth in spending and taxation, but found that he "has some simply inexcusable tax hikes in his record" and questioned his support of proposals such as "mandatory vegetable oil in gasoline, cap and trade, and a statewide smoking ban."[70] Chris Edwards, a director at Cato, speculated that Pawlenty's rightward tack in his second term was related to his impending presidential run.[174]
Approval ratings
In April 2009, 46% of Minnesotans approved of Pawlenty, while 40% disapproved.[175] Among registered Republicans nationwide in July 2009, 38% had a favorable view of him while 33% didn't according to a Rasmussen Reports survey.[176] In March 2010 42% of Minnesotans approved of Pawlenty, while 52% disapproved.[177]
In October 2010 a Rasmussen report showed that Pawlenty had a 49% approval rating among Minnesotans with 49% disapproving.[178] A March 2011 survey by Gallup stated that Pawlenty began his Presidential run with only 41% name recognition in the GOP.[179] Also in March 2011, the Public Policy Polling (PPP) agency found that nationwide voters had a net negative view of Pawlenty, with 15% viewing him favorably verses 33% unfavorably.[180] In a 2011 PPP poll of registered Minnesota voters conducted from May 27–30, 42% of Minnesotans had a favorable opinion of Pawlenty, while 52% had an unfavorable opinion of him. In the presidential race, President Obama lead Pawlenty by 51% to 43%, suggesting Pawlenty could lose his home state to President Obama were he the 2012 GOP nominee.[181]
Electoral history

Minnesota District 38B state representative elections, 1992–2000

Year
Republican
DFL
Constitution
Total
Source


 
 
 


Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %


1992
Tim Pawlenty
9,610
49.1%
Linda Rother
8,773
44.8%
James Russell McMahon
253
1.3%
19,583
[18]


1994
Tim Pawlenty
12,172
81.0%
None
None
15,022
[182]


1996
Tim Pawlenty
14,747
74.4%
None
None
19,822
[183]


1998
Tim Pawlenty
9,118
48.5%
Leo Brisbois
7,819
41.6%
None
18,809
[184]


2000
Tim Pawlenty
13,779
59.6%
Gary Moore
7,239
31.3%
None
23,100
[185]



Minnesota gubernatorial elections, 2002–2006

Year
Republican
DFL
Independence
Green
Total
Source


 
 
 
 


Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %


2002
Tim Pawlenty
999,473
43.8%
Roger Moe
821,268
36.0%
Tim Penny
364,534
16.0%
Ken Pentel
50,589
2.2%
2,282,860
[26]


2006
Tim Pawlenty
1,028,568
46.4%
Mike Hatch
1,007,460
45.4%
Peter Hutchinson
141,735
6.4%
Ken Pentel
10,800
0.5%
2,217,818
[186]


References


^ Baenen, Jeff. "Minnesota Pronunciation Guide". Associated Press in Minnesota. Retrieved July 4, 2011. 
^ Streitfeld, Rachel (August 12, 2012). "Ryan's clandestine journey to Romney's ticket went from 'surreal to real'". CNN. Retrieved 2012-08-15. 
^ Knox, Olivier (September 20, 2012). "Pawlenty quits as Romney campaign co-chair". Yahoo! News. 
^ a b Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Tim Pawlenty". wargs.com. 
^ a b c Davey, Monica (August 7, 2008). "Pawlenty Looks to National Stage". The New York Times. Retrieved June 1, 2011. 
^ a b c d "Campaign 2002: Governor Tim Pawlenty". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Jim Walsh (January 28, 2004). "Grant Hart recalls his old classmate, Tim Pawlenty". City Pages. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Sharpiro, Walter. "The Tragedy of Tim Pawlenty: He did everything right. And that was the problem". The New Republic. Retrieved July 26, 2011. 
^ Political Science Dept of College of Liberal Arts (July 5, 2008). "PoliSci Alumni". University of Minnesota. 
^ "Empowered with a New Degree, Class of '08 Sets Forth – 120th Commencement Ceremony". University of Minnesota Law School. February 11, 2008. 
^ Melo, Frederick (January 5, 2007). "Mary Pawlenty leaves bench—First Lady will be top counsel for mediation firm". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ "Pawlenty Biography". 2012 Republican Candidates: Comparing the 2012 Republican Candidates. Retrieved July 26, 2011. 
^ "Main page". Wizmo. 
^ a b Tom Squitieri (November 7, 2002). "His plans changed, but message didn't". USA TODAY. 
^ "What's next for Tim Pawlenty?". MinnPost. September 8, 2008. Retrieved September 10, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (July 16, 2003). "DFLer slams "Grunseth groupies"". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ State Senator Sandra L. Pappas (July 21, 2003). "Legislators Call for Full and Complete Disclosure from Governor Pawlenty" (Press release). MN State Legislature press release (via Internet Archive). Archived from the original on September 19, 2004. 
^ a b Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1992. p. 146. 
^ Sherman, Amy (October 16, 1998). "38B candidates' ideas differ on surplus, education; incumbent faces unusual challenge". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ "Legislators Past and Present". Minnesota Legislative Reference Library. Retrieved August 23, 2007. 
^ Laura McCallum (June 12, 2002). "Campaign 2002 profile: Brian Sullivan". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Smith, Dane (April 19, 2001). "Cheney advises Pawlenty not to run for Senate; Majority leader bows to request from White House". Star Tribune. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (September 13, 2002). "Tim Pawlenty". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ a b c Grant, Ashley; Associated Press (November 6, 2002). "Pawlenty elected Minnesota governor—Republican breaks out of three-way race". Grand Forks Herald. p. A-05. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ Coleman, Toni et al. (January 5, 2003). "Your guide to the 2003 legislature: issues to watch". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A8. CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
"Major Minnesota issues". Grand Forks Herald. Associated Press. January 5, 2003. p. A-07. 
^ a b Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2002. pp. 322–325. 
^ Hohmann, James. "Once a goalie, Tim Pawlenty plays offense". Politico. Capitol News. Retrieved April 20, 2011. 
^ Laura McCallum (June 2, 2006). "Pawlenty accepts Republican endorsement for re-election". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Laura McCallum (November 8, 2006). "Hatch concedes; Pawlenty barely wins re-election". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Britt Robson (January 19, 2005). "Minnesota Eats Itself Another Pawlenty budget, another round of bloodletting". City Pages. Retrieved August 31, 2008. 
^ "Historical expenditures: General fund and all funds" (PDF). Minnesota Management and Budget Department. March 2011. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty said he brought Minnesota state spending growth down 'to about 1.7 percent per year.'". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. April 1, 2011. 
^ a b "PoliGraph: Pawlenty spending claim lacks context". MPR News. Minnesota Public Radio. January 27, 2011. 
^ Sharpiro, Walter. "The Tragedy of TIm Pawlenty: He Did Everything Right. And That's The Problem". The New Republic. Retrieved July 27, 2011. 
^ a b Salisbury, Bill (June 1, 2003). "Pawlenty wins, but risks attached – his no-new-taxes pledge may become a liability later". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ a b Scheck, Tom (September 24, 2009). "Pawlenty downplaying budget deficit predictions". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 24, 2009. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty said in 2009, 'we cut state spending in real terms for the first time in 150 years'". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. April 12, 2011. 
^ AEI said "billion", an error see original: Carlson, Arne (May 23, 2011). "The Presidency: A Bit Short Is Pawlenty". Blogspot. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Ornstein, Norman J. (May 25, 2011). "GOP Presidential Candidates Affect Agenda". American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy Research. Retrieved May 25, 2011. 
^ Wyler, Grace (May 23, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty Launches Campaign As The GOP Default Candidate". Business Insider. Retrieved May 25, 2011. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (May 23, 2011). "George's Bottom Line". ABC News. Retrieved June 9, 2011. 
^ Black, Eric (May 5, 2010). "Supreme Court overrules Pawlenty on unallotments". MinnPost. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Scheck, Tom (October 29, 2009). "Lawsuit challenges Pawlenty's budget cuts". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved October 30, 2009. 
^ Grow, Doug (December 31, 2009). "Unallotment ruling may have turned Minnesota's recent political gridlock into new political chaos". MinnPost. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ David Lillehaug and Mike McIntee (December 30, 2009). Atty David Lillehaug: Court ruling huge political setback for Gov. Pawlenty. The UpTake via MinnPost. Event occurs at 1:22. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ McIntee, Mike (December 31, 2009). Pawlenty To Appeal Unallotment Ruling. The UpTake via Twin Cities Daily Planet. Event occurs at 1:30. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ Shaw, Charley (February 9, 2010). "Pawlenty in appellate brief says he legally unalloted the budget". Politics in Minnesota. Retrieved February 9, 2010. 
^ Helgeson, Baird (February 9, 2010). "Pawlenty defends budget cuts". Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Scheck, Tom (March 15, 2010). "State's budget in hands of Supreme Court". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved March 15, 2010. 
^ Magnuson, Eric J. (May 5, 2010). "State of Minnesota in Supreme Court: A10-64" (PDF). Minnesota Judicial Branch. Archived from the original (PDF) on May 5, 2010. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Kimball, Joe (May 5, 2010). "Pawlenty responds to ruling on unallotment, urges Legislature to back his cuts". MinnPost. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (May 12, 2010). "Budget clock is ticking at the Capitol—After veto, talks deadlock and DFL calls on Pawlenty to take the lead". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Sturdevant, Lori (May 23, 2010). "Now on the trail, loaded with legislative baggage—Kelliher bears the weight of her position, while Emmer's burdens are largely of his own making". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Michael Khoo (February 5, 2004). "Pawlenty's speech puts focus on gambling". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ T.W. Budig (April 3, 2003). "Canterbury racino legislation advances in House; Pawlenty cool to more gambling". ECM Capitol Roundup. Archived from the original on May 10, 2003. 
^ Becky Glander (February 5, 2005). "Some angered at racino proposal". University Chronicle. Archived from the original on March 1, 2009. 
^ Andrew Tellijohn (March 7, 2003). "Canterbury chasing jackpot with 'racino'". Minneapolis / St. Paul Business Journal. 
^ "Indian Country is in the midst of political awakening". October 11, 2004. Retrieved December 3, 2007. 
^ Michael Khoo (May 17, 2005). "Casino issue is dying, if not dead, at Capitol". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Native American casinos". Indianz. May 23, 2005. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ "Pawlenty's talks on Twins stadium yield no action". Associated Press/MPR. January 11, 2006. 
^ Twins ballpark: What's next?. May 26, 2006. 
^ "Votetracker Minnesota Twins stadium". Minnesota Public Radio. 2006. 
^ Tom Scheck; Brandt Williams (May 22, 2006). "Twins' stadium opponents were tired of the fight; supporters weren't". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Brandt Williams (April 25, 2005). "Pohlad: Contribution to Twins ballpark 'fair, substantial'". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Legislature passes $1 billion public works bill". St. Paul Pioneer Press. June 2006. Archived from the original on March 12, 2007. Retrieved June 26, 2006. 
^ Montopoli, Brian (March 25, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty: I shut down Sharia loan program". CBS News. 
^ "Is There a Double Standard in Tim Pawlenty's Disavowal of Sharia-Compliant Mortgages?". TIME. March 25, 2011. 
^ "Mark Dayton says Gov. Tim Pawlenty cut education spending". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. July 29, 2010. 
^ a b c "2012 Presidential White Paper #2: Former Minnesota Governor Tim Pawlenty" (PDF). Club for Growth. May 24, 2011. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (December 22, 2010). "'Binge buster'—In two terms as governor, Tim Pawlenty put the brakes on state spending and set Minnesota on a path to fiscal austerity. But critics say he simply kicked budget problems down the road.". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Laura McCallum (October 31, 2003). "Social studies standards face more heat". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (December 19, 2003). "Yecke unveils second try at social studies, science standards". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Sara Evans and Lisa Norling (November 2004). "What Happened in Minnesota?". Organization of American Historians newsletter. Archived from the original on August 3, 2008. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ a b Pugmire, Tim (May 16, 2004). "Yecke blasts Minnesota's political climate for vote to oust her". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ Tim Pugmire (June 27, 2006). "Good grades would mean free college under Pawlenty plan". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Art Hughes (May 7, 2007). "Dream Act dies under threat of Pawlenty veto". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Fitzgerald, John (October 1, 2009). "Schools to Pay Millions to Cover Governor's IOU". Minnesota 2020. Retrieved July 2, 2011. 
^ a b Schumacher, Lawrence (May 3, 2010). "Pawlenty nixes college student credit transfer fix". Twin Cities Daily Planet. Retrieved May 3, 2010. 
^ a b Anderson, G. R. Jr. (February 28, 2008). "One head finally rolls". MinnPost.com. MinnPost. Retrieved February 29, 2008. 
^ Saulny, Susan (February 29, 2008). "Minnesota Transportation Chief Is Out". The New York Times. The New York Times Company. Retrieved February 29, 2008. 
^ "State House approves gas tax hike". KSTP. 2007. Retrieved August 3, 2007. 
^ Jackson, Henry C.; Mark Scolforo (August 4, 2007). "8 Reported Missing in Bridge Collapse". Washington Post. 
^ Laura McCallum (August 3, 2004). "Pawlenty finds money to jumpstart North Star rail line". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ a b Sturdevant, Lori (April 12, 2008). "Working toward the train in vain". Minneapolis Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. [permanent dead link]
^ a b c Yuen, Laura; Tom Scheck (April 7, 2008). "Pawlenty delivers a setback to the Central Corridor project". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ "Coleman: Disappointed By Gov. Vetoing LRT Money". Associated Press. April 10, 2008. Archived from the original on March 1, 2009. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Tom Weber (May 19, 2008). "Central Corridor planning moves forward". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Kaszuba, Mike (April 18, 2008). "Met Council head is in a political bind". www.startribune.com. Archived from the original on April 2, 2015. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Salisbury, Bill. "Vetoes not political? (The Political Animal)". blogs.twincities.com. Archived from the original on April 14, 2008. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Scheck, Tom (April 7, 2008). "MPR: St. Paul officials: What does Pawlenty have against us?". minnesota.publicradio.org. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Stassen-Berger, Rachel E. (June 26, 2006). "When crime jumps, politicos trade blame: experts say one elected official can't do much to raise—or lower—crime rates". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ a b Hoppin, Jason (February 10, 2010). "Pawlenty: Time to get tougher on sex crimes – Some offenders would get 25 years; others, even more". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ Ludeman, Cal (February 7, 2011). "Details on sex offender program deleted". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on April 2, 2015. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Jim Lehrer (March 22, 2006). "MINNESOTA'S IMMIGRATION DEBATE". Twin Cities Public Broadcasting. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (January 4, 2006). "Illegal immigration a 'real issue': Pawlenty defends crackdown, but not all agree with tactics". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ McCallum, Laura (September 26, 2005). "Pawlenty pumps ethanol". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 6, 2007. 
^ a b Novak, Robert (February 28, 2008). "How Not to Run for Vice President". The Washington Post. The Washington Post Company. Retrieved February 28, 2008. 
^ a b "Pawlenty’s Political Climate Change". Fact-Check.org. 
^ herb, jeremy (August 4, 2011). "Remarks highlight Pawlenty's climate shift". minneapolis star tribune. Retrieved August 10, 2012. 
^ Powell, Joy; Lopez, Patricia (August 22, 2007). "State health commissioner resigns". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on March 2, 2009. Retrieved January 12, 2008. 
^ Tom Scheck (February 16, 2005). "Measuring the success of Canadian drug imports". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 12, 2008. 
^ "The Kaiser Commission on Medicaid and the Uninsured" (PDF). The Henry J. Kaiser Family Foundation. Archived from the original (PDF) on February 4, 2011. Retrieved March 16, 2011. 
^ "Pawlenty uses veto power to cut health care". Mnmed.org. Retrieved October 31, 2010. [permanent dead link]
^ Scheck, Tom (May 15, 2009). "Pawlenty, lawmakers remain at odds over budget issues". Minnesota Public Radio News. Retrieved June 2, 2009. 
^ Williams, Chris (Associated Press) (November 18, 2009). "HCMC approves big cuts in 2010 budget". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved November 19, 2009. 
^ McIntee, Mike (February 9, 2010). "Vets To Feel Governor Pawlenty's GAMC Cuts". The Uptake. Archived from the original on August 6, 2014. Retrieved February 10, 2010. 
^ Marcotty, Josephine & Stassen-Berger, Rachel E. (September 1, 2010). "Pawlenty restricts health money". Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ a b Salisbury, Bill (October 18, 2008). "Governor will lead trade group to Israel". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Ragsdale, Jim; Welbes, John (June 19, 2004). "Fox promises consulate—Mexico president expresses wish to aid countrymen in Minnesota". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ 200 National Guard members to patrol Mexican border | Minnesota Public Radio News
^ Bjorhus, Jennifer (November 14, 2005). "Pawlenty courts Chinese investors – TRADE: Economic ties take a new direction as the Chinese begin looking for places to invest". Duluth News-Tribune. 
^ a b Smith, Dane (January 30, 2007). "Pawlenty plans trade mission to India". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on June 8, 2008. Retrieved January 30, 2007. 
^ Lopez, Patricia (June 22, 2004). "Pawlenty's trade mission—Poland and the Czech Republic: Pawlenty praises Poland's 'bright future'". Star Tribune. 
^ Von Sternberg, Bob (November 13, 2010). "Gov. Tim Pawlenty: Signing off". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on November 20, 2010. 
^ "Initiatives of NGA chairs". National Governors Association. 
^ "Past Chairs". Midwestern Governors Association. Archived from the original on May 1, 2013. 
^ Ambinder, Marc (February 9, 2005). "Conservatives Say Pawlenty Is Potential Presidential Candidate". ABC News. 
^ Will, George F. (February 24, 2008). "The Running Mate McCain Needs". The Washington Post. p. B07. 
^ Martin, Jonathan (February 17, 2008). "Steadfast McCain ally sparks veep talk". Politico. 
^ "Gov. Pawlenty announces re-election bid (feature audio)". MPR News. Minnesota Public Radio. May 31, 2006. 
^ Black, Eric; Tice, D.J. (March 14, 2007). "Pawlenty for veep: Will he or won't he?". Star Tribune. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty Announces re-election campaign (video)". WCCO-TV. May 31, 2006. Archived from the original on February 9, 2013. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ Black, Eric (February 18, 2008). "How did veep talk go so far without Pawlenty's pledge coming up?". MinnPost. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty to co-chair McCain '08 exploratory committee". KARE. Associated Press. January 15, 2007. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Pugmire, Tim (January 9, 2008). "Presidential campaigns raise volume in Minnesota". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved January 10, 2008. 
^ Hopfensperger, Jean (January 7, 2008) [updated February 5, 2008]. "Is Pawlenty's plan for immigration aimed at a VP slot?". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on January 27, 2008. Retrieved July 13, 2008. 
^ "McCain Selects His Running Mate". FOXNews.com. August 28, 2008. Archived from the original on 2008-11-02. Retrieved August 28, 2008. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty: McCain's Vice President?". Huffingtonpost.com. January 8, 2008. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ "McCain taps Alaska Gov. Palin as vice president pick". CNN Politics. CNN. August 29, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty says he never backed bailout in 2008". Politico Live. January 16, 2011. 
^ Ambinder, Marc (February 9, 2005). "Conservatives Say Pawlenty Is Potential Presidential Candidate". ABC News. Retrieved April 3, 2011. 
^ Kendra Marr (December 17, 2010). "Tim Pawlenty's regret: No third term". Politico. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ "Obama easily outpolls Pawlenty, Palin" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. July 10, 2009. Retrieved May 3, 2010. 
^ "Pawlenty rolls out new health care proposals". CNN. October 13, 2009. Retrieved May 25, 2010. 
^ Foster, Daniel (January 27, 2011). "Pence Out, Republican Presidential Field Open". National Review. 
^ Jonathan Martin (October 1, 2009). "Pawlenty preps 2012 campaign team". Politico. Retrieved June 3, 2010. 
^ "Pawlenty in Iowa: Republican party must unite to take power from Democrats | Des Moines Register Staff Blogs". Blogs.desmoinesregister.com. October 27, 2010. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ Peters, Jeremy (January 29, 2011). "Political Blogs Are Ready to Flood Campaign Trail". The New York Times. 
^ Kendra Marr (January 14, 2011). "Pawlenty: No VP thoughts this time". Politico. Retrieved January 14, 2011. 
^ Davenport, Reid (January 18, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty: If I run, it will be for the presidency". The GW Hatchet. The George Washington University. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ a b Weiner, Jay (January 18, 2011). "In campaign-like appearance, Pawlenty shows off 'Courage to Stand' ... and to sit, signing books". MinnPost. Retrieved January 18, 2011. 
^ a b Bryan Fischer and Tim Pawlenty. AFA's Bryan Fischer Interviews Tim Pawlenty. YouTube (Google). Retrieved January 17, 2011. 
^ Exclusive – Tim Pawlenty Extended Interview (Episode #16007). The Daily Show (Comedy Partners). January 12, 2010. Retrieved January 17, 2011. 
^ Duffy, J.P. (December 15, 2010). "FRC, Members of Congress, Governors, and Conservative Leaders Release Open Letter Calling for Civil Debate, End to Character Assassination". Retrieved January 30, 2011. 
^ Pawlenty, Tim (December 13, 2010). "Government Unions vs. Taxpayers". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Marr, Kendra (March 21, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty forms 2012 presidential exploratory committee". Politico. Retrieved March 21, 2011. 
^ Camia, Catalina (March 21, 2011). "Pawlenty launches committee to explore White House bid". USA Today. Retrieved March 21, 2011. 
^ Aliyah Shahid (April 13, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty to CNN's Piers Morgan: 'I'm running for President,' spokesman walks it back". Daily News (New York). Retrieved January 13, 2012.  and in context Tim Pawlenty Tells Piers Morgan: "I'm Running For President". CNN via PoliticsNewsNews via YouTube (Google). Retrieved April 15, 2011. 
^ "@CNN report of @TimPawlenty on @piersmorgan is out of context. Obviously, Pawlenty has exploratory committee to run for President. Not VP," wrote Alex Conant, his spokesman, in Wallbank, Derek (April 12, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty accidentally confirms the obvious, then walks it back". MinnPost. Retrieved April 15, 2011. 
^ "Real change is about telling hard truths". USA Today. May 23, 2011. 
^ Pawlenty 'betting it all on Iowa' in presidential run. KARE-TV. Multimedia KARE. May 23, 2011. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Tim Pawlenty – A Time for Truth (Preview of Monday's Announcement). YouTube (Google). May 22, 2011. Retrieved May 22, 2011. 
^ Shear, Michael (May 22, 2011). "Pawlenty Announces Candidacy a Day Early". The New York Times. Retrieved May 22, 2011. 
^ Seib, Gerald F. (May 23, 2011). "Is America Ready for President TPaw?". The Wall Street Journal. Dow Jones. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Reinhard, Beth (August 13, 2011). "Bachmann Boom; TPaw Bust?". National Journal. Archived from the original on October 25, 2011. Retrieved August 14, 2011. 
^ "PolitiFact: Obamacare was patterned after (Mitt Romney's) plan in Massachusetts". August 12, 2011. Retrieved August 9, 2012. 
^ Lucy Madison (June 14, 2011). "Will backing off "Obamneycare" in GOP debate hurt Pawlenty's campaign?". CBS News. Retrieved November 2, 2012. 
^ Jens Manuel Krogstad (June 14, 2011). "Pawlenty decision to back off "Obamneycare" criticism questioned". Des Moined Register. Retrieved November 2, 2012. 
^ Bakst, Brian (August 14, 2011). "Ex-Minn. Gov. Tim Pawlenty ends White House bid". The Huffington Post. Associated Press. Retrieved August 14, 2011. 
^ Memoli, Michael (2011-09-12). "Tim Pawlenty backs former rival Mitt Romney for president". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved 2011-09-12. 
^ Parker, Ashley & Barbaro, Michael (July 17, 2012). "Caution, Not Flash, as Romney Seeks His No. 2". New York Times. Retrieved July 18, 2012. 
^ "Mitt Romney loses Tim Pawlenty as campaign co-chair 45 days before election", newsday.com.
^ "Roundtable Management" Archived November 15, 2012, at the Wayback Machine., FSR webpage. Retrieved 2012-11-08.
^ Orol, Ronald D., "Pawlenty: ‘Walls of reality’ closing on Congress", MarketWatch, November 7, 2012. Retrieved 2012-11-08.
^ Art Hughes (November 6, 2002). "Pawlenty sets stage for a Capitol revolution". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Mary Pawlenty leaves bench for new job". Minnesota Public radio. Associated Press. January 4, 2007. 
^ "Minn. First Lady to Join Gilbert Mediation Center". wcco.com. Associated Press. September 2007. Archived from the original on May 18, 2008. 
^ "Tim (Timothy J.) Pawlenty". Minnesota Historical Society. 
^ Lewis, Matt (January 2011). "Tim Pawlenty on Michele Bachmann, Michael Steele . . . and Hockey". Politics Daily. Retrieved May 16, 2011. 
^ Todd, Chuck; Murray, Mark; Montanaro, Domenico (May 23, 2011). "2012: Daniels is out, T-Paw and Cain are in". First Read. MSNBC. Archived from the original on May 28, 2011. 
^ "Who's afraid of Mitt and T-Paw...". Front Row Washington. Reuters. May 20, 2011. 
^ Antle, W. James III (May 23, 2011). "TPaw and TARP, Cont'd". The American Spectator. 
^ a b "Pawlenty: An economic pro or crafty budget setter?". Fox News. Associated Press. May 25, 2011. 
^ "Klobuchar Approval Rating Highest PPP Has Found in Last Year" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. April 16, 2009. 
^ "Palin At The Top – And Bottom – for GOP Voters in 2012 – Rasmussen Reports". Rasmussen Reports. July 7, 2009. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ "SurveyUSA News Poll #16315". SurveyUSA. March 3, 2010. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ "Election 2010: Minnesota Governor". Rasmussen Reports, LLC. October 22, 2010. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ "Pawlenty Begins Race With 41% GOP Name Recognition". Gallup. March 23, 2011. 
^ "Voters tepid toward Obama, but favor him over GOP". Public Policy Polling. March 16, 2011. 
^ "Obama a lock in Minnesota" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. June 6, 2011. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1994. p. 145. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1996. pp. 155–156. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1998. pp. 142–143. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2000. p. 481. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2006. pp. 456–463. 


External links



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Tim Pawlenty.




Biography portal
Minnesota portal
Politics portal




Tim Pawlenty at Minnesota Legislators Past & Present

Profile at Project Vote Smart
Financial information (federal office) at the Federal Election Commission
Appearances on C-SPAN
Campaign contributions at Follow the Money (U.S. House)
Campaign 2002 – Minnesota Governor Minnesota Public Radio
Campaign 2006 – Tim Pawlenty Minnesota Public Radio



Minnesota House of Representatives


Preceded by
Art Seaberg
Member of the Minnesota House of Representatives
from District 38B
1993–2003
Succeeded by
Lynn Wardlow


Preceded by
Ted Winter
Majority Leader of the Minnesota House of Representatives
1999–2003
Succeeded by
Erik Paulsen


Party political offices


Preceded by
Norm Coleman
Republican nominee for Governor of Minnesota
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Emmer


Political offices


Preceded by
Jesse Ventura
Governor of Minnesota
2003–2011
Succeeded by
Mark Dayton


Preceded by
Janet Napolitano
Chair of National Governors Association
2007–2008
Succeeded by
Ed Rendell








v
t
e


Governors of Minnesota



Territorial (1849–58)



Ramsey
Gorman
Medary








State (since 1858)



Sibley
Ramsey
Swift
Miller
Marshall
Austin
Davis
Pillsbury
Hubbard
McGill
Merriam
Nelson
Clough
Lind
Van Sant
Johnson
Eberhart
Hammond
Burnquist
Preus
Christianson
Olson
Petersen
Benson
Stassen
Thye
Youngdahl
E. Anderson
Freeman
Andersen
Rolvaag
LeVander
W. Anderson
Perpich
Quie
Perpich
Carlson
Ventura
Pawlenty
Dayton












v
t
e


Chairs of the National Governors Association






Willson
McGovern
Walsh
Spry
Capper
Harrington
Allen
Sproul
Cox
Trinkle
Brewster
McMullen
Dern
Case
Pollard
Rolph
McNutt
Peery
Cochran
Stark
Vanderbilt
Stassen
O'Conor
Saltonstall
Maw
Martin
Caldwell
Hildreth
Hunt
Lane
Carlson
Lausche
Peterson
Shivers
Thornton
Kennon
Langlie
Stanley
Stratton
Collins
Boggs
McNichols
Powell
Rosellini
Anderson
Sawyer
Reed
Guy
Volpe
Ellington
Love
Hearnes
Moore
Mandel
Evans
Rampton
Ray
Andrus
Askew
Milliken
Carroll
Bowen
Busbee
Snelling
Matheson
J. Thompson
Carlin
Alexander
Clinton
Sununu
Baliles
Branstad
Gardner
Ashcroft
Romer
Campbell
Dean
T. Thompson
Miller
Voinovich
Carper
Leavitt
Glendening
Engler
Patton
Kempthorne
Warner
Huckabee
Napolitano
Pawlenty
Rendell
Douglas
Manchin
Gregoire
Heineman
Markell
Fallin
Hickenlooper
Herbert
McAuliffe
Sandoval












v
t
e


Minnesota House Majority Leaders






W. Dunn
Wilson
Rockne
Rines
Wm. Nolan
Girling
Wi. Norton
McDonough
R. Dunn
Eastvold
R. Dunn
Cina
Dirlam
Lindstrom
Anderson
Knickerbocker
Eken
Sieben
Levi
Vanasek
Wynia
Long
Welle
Anderson
Carruthers
Winter
Pawlenty
Paulsen
Sertich
Dean
Murphy
Peppin















v
t
e


(2008 ←)    United States presidential election, 2012    (→ 2016)






United States elections, 2012
Fundraising
National polls
Statewide polls (pre-2012, early 2012)
Timeline
General election debates
Newspaper endorsements
International reactions
Hurricane Sandy





Democratic Party

Convention
Primaries

Newspaper endorsements





Incumbent nominee: Barack Obama

campaign
endorsements
positions


Incumbent VP nominee: Joe Biden

positions




Challengers: Bob Ely
Keith Judd
Warren Mosler
Darcy Richardson
Jim Rogers
Vermin Supreme
Randall Terry
John Wolfe





Republican Party

Convention
Primaries
Debates

Statewide polls
National polls

Straw polls

Newspaper endorsements





Nominee: Mitt Romney

campaign
endorsements
positions


VP nominee: Paul Ryan

positions




Candidates: Michele Bachmann (campaign)
Herman Cain (campaign)
Jack Fellure
Newt Gingrich (campaign)
Stewart Greenleaf
Jon Huntsman (campaign)
Gary Johnson (campaign)
Fred Karger
Andy Martin
Thaddeus McCotter (campaign)
Jimmy McMillan
Roy Moore
Ron Paul (campaign)
Tim Pawlenty (campaign)
Rick Perry (campaign)
Buddy Roemer (campaign)
Rick Santorum (campaign)





Libertarian Party

Convention
Primaries





Nominee: Gary Johnson

campaign
positions


VP nominee: Jim Gray


Candidates: Jim Duensing
R. J. Harris
Carl Person
Sam Sloan
R. Lee Wrights





Green Party

Convention





Nominee: Jill Stein (campaign)
VP nominee: Cheri Honkala


Candidates: Stewart Alexander
Roseanne Barr
Kent Mesplay










Other third-party and independent candidates



American Independent Party



Nominee Tom Hoefling


Candidates Wiley Drake
Virgil Goode (campaign)
Edward C. Noonan
Laurie Roth





American Third Position Party



Nominee Merlin Miller
VP nominee Virginia Abernethy





America's Party



Nominee Tom Hoefling





Constitution Party

Convention





Nominee Virgil Goode (campaign)
VP nominee Jim Clymer


Candidates Darrell Castle
Laurie Roth
Robby Wells





Freedom Socialist Party



Nominee Stephen Durham





Grassroots Party



Nominee Jim Carlson





Justice Party



Nominee Rocky Anderson
VP nominee Luis J. Rodriguez





Objectivist Party



Nominee Tom Stevens





Party for Socialism and Liberation



Nominee Peta Lindsay





Peace and Freedom Party



Nominee Roseanne Barr
VP nominee Cindy Sheehan


Candidates Stewart Alexander
Rocky Anderson
Stephen Durham
Peta Lindsay





Prohibition Party



Nominee Jack Fellure


Candidates James Hedges





Reform Party



Nominee Andre Barnett


Candidates Laurence Kotlikoff
Darcy Richardson
Buddy Roemer (campaign)
Robert David Steele
Robby Wells





Socialist Equality Party



Nominee Jerry White





Socialist Workers Party



Nominee James Harris





Socialist Party



Nominee Stewart Alexander (campaign)
VP nominee Alejandro Mendoza





Independents



Candidates Lee Abramson
Randy Blythe
Jeff Boss
Robert Burck
Terry Jones
Joe Schriner





Draft movements



Michael Bloomberg (movement)













State results






Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming











Other 2012 elections: House
Senate
Gubernatorial









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 160316458
LCCN: n2010076275
SUDOC: 157114341










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Tim_Pawlenty&oldid=792355660"					
Categories: 1960 births21st-century American politiciansAmerican people of German descentAmerican people of Polish descentBaptists from the United StatesConverts to Baptist denominationsConverts to Baptist denominations from Roman CatholicismGovernors of MinnesotaLiving peopleMembers of the Minnesota House of RepresentativesMinnesota lawyersMinnesota RepublicansPoliticians from Saint Paul, MinnesotaPeople from Eagan, MinnesotaPeople from South St. Paul, MinnesotaRepublican Party state governors of the United StatesUnited States presidential candidates, 2012University of Minnesota Law School alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from July 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from November 2016Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


ČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançaisHornjoserbsceItalianoעבריתNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 26 July 2017, at 01:16.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Tim Pawlenty - Wikipedia




















 







Tim Pawlenty

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Tim Pawlenty








Chair of the National Governors Association


In office
July 23, 2007 – July 14, 2008


Preceded by
Janet Napolitano


Succeeded by
Ed Rendell


39th Governor of Minnesota


In office
January 6, 2003 – January 3, 2011


Lieutenant
Carol Molnau


Preceded by
Jesse Ventura


Succeeded by
Mark Dayton


Majority Leader of the Minnesota House of Representatives


In office
January 3, 1999 – January 3, 2003


Governor
Jesse Ventura


Preceded by
Ted Winter


Succeeded by
Erik Paulsen


Member of the Minnesota House of Representatives
from District 38B


In office
January 3, 1993 – January 3, 2003


Preceded by
Art Seaberg


Succeeded by
Lynn Wardlow





Personal details


Born
Timothy James Pawlenty
(1960-11-27) November 27, 1960 (age 56)
Saint Paul, Minnesota, U.S.


Nationality
American


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Mary Anderson


Children
2


Alma mater
University of Minnesota, Twin Cities (BA, JD)


Signature



Timothy James "Tim" Pawlenty (/pəˈlɛnti/;[1] born November 27, 1960) is president and CEO of Financial Services Roundtable, a Washington, D.C.-based industry advocacy group. He was a Republican politician who served as the 39th Governor of Minnesota (2003–2011). He previously served in the Minnesota House of Representatives (1993–2003), where he was majority leader for two terms. In 2011, he entered the campaign for the Republican presidential nomination and later was a potential vice presidential nominee before serving as co-chair of Mitt Romney's campaign.
Pawlenty was born in Saint Paul, Minnesota, and raised in nearby South St. Paul. He graduated from University of Minnesota with a B.A. in political science and a J.D. His early career included working as a labor law attorney and the vice president of a software as a service company. After settling in the city of Eagan with his wife, Pawlenty was appointed to the city's Planning Commission and was elected to the Eagan City Council at the age of 28. He won a seat as a state representative in 1992, representing District 38B in suburban Dakota County. He was re-elected four times and was voted majority leader by House Republicans in 1998.
After narrowly winning the Republican gubernatorial primary in 2002, Pawlenty won a three-way election for Governor of Minnesota, and was re-elected in 2006 by a margin of less than one percent. His campaign platform focused on balancing the budget without raising taxes. During Pawlenty's governorship, he did not raise income taxes, but did enact targeted increases in sales tax and user fees. His administration advocated for numerous public works projects, including work on the Northstar Commuter Rail Line, and the construction of Target Field, a Major League Baseball stadium in Minneapolis. He signed a bill mandating 20% ethanol in gasoline by 2013. He cut health care costs in an attempt to balance the budget, and borrowed funds from the state's K-12 education and low income programs. He signed an executive order rejecting federal funds related to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act. He also led worldwide trips for business leaders and trade delegations to explore trade opportunities. In the 2007–2008 term, he served as chairman of the National Governors Association.
Pawlenty was rumored to be a contender for both the Republican presidential and vice presidential nominations during the 2008 election, and he officially sought the 2012 Republican presidential nomination from May to August 2011. After withdrawing from that race, he became a finalist to join his party's nominee on the 2012 ticket as its vice presidential candidate.[2] Pawlenty was not selected as Mitt Romney's vice presidential candidate, but served as co-chair of Romney's campaign. In September 2012, he left Romney's campaign to become a Washington lobbyist for financial institutions.[3]



Contents


1 Early life, education, and early career
2 Minnesota House of Representatives
3 Governorship

3.1 Election, 2002
3.2 Reelection, 2006
3.3 State budget

3.3.1 Minnesota Supreme Court case


3.4 Funding projects
3.5 Education
3.6 Transportation
3.7 Crime
3.8 Energy policy and climate change
3.9 Health
3.10 Foreign relations
3.11 Other activities


4 2012 presidential campaign

4.1 Early steps
4.2 Book tour and political positions
4.3 Candidacy


5 Financial Services Roundtable
6 Personal life
7 Public image

7.1 Political views
7.2 Approval ratings
7.3 Electoral history


8 References
9 External links



Early life, education, and early career
Pawlenty was born in Saint Paul, Minnesota, to Eugene Joseph Pawlenty, and his wife, Virginia Frances (née Oldenburg).[4][5] His father, who drove a milk delivery truck, was of Polish descent, while his mother was of German ancestry.[4] His mother died of cancer when he was 16.[6] Pawlenty grew up in South St. Paul,[5] where he played ice hockey on his high school's junior varsity squad.[7]
Intending to become a dentist, Pawlenty enrolled in the University of Minnesota, the only one in his family to go beyond high school.[8] However, he changed his plans and spent the summers of 1980 and 1982 working as an intern at the office of U.S. Senator David Durenberger.[5] In 1983, he graduated with a B.A. in political science.[9] He received a Juris Doctor from the University of Minnesota Law School in 1986.[10] While in law school, he met wife, Mary Anderson, whom he married in 1987.[11]
Pawlenty first worked as a labor law attorney at the firm Rider Bennett (later Rider, Bennett, Egan & Arundel), where he had interned while a law student.[12] He later became vice president of a software as a service company, Wizmo Inc.[13][14]
Having moved to Eagan, Minnesota, a suburb of Minneapolis – Saint Paul, Pawlenty was appointed to the city's Planning Commission by Mayor Vic Ellison.[14][15] One year later, at age 28, he was elected to the City Council.[6]
Pawlenty entered state politics in 1990 as a campaign advisor for Jon Grunseth's losing bid for Minnesota governor.[6] After Pawlenty himself became governor, he appointed Grunseth's ex-wife, Vicky Tigwell, to the board of the Minneapolis−Saint Paul International Airport, an action which became an ethics and accountability issue in 2003.[16][17]
Minnesota House of Representatives
Pawlenty was elected to the Minnesota House of Representatives in 1992, winning 49.1 percent of the vote in District 38B (suburban Dakota County).[18] In the House, he authored bills instituting term limits for committee chairmen, funding for infant parenting classes, minimum sentences for repeat domestic violence offenders, and community notification for sex offenders. In response to a state budget surplus, he advocated for a tax reduction rather than expanded education funding.[19] He was reelected four times and was chosen House Majority Leader when the Republicans became the majority party in the State Legislature in 1998.[20]
Governorship
Election, 2002
Main article: Minnesota gubernatorial election, 2002
In 2002, Pawlenty wanted to run for governor, but party leaders made it clear they favored businessman Brian Sullivan.[6][21] Pawlenty then decided on the U.S. Senate, but he abandoned those plans when Vice President Dick Cheney asked him to step aside and allow former St. Paul mayor Norm Coleman to challenge Senator Paul Wellstone without Republican primary opposition.[22] Pawlenty returned to his original ambition and won a hard-fought and narrow victory over Sullivan in the Republican party primary election.[23]
In the general election, Pawlenty faced two strong opponents. His main rival was veteran Democratic–Farmer–Labor (DFL) state senator Roger Moe. Former Democratic Congressman Tim Penny ran on the Independence Party ticket (Governor Jesse Ventura, a member of the Independence Party, chose not to seek reelection). Until mid-October 2002, all three were essentially tied in the polls.[24] Pawlenty's major campaign stances included: a pledge not to raise taxes to balance the state's budget deficit (while allowing for increases in license and user fees);[24] that visa expiration dates be required to be printed on driver's licenses; that women seeking an abortion be required to wait at least 24 hours; enactment of a concealed carry gun law; and reform of the state's education requirements.[25] Pawlenty won the election with 43.8 percent of the vote.[26] His largest gains after the October three-way tie were reportedly among voters in the suburbs of Minneapolis–St. Paul.[24]
Reelection, 2006
Main article: Minnesota gubernatorial election, 2006
Governor Pawlenty ran for re-election in 2006.[27] He espoused conservative stands on issues. But conservatives criticized him on funding issues, in particular two pieces of legislation for stadiums for the Gophers and Minnesota Twins, and bond issues for public transit, including the Northstar commuter rail line.[28]
The 2006 gubernatorial race included Minnesota Attorney General Mike Hatch, of the DFL; Peter Hutchinson of the Independence Party; and Ken Pentel of the Green Party. Pawlenty won, defeating Hatch by a margin of less than one percent, though both the state House and Senate gained DFL majority.[29]
State budget
Pawlenty was elected in 2002 on a platform of balancing the state's budget without raising taxes. He emphasized his campaign and first term with the Taxpayers League of Minnesota slogan "no new taxes."[30] His governorship was characterized by a historically low rate of spending growth. According to the Minnesota Management and Budget Department, general-fund expenditures from 2004 to 2011 increased an average of 3.5 percent per two-year term, compared to an average of 21.1 percent from 1960 to 2003 (these numbers, however, are not inflation-adjusted).[31][32][33] University of Minnesota political science professor Larry Jacobs said that slowing down state spending and opposing tax increases were the "signature issue" of Pawlenty's governorship.[34]
In his first year as governor, Pawlenty inherited a projected two-year budget deficit of $4.3 billion, the largest in Minnesota's history.[35] After a contentious budget session with a Democrat-controlled Senate, he signed a package of fee increases, spending reductions, and government reorganization which eliminated the deficit. The budget reduced the rate of funding increases for state services, including transportation, social services, and welfare. It also enacted a perennial proposal to restructure city aid based on immediate need, rather than historical factors. In negotiations the governor agreed to several compromises, abandoning a desired public employee wage freeze and property tax restrictions.[35]
During his second term, Pawlenty erased a $2.7-billion deficit by cutting spending, shifting payments, and using one-time federal stimulus money.[36] His final budget (2010–2011) was the state's first two-year period since 1960 in which net government expenditures decreased. Pawlenty has claimed this as "the first time in 150 years" that spending has been cut, but fact-checkers have disputed this claim as no public budget records prior to 1960 are known to exist.[33][37]
Pawlenty has been criticized by some for providing a short-term budget solution but coming up short in his long-term strategy as governor. The state department of Management and Budget reports that the two-year budget starting in July 2011 is projected to come up $4.4 billion short.[36] Former Minnesota Governor Arne Carlson, a Republican, criticized Pawlenty's budget strategy: he borrowed more than $1 billion from the tobacco settlement (money set aside for health care), borrowed more than $1.4 billion from K-12 education funding, borrowed more than $400 [million][38] from the Health Care Access Fund for low-income families, among other short-term shifts in accounting. The result was a $5-billion deficit, the seventh largest in the United States.[39] Minnesota property taxes rose $2.5 billion, more than the previous 16 years combined, and Moody's lowered the state's bond rating.[40] Carlson told Time, "I don't think any governor has left behind a worse financial mess than he [Pawlenty] has." Pawlenty responded, "My friend governor Arne Carlson is, of course, now an Obama and John Kerry supporter."[41]
Minnesota Supreme Court case




Minnesota Supreme Court chamber at the Minnesota State Capitol


While Pawlenty said he was "confident" in his right to use unallotment, the Minnesota Supreme Court ultimately decided against him, voting 4 to 3 in a decision in May 2010.[42] His budget had been the subject of a lawsuit in Ramsey County District Court, which was decided against him. Judge Kathleen Gearin decided Pawlenty exceeded his constitutional authority in making unilateral spending cuts to a $5.3-million special dietary program that he had unalloted.[43][44] Attorney David Lillehaug said initially, "This is, I don't think it's understating this to say, this is one of the most important court cases in Minnesota legal history."[45] Pawlenty announced the following day that he would appeal;[46] he filed his defense in February,[47] and arguments were heard on March 15.[48][49] In May, the Supreme Court affirmed Judge Gearin, deciding that "Because the legislative and executive branches never enacted a balanced budget for the 2010–2011 biennium, use of the unallotment power to address the unresolved deficit exceeded the authority granted to the executive branch by the statute".[50] Pawlenty responded:[51]

I will fight to reduce spending and taxes in Minnesota and that battle continues. My commitment to the people of Minnesota remains the same: we will balance the budget without raising taxes.

After the court ruling, as the 2010 legislative session drew to a close, Pawlenty vetoed a budget which would fix a $2.9-billion deficit by adding a new tax bracket for six-figure incomes. In response to the proposal, he criticized Democrats for attempting to raise taxes in the midst of an extremely difficult economic situation.[52] Eventually, due in part to the efforts of House Speaker Margaret Kelliher, who was running for the 2010 Democratic nomination for governor of Minnesota, the General Assembly passed legislation approving nearly all the original unallotments.[53]
Funding projects
Since the Minnesota Constitution prohibits state-run gambling outside of Native territory, Pawlenty proposed negotiating with Minnesota's 11 tribes over profit-sharing of their casinos.[54] Legislators also pushed a proposal to turn Canterbury Park horse track into a racino.[55] The plan was poorly received by Northern Tribes who would operate part of the racino, citing reluctance to compete with other tribes.[56] Tribes with casinos opposed the expanded gambling and some legislators objected on moral grounds that the state shouldn't exploit problem gamblers. Politicians in heavy tribal areas feared losing campaign-finance sources if they supported the plan.[57][58] Delays by the Legislature ended with the bill being pulled from committee.[59] Tribes had spent millions lobbying legislatures in 2004.[60]
Pawlenty worked throughout 2006 to fund a Minnesota Twins baseball stadium in Minneapolis.[61] The resulting Minnesota Twins-Hennepin County ballpark bill called for an increased county sales tax which passed the state legislature and was symbolically signed in at the Hubert H. Humphrey Metrodome.[62][63] The majority of Hennepin County commissioners did not feel a referendum was necessary to approve the sales tax because of the delay it would cause. Pawlenty and the Legislature agreed, citing 10 years already of the project's debate, and exempted the county from state law requiring one in the bill.[64][65]
In June 2006, Pawlenty signed a $999.9-million public works bill that included funding for additional work on the Northstar Commuter rail line (a change in position from reservations about the idea he initially expressed), an expanded Faribault prison, a bioscience building at the University of Minnesota, and science facilities at Minnesota State University in Mankato. The bill also funded a $26-million expansion of the University of Minnesota's Carlson School of Management.[66]
In 2011, Pawlenty shut down an Islamic finance program, that was part of a larger program to increase home ownership in Minnesota, and his spokesperson said that the program accommodated the Muslim ban on interest.[67] Adam Sorensen from TIME questioned whether this was a case of double standards, pointing out New York's kosher food regulations, Blue Laws that prohibit alcohol sales on Sundays, and Pawlenty's own creation of "The Governor's Council On Faith-Based And Community Initiatives".[68]
Education
In the budget process, Pawlenty made an effort to preserve education funding while cutting other government spending. In 2009, he bolstered education funding using federal stimulus grants. Despite this, education funding fell from $9,700 to $8,400 per student (adjusted for inflation) during his tenure.[69] Pawlenty was an advocate for charter schools and was praised by the National Alliance for Public Charter Schools for his education policies. In 2010, the organization rated Minnesota #1 in the country for charter school promotion.[70]
Pawlenty oversaw the repeal of the Profile of Learning Kindergarten through 12th grade graduation requirements and sought to reinstate them during his governorship.[71] Renamed the Minnesota Academic Standards, they were guided by Department of Education commissioner Cheri Pierson Yecke. The bill's first draft raised several concerns by the education review boards including the amount of content, age-appropriateness, and a European-centric view of the social sciences portion.[72] Yecke revised and expanded material based on the response.[73] Even as both Legislative houses passed the Academic Standards bill, her confirmation as commissioner was rejected by the DFL majority Minnesota Senate.[74] She was seen as an outsider coming from Virginia and became unpopular for having pushed the academic reforms during a tight budget session as well as her critical look of Minnesota schools.[75] In her confirmation hearing, DFLers also noted concern over her conservative viewpoints.[75]
In June 2006, Pawlenty proposed the ACHIEVE program for the top 25% of high school graduates.[76] The program would pay for tuition for the first 2 years (4 years for selected fields such as science, technology, engineering and math) and would cost the state an estimated $112 million per 2-year cycle. However the program was not included in the 2007 higher education bill.[77]
Pawlenty used an accounting change called a tax shift to balance the state deficit without raising taxes. School districts statewide may unexpectedly lose $58 million in interest and reserve revenue.[78]
In 2010, Pawlenty vetoed a bill (HF 3164), which the legislature had passed 110 to 20, calling for Minnesota State Colleges & Universities (MnSCU) to revamp its credit transferring system within five years to fix "minimal loss of credits for transferring students" who had been losing between 10 and 30 percent of their credits.[79] Pawlenty found it "unnecessary" because MnSCU was fixing its system already "through internal actions and policy changes".[79]
Transportation




U.S. Representative Keith Ellison speaking at the site of the I-35W Mississippi River Bridge collapse in Minneapolis. He is flanked by Governor Pawlenty on the picture's left. To right: Mayor R. T. Rybak, Secretary of Transportation Mary Peters behind Ellison, Betty McCollum, and Senator Norm Coleman


During Pawlenty's first term, urban traffic congestion was a significant concern of voters. He appointed his lieutenant governor, Carol Molnau, as transportation commissioner, for which she was approved by the legislature in May 2004.[80] Molnau attempted to reform the transportation department, (Mn/DOT), using concepts such as "design-build". Legislators criticized Molnau's performance as transportation commissioner, citing ineffective leadership and management, and removed her from that role in February 2008, a decision Pawlenty said was motivated by partisanship.[80][81]
Pawlenty favored raising fees and imposing toll lanes on roads as the primary means of discouraging excessive traffic. During his term, the carpool lanes of Interstate 394 leading into downtown Minneapolis were converted into high-occupancy toll lanes. Pawlenty used or threatened vetoes in 2005, 2007 and 2008 on legislation funding proposed highway expansion, infrastructure repairs, road maintenance, and mass transit.[82] The 2008 veto was in spite of Pawlenty's announcement that he would consider reversing his opposition to a state gas-tax increase for funding road and bridge repairs, in the wake of the collapse of the I-35W Mississippi River bridge.[83]
Pawlenty had opposed the Northstar Commuter Rail as a legislator, but changed his position in 2004, announcing a funding plan to jump-start the project, when the Bush administration determined the rail line was deemed cost-effective and time-saving for commuters.[84]
In April 2008 during the budget bonding bill signing, Pawlenty used his line-item veto on $70 million pledged toward the building of the Central Corridor light-rail project, intended to connect Minneapolis and Saint Paul. In vetoing the expenditure, Pawlenty did not consult Peter Bell, head of the Metro Council and project leader.[85] Pawlenty stated that he vetoed the bill in order to send a message to the Legislature, which had exceeded his initial budget request, that they needed to "stay focused, be fiscally disciplined, set priorities and solve this budget crisis in a fiscally disciplined way."[86] Pawlenty however was supportive of the project and had requested the money in the bonding bill he submitted to the Minnesota State Legislature.[86] The veto disappointed some of Minnesota's congressional representatives in Washington, including Minnesota's Republican Senator Norm Coleman, who pledged to "raise my voice as strong as I can, as loud as I can. The federal commitment is there."[87] Though Pawlenty's veto might have delayed the ability of the state to receive federal matching funds for the project, Bell said the project was not derailed.[85] The Central Corridor funding issue was resolved on May 19, 2008, with the state pledging its original amount towards the project after legislators compromised with Pawlenty's budget requests.[88]
There were Republican state legislators who supported other cuts of the bonding bill, including Doug Magnus, the ranking Republican on the House Transportation Finance Division, who praised Pawlenty's "fiscal responsibility."[89] Critics, including Chris Coleman, Mayor of Saint Paul, called Pawlenty's veto "political gamesmanship," seeing the move as retribution for the Legislature's successful override of Pawlenty's veto of a transportation bonding bill.[86] They noted cuts overwhelmingly targeted Democratic districts, and Democratic stronghold Saint Paul most heavily.[90][91]
Crime
Crime in Minnesota was a high-profile political issue during Pawlenty's governorship. When crime rates in Minneapolis spiked 16 percent from 2004 to 2005, city officials blamed Pawlenty for large cuts to state aid, which they said restricted public safety resources. Pawlenty in turn criticized the capital city for poorly allocating its funding.[92]
Pawlenty made two large efforts to expand penalties for sexual offenders. In response to his first proposal in 2005, the state legislature passed a large package of sentencing reforms. One new instrument was the possibility of a life sentence without parole for serious offenders, although Pawlenty expressed disapproval at the courts' reluctance to use this option: only seven individuals received such a sentence in the first two years of implementation.[93] Pawlenty made a push for even harsher sentences in 2010, which increased the presumptive sentence for first-degree sex offenses from 12 years to 25 years and increased it further for repeat offenders. At the same time he advocated for a $90-million expansion of the state's civil commitment program for sexual offenders, maintaining that the increased criminal sentences would keep the commitment program's cost under control.[93] According to a single report in the Star Tribune, "A report on Minnesota's sex-offender program delivered to legislators in the final days of the Pawlenty administration was heavily edited by a top political appointee to reflect the former governor's skepticism about the effectiveness of treatment and to delete arguments for expanded community resources for offenders."[94]
Early in 2006, after issuing a study that estimated the cost of illegal immigration to the state as approximately $188 million, Pawlenty announced a program for changing the way the state dealt with persons who were in the United States illegally. Pawlenty said that the economic benefits of illegal immigration did not justify the illegal behavior.[95] Pawlenty's extensive proposal included the designation of 10 state law enforcement officials as the Minnesota Illegal Immigration Enforcement Team, "trained to question, detain and arrest suspected illegal immigrants" with a focus on "such crimes as human trafficking, identity theft, methamphetamine distribution and terrorism." He rounded out his proposal with tougher penalties for false identification, and instituting a fine of up to $5,000 for employers of illegal immigrants. His proposal was challenged by DFL senators who preferred increased legal immigration to punitive action.[96]
Energy policy and climate change




A United States Postal Service vehicle advertising its use of E85 fuel during the Saint Paul Winter Carnival parade in January 2007.


Minnesota has mandated a 10% mixture of gasoline and ethanol (gasohol) since 1997. Pawlenty signed into law in May 2005 a bill that will raise the minimum mandated mixture to 20% in 2013. Pawlenty has also lobbied the Governors' Ethanol Coalition to mandate higher ethanol use nationwide.[97]
Conservative Republican governors were not supportive of Pawlenty's presentation on clean energy to the governor's association, which he gave in cooperation with Ed Rendell, who was the governor of Pennsylvania and the National Governors Association's Democratic vice-chairman. With Kathleen Sebelius of Kansas, Pawlenty was co-chairman of the association's energy committee. The effort received "adamant opposition" from governors of petroleum (oil) producing states.[98]
In 2007, Governor Pawlenty signed the Next Generation Energy Act of 2007 into law and, along with six other Midwestern governors, the Midwestern Greenhouse Gas Accord. These directed state agencies to develop a plan to reduce greenhouse gases, and "develop a market-based and multi-sector cap-and-trade mechanism".[99] However, by 2009 Pawlenty had reversed his position and called cap-and-trade "overly bureaucratic" and a potential "disaster".[99] By 2011, Pawlenty's position had changed sufficiently to state "the weight of the evidence is that most of it, maybe all of it, is because of natural causes."[100]
Health
In 2004, Minnesota's Star Tribune newspaper opined that the credibility of Pawlenty's commissioner of health, Dianne Mandernach, suffered when a website posting by the department suggested that abortion might have a role in breast cancer. She also angered many when it was learned she had delayed releasing government research on cancer in miners. In 2007, Mandernach resigned.[101]
In 2005, Pawlenty asked a U.S. Senate subcommittee to allow his MinnesotaCare health plan to expand and continue allowing state residents and employees to import cheaper Canadian prescription drugs.[102]
In 2007, Pawlenty signed into law the 2007 Omnibus Health and Human Services Appropriations Bill, which provided funding for the Health Care Transformation Task Force, a panel of health care experts charged with exploring ways to reduce health care spending, improve quality, and ensure that Minnesota develops a universal health care plan by 2011.[103]
Later in his tenure he used health care funding cuts as a mechanism to balance the state budget. After years of assuring doctors that the state "sick tax" would be used only to fund health welfare programs, in 2009 Pawlenty recommended a 3% cut in physician reimbursements from the state and asked that the sick tax be put instead into the state's general budget.[104] Pawlenty used a line-item veto to remove $381 million from health and human services funding, a removal which could lead to 35,000 Minnesotans' losing their General Assistance Medical Care (GAMC) health insurance in 2011.[105] Hennepin County Medical Center—the largest provider of health care to Minnesota's poor and uninsured—closed two clinics, reduced its staff and reduced access to non-emergency services.[106] State Senator Linda Berglin wrote a bill that would extend GAMC funding.[107]
In 2010, he refused federal health care funds including more than $1 billion to expand the number of Minnesotans covered by Medicaid, $68 million for a high-risk insurance pool, $1 million to help set up an insurance exchange where consumers could shop for health coverage, and $850,000 for teenage pregnancy prevention. Pawlenty accepted a $500,000 abstinence-only sex-education grant that would require $350,000 in matching state money. Pawlenty said, "It doesn't say we have to apply for all of them."[108]
Foreign relations




Tim Pawlenty meeting Minnesota National Guard troops in Kosovo (April 12, 2008)


Pawlenty's first term coincided with the deployment of National Guardsmen from numerous states, connected with the War on Terror and the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan. During his two terms Pawlenty made trips to Iraq, Afghanistan, Bosnia, Kosovo, and Kuwait visiting Minnesota troops.[109]
Pawlenty was visited in 2004 by Mexican President Vicente Fox in talks to strengthen trade. Fox announced that his country would open a consulate in Minnesota the next year, removing the need for Mexican residents in the state to travel out of state for identification papers and other materials.[110] In mid-2006, in response to illegal immigration, Pawlenty sent Minnesota National Guardsmen to the U.S.–Mexico border at the request of the U.S. Department of Defense and the U.S. Department of Homeland Security.[111]
Pawlenty took a delegation of nearly 200 Minnesotan business, government, academic and civic leaders on a weeklong trip to China in mid-November 2005. The stated objectives were to provide a forum for companies to acquire market information, assess market potential, evaluate market entry strategies and identify potential business partners, as well as to promote Chinese investment in Minnesota.[112] Pawlenty also led Minnesota trade delegations to Canada in 2003,[113] Poland and the Czech Republic in 2004,[114] India in 2007,[113] and Israel in 2008.[109]
Other activities
Throughout his eight-year tenure, Pawlenty hosted a weekly one-hour radio show on WCCO-AM, a tradition he inherited from his predecessor as governor, Jesse Ventura.[115] Pawlenty was the chairman of the National Governors Association for the 2007–2008 term.[116] He also served as Chair of the Midwestern Governors Association in 2006.[117]
Beginning in 2005, Pawlenty was rumored in the press as a potential candidate for president of the United States.[118][119][120] When formally announcing his candidacy for a second term as Governor of Minnesota on May 31, 2006, Pawlenty said, "As to my future, if I run for governor and win, I will serve out my term for four years as governor."[121][122][123] On January 15, 2007, after being reelected, Pawlenty said, "I am committed to serving out my term as governor. That's what I am going to do."[124]
In 2007, it was announced that Pawlenty would be serving in a lead role for McCain as a national co-chair of his presidential exploratory committee[125] which led to Pawlenty's becoming co-chairman of McCain's campaign (along with Phil Gramm and Tom Loeffler).[126] In January 2008, a reporter for the Minneapolis Star Tribune suggested Pawlenty's renewed focus on his proposed immigration reform plans might be politically motivated as counterbalance to McCain's less favorable guest worker program.[127]
For many weeks, Pawlenty was widely considered to be a leading candidate for the vice-presidential nomination on the Republican ticket with John McCain in the 2008 presidential election.[128][129] In a surprise, McCain chose Alaska Governor Sarah Palin.[130]
In 2008, Pawlenty expressed support for the Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP). But in 2010 Pawlenty claimed that he had made those statements solely as a surrogate for presidential nominee McCain and never actually supported the idea himself.[131] On May 23, 2011, Pawlenty formally announced he'd run for the Republican presidential nomination, saying, “politicians are often afraid that if they're too honest, they might lose an election. I'm afraid that in 2012, if we're not honest enough, we may lose our country.”
2012 presidential campaign
Main article: Tim Pawlenty presidential campaign, 2012
Early steps
In February 2005, ABC News identified him as a potential candidate for president.[132] Pawlenty decided not to seek a third term as governor, and so was not a candidate in the November 2010 gubernatorial election.[133] In July 2009, Public Policy Polling conducted a poll that showed that President Obama was favored to win against Pawlenty in his home state of Minnesota by more than 10 points.[134] In October 2009, a CNN article suggested that Pawlenty was contemplating a 2012 White House bid.[135] Among those advising him in preparation for a potential presidential run was lobbyist and former Congressman Vin Weber.[136]
In late 2009, Pawlenty began taking steps that many saw as leading to a 2012 presidential bid.[137] He visited Iowa in November 2009 and April 2010, making political speeches.[138] In January 2011, the New York Times reported that "Few Americans, in fact, even know his name."[139] In January 2011, Pawlenty told the College Republicans group at The George Washington University "If I decide to run it would be for president, not vice president."[140][141]
Book tour and political positions




Pawlenty at a book signing in February 2011 in Phoenix, Arizona.


Pawlenty went on tour for his book Courage to Stand, and as of January 18, his book had reached #1,979 on Amazon.com's list of bestsellers.[142] Pawlenty calls himself a social conservative.[143] In his extended interview with Jon Stewart on The Daily Show, he said he thinks United States Social Security and Medicare need to be cut to balance the federal budget.[144] Pawlenty believes that state governments should outlaw abortion, except for cases of rape, incest, and to save a woman's life. He thinks the United States Supreme Court decided Roe v. Wade wrongly, abortion being a state, not a federal, matter. He opposes same-sex marriage and civil unions, and said on talk radio "... I have been a public supporter of maintaining Don't ask, don't tell and I would support reinstating it as well".[143]
In December 2010, Pawlenty was one of three U.S. governors who publicly declared solidarity with the Christian-right group Family Research Council.[145]
Pawlenty's tour was in Minneapolis, San Francisco and Dallas, and it ended January in Iowa where the Iowa Caucuses were scheduled for February 6, 2012. "That will come up fast," he said, "if I do run." In Minneapolis, speaking to Pat Kessler of WCCO-TV who asked about his feelings regarding a potential run for president by Representative Michele Bachmann, "I have a lot of respect for Michele Bachmann … Whether she runs or not, it's gonna be a big field. There's gonna be five, six, seven, eight people running … Whoever wants to run can run. The more, the merrier."[142]
In a December 2010 column in The Wall Street Journal, Pawlenty argued in favor of the historical benefits of "private sector" labor unions and strongly against "public sector" labor unions, whose collective bargaining rights he would like to see curbed: "The rise of the labor movement in the early 20th century was a triumph for America's working class. In an era of deep economic anxiety, unions stood up for hard-working but vulnerable families, protecting them from physical and economic exploitation." He also criticized modern unions: "The moral case for unions—protecting working families from exploitation—does not apply to public employment... Unionized public employees are making more money, receiving more generous benefits, and enjoying greater job security than the working families forced to pay for it with ever-higher taxes, deficits and debt."[146]
Candidacy
On March 21, 2011, Pawlenty announced, via Facebook, that he had formed an exploratory committee in preparation for a potential run for the 2012 Republican presidential nomination.[147][148]
On April 12, 2011, Pawlenty said clearly on CNN's Piers Morgan Tonight that he was "running for president" and not for vice president, adding that a formal announcement would be given in several weeks.[149] On Twitter, his spokesman said CNN took his comments out of context.[150]
On May 23, 2011, Pawlenty launched his candidacy for president in a speech in Iowa stating: "I'm going to try something a little unusual in politics. I'm just going to tell the truth."[151][152] A YouTube video[153] appeared a day before.[154] The Wall Street Journal wrote of his candidacy, and the luck he experienced in the GOP's field, that Pawlenty has a "golden chance to become the chief rival to... Mitt Romney".[155]
Pawlenty finished third in the Ames Straw Poll on August 13, 2011,[156] behind the winner Michele Bachmann and the runner-up Ron Paul. Before the Ames debate, he took a more aggressive stance against Romney, including the coining the term "Obamneycare".[157] When pressed by John King during CNN's June 13, 2011 debate to address why he used the word, he backed off.[158] However, he denied that he backed off.[159] The following day he announced his decision to withdraw from the presidential race.[160] On September 12, 2011, Pawlenty announced his endorsement of former Governor Mitt Romney of Massachusetts, as well as his position as national co-chair for Romney's campaign.[161] Romney retired over $400,000 of Pawlenty's campaign debt.[162]
Financial Services Roundtable
On September 20, 2012, Pawlenty's advisor Brian McClung announced to Associated Press that Pawlenty would resign as the co-chairman of Mitt Romney's electoral campaign. He was to head the Financial Services Roundtable (FSR), a financial service industry lobby group in Washington, D.C. He would not be running in the 2014 gubernatorial election in Minnesota nor in the state's 2014 senatorial election.[163] He assumed the positions of President & CEO. He replaced Steve Bartlett, a former U.S. Representative from Texas who had held the positions since 1999.[164]
In November 2012, Pawlenty said that "Republicans and Democrats will have to reconcile their differences on spending and taxes because the 'walls of reality are closing in on them'" relative to the federal government's looming "fiscal cliff". Presenting himself as not from Wall Street or from Washington and, having previously criticized “entrenched financial interests”, he said he could "bring a fresh and new voice to those debates”. He also "refuted assertions that implementation of the Dodd-Frank Act, legislation enacted roughly 27 months [earlier] in response to the financial crisis, ha[d] been delayed because of lobbying".[165]
Personal life




Tim Pawlenty with his wife, Mary


Pawlenty and his wife Mary have two daughters, Anna and Mara. Mary was appointed as a judge of the Dakota County District Court in Hastings, Minnesota, in 1994. After he was elected governor in 2002, the family remained at their Eagan home instead of moving into the Governor's residence because of his wife's requirement to live in her judicial district.[166] In 2007, she left her judicial position to become General Counsel of the National Arbitration Forum, a dispute-resolution company based in Minneapolis.[167] She stayed on only briefly before departing for another dispute-resolution company, the Gilbert Mediation Center.[168]
Pawlenty was raised a Roman Catholic. His conversion to an Evangelical Protestant faith has been attributed to his wife Mary, who is a member of Wooddale Church in Eden Prairie, Minnesota,[169] a member congregation of the Minnesota Baptist Conference. In a January 2011 interview, Mr. Pawlenty stated, "I love and respect and admire the Catholic Church. I still attend Mass once in a while there. The church I now attend is an interdenominational church which has got many former Catholics in it, and so we share the Christian faith and the Bible. I had to reconcile my faith life with my wife so we could have a consistent, integrated family faith life."[170]
Pawlenty frequently uses (and is referred to by) the mononym "TPaw" or "T-Paw".[171][172][173]
Public image
Political views
Pawlenty is generally considered a conservative on the American political spectrum. With regard to his economic record, he has drawn mixed reviews from fiscally conservative interest groups.[174] The lobbying group Taxpayers League of Minnesota gave Pawlenty an average approval score of 80% during his years as a state legislator, while the Cato Institute think-tank gave him scores ranging from C to A across his eight years as governor.[70] In February 2008, Washington Post columnist Robert Novak wrote that Pawlenty was the most conservative Minnesota governor since Governor Theodore Christianson in the 1920s.[98] A 2011 white paper by the Club for Growth, analyzing Pawlenty as a presidential candidate, found his political stance difficult to identify. The group praised him for reduced growth in spending and taxation, but found that he "has some simply inexcusable tax hikes in his record" and questioned his support of proposals such as "mandatory vegetable oil in gasoline, cap and trade, and a statewide smoking ban."[70] Chris Edwards, a director at Cato, speculated that Pawlenty's rightward tack in his second term was related to his impending presidential run.[174]
Approval ratings
In April 2009, 46% of Minnesotans approved of Pawlenty, while 40% disapproved.[175] Among registered Republicans nationwide in July 2009, 38% had a favorable view of him while 33% didn't according to a Rasmussen Reports survey.[176] In March 2010 42% of Minnesotans approved of Pawlenty, while 52% disapproved.[177]
In October 2010 a Rasmussen report showed that Pawlenty had a 49% approval rating among Minnesotans with 49% disapproving.[178] A March 2011 survey by Gallup stated that Pawlenty began his Presidential run with only 41% name recognition in the GOP.[179] Also in March 2011, the Public Policy Polling (PPP) agency found that nationwide voters had a net negative view of Pawlenty, with 15% viewing him favorably verses 33% unfavorably.[180] In a 2011 PPP poll of registered Minnesota voters conducted from May 27–30, 42% of Minnesotans had a favorable opinion of Pawlenty, while 52% had an unfavorable opinion of him. In the presidential race, President Obama lead Pawlenty by 51% to 43%, suggesting Pawlenty could lose his home state to President Obama were he the 2012 GOP nominee.[181]
Electoral history

Minnesota District 38B state representative elections, 1992–2000

Year
Republican
DFL
Constitution
Total
Source


 
 
 


Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %


1992
Tim Pawlenty
9,610
49.1%
Linda Rother
8,773
44.8%
James Russell McMahon
253
1.3%
19,583
[18]


1994
Tim Pawlenty
12,172
81.0%
None
None
15,022
[182]


1996
Tim Pawlenty
14,747
74.4%
None
None
19,822
[183]


1998
Tim Pawlenty
9,118
48.5%
Leo Brisbois
7,819
41.6%
None
18,809
[184]


2000
Tim Pawlenty
13,779
59.6%
Gary Moore
7,239
31.3%
None
23,100
[185]



Minnesota gubernatorial elections, 2002–2006

Year
Republican
DFL
Independence
Green
Total
Source


 
 
 
 


Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %


2002
Tim Pawlenty
999,473
43.8%
Roger Moe
821,268
36.0%
Tim Penny
364,534
16.0%
Ken Pentel
50,589
2.2%
2,282,860
[26]


2006
Tim Pawlenty
1,028,568
46.4%
Mike Hatch
1,007,460
45.4%
Peter Hutchinson
141,735
6.4%
Ken Pentel
10,800
0.5%
2,217,818
[186]


References


^ Baenen, Jeff. "Minnesota Pronunciation Guide". Associated Press in Minnesota. Retrieved July 4, 2011. 
^ Streitfeld, Rachel (August 12, 2012). "Ryan's clandestine journey to Romney's ticket went from 'surreal to real'". CNN. Retrieved 2012-08-15. 
^ Knox, Olivier (September 20, 2012). "Pawlenty quits as Romney campaign co-chair". Yahoo! News. 
^ a b Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Tim Pawlenty". wargs.com. 
^ a b c Davey, Monica (August 7, 2008). "Pawlenty Looks to National Stage". The New York Times. Retrieved June 1, 2011. 
^ a b c d "Campaign 2002: Governor Tim Pawlenty". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Jim Walsh (January 28, 2004). "Grant Hart recalls his old classmate, Tim Pawlenty". City Pages. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Sharpiro, Walter. "The Tragedy of Tim Pawlenty: He did everything right. And that was the problem". The New Republic. Retrieved July 26, 2011. 
^ Political Science Dept of College of Liberal Arts (July 5, 2008). "PoliSci Alumni". University of Minnesota. 
^ "Empowered with a New Degree, Class of '08 Sets Forth – 120th Commencement Ceremony". University of Minnesota Law School. February 11, 2008. 
^ Melo, Frederick (January 5, 2007). "Mary Pawlenty leaves bench—First Lady will be top counsel for mediation firm". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ "Pawlenty Biography". 2012 Republican Candidates: Comparing the 2012 Republican Candidates. Retrieved July 26, 2011. 
^ "Main page". Wizmo. 
^ a b Tom Squitieri (November 7, 2002). "His plans changed, but message didn't". USA TODAY. 
^ "What's next for Tim Pawlenty?". MinnPost. September 8, 2008. Retrieved September 10, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (July 16, 2003). "DFLer slams "Grunseth groupies"". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ State Senator Sandra L. Pappas (July 21, 2003). "Legislators Call for Full and Complete Disclosure from Governor Pawlenty" (Press release). MN State Legislature press release (via Internet Archive). Archived from the original on September 19, 2004. 
^ a b Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1992. p. 146. 
^ Sherman, Amy (October 16, 1998). "38B candidates' ideas differ on surplus, education; incumbent faces unusual challenge". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ "Legislators Past and Present". Minnesota Legislative Reference Library. Retrieved August 23, 2007. 
^ Laura McCallum (June 12, 2002). "Campaign 2002 profile: Brian Sullivan". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Smith, Dane (April 19, 2001). "Cheney advises Pawlenty not to run for Senate; Majority leader bows to request from White House". Star Tribune. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (September 13, 2002). "Tim Pawlenty". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ a b c Grant, Ashley; Associated Press (November 6, 2002). "Pawlenty elected Minnesota governor—Republican breaks out of three-way race". Grand Forks Herald. p. A-05. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ Coleman, Toni et al. (January 5, 2003). "Your guide to the 2003 legislature: issues to watch". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A8. CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
"Major Minnesota issues". Grand Forks Herald. Associated Press. January 5, 2003. p. A-07. 
^ a b Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2002. pp. 322–325. 
^ Hohmann, James. "Once a goalie, Tim Pawlenty plays offense". Politico. Capitol News. Retrieved April 20, 2011. 
^ Laura McCallum (June 2, 2006). "Pawlenty accepts Republican endorsement for re-election". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Laura McCallum (November 8, 2006). "Hatch concedes; Pawlenty barely wins re-election". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Britt Robson (January 19, 2005). "Minnesota Eats Itself Another Pawlenty budget, another round of bloodletting". City Pages. Retrieved August 31, 2008. 
^ "Historical expenditures: General fund and all funds" (PDF). Minnesota Management and Budget Department. March 2011. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty said he brought Minnesota state spending growth down 'to about 1.7 percent per year.'". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. April 1, 2011. 
^ a b "PoliGraph: Pawlenty spending claim lacks context". MPR News. Minnesota Public Radio. January 27, 2011. 
^ Sharpiro, Walter. "The Tragedy of TIm Pawlenty: He Did Everything Right. And That's The Problem". The New Republic. Retrieved July 27, 2011. 
^ a b Salisbury, Bill (June 1, 2003). "Pawlenty wins, but risks attached – his no-new-taxes pledge may become a liability later". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ a b Scheck, Tom (September 24, 2009). "Pawlenty downplaying budget deficit predictions". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 24, 2009. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty said in 2009, 'we cut state spending in real terms for the first time in 150 years'". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. April 12, 2011. 
^ AEI said "billion", an error see original: Carlson, Arne (May 23, 2011). "The Presidency: A Bit Short Is Pawlenty". Blogspot. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Ornstein, Norman J. (May 25, 2011). "GOP Presidential Candidates Affect Agenda". American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy Research. Retrieved May 25, 2011. 
^ Wyler, Grace (May 23, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty Launches Campaign As The GOP Default Candidate". Business Insider. Retrieved May 25, 2011. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (May 23, 2011). "George's Bottom Line". ABC News. Retrieved June 9, 2011. 
^ Black, Eric (May 5, 2010). "Supreme Court overrules Pawlenty on unallotments". MinnPost. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Scheck, Tom (October 29, 2009). "Lawsuit challenges Pawlenty's budget cuts". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved October 30, 2009. 
^ Grow, Doug (December 31, 2009). "Unallotment ruling may have turned Minnesota's recent political gridlock into new political chaos". MinnPost. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ David Lillehaug and Mike McIntee (December 30, 2009). Atty David Lillehaug: Court ruling huge political setback for Gov. Pawlenty. The UpTake via MinnPost. Event occurs at 1:22. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ McIntee, Mike (December 31, 2009). Pawlenty To Appeal Unallotment Ruling. The UpTake via Twin Cities Daily Planet. Event occurs at 1:30. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ Shaw, Charley (February 9, 2010). "Pawlenty in appellate brief says he legally unalloted the budget". Politics in Minnesota. Retrieved February 9, 2010. 
^ Helgeson, Baird (February 9, 2010). "Pawlenty defends budget cuts". Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Scheck, Tom (March 15, 2010). "State's budget in hands of Supreme Court". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved March 15, 2010. 
^ Magnuson, Eric J. (May 5, 2010). "State of Minnesota in Supreme Court: A10-64" (PDF). Minnesota Judicial Branch. Archived from the original (PDF) on May 5, 2010. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Kimball, Joe (May 5, 2010). "Pawlenty responds to ruling on unallotment, urges Legislature to back his cuts". MinnPost. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (May 12, 2010). "Budget clock is ticking at the Capitol—After veto, talks deadlock and DFL calls on Pawlenty to take the lead". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Sturdevant, Lori (May 23, 2010). "Now on the trail, loaded with legislative baggage—Kelliher bears the weight of her position, while Emmer's burdens are largely of his own making". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Michael Khoo (February 5, 2004). "Pawlenty's speech puts focus on gambling". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ T.W. Budig (April 3, 2003). "Canterbury racino legislation advances in House; Pawlenty cool to more gambling". ECM Capitol Roundup. Archived from the original on May 10, 2003. 
^ Becky Glander (February 5, 2005). "Some angered at racino proposal". University Chronicle. Archived from the original on March 1, 2009. 
^ Andrew Tellijohn (March 7, 2003). "Canterbury chasing jackpot with 'racino'". Minneapolis / St. Paul Business Journal. 
^ "Indian Country is in the midst of political awakening". October 11, 2004. Retrieved December 3, 2007. 
^ Michael Khoo (May 17, 2005). "Casino issue is dying, if not dead, at Capitol". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Native American casinos". Indianz. May 23, 2005. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ "Pawlenty's talks on Twins stadium yield no action". Associated Press/MPR. January 11, 2006. 
^ Twins ballpark: What's next?. May 26, 2006. 
^ "Votetracker Minnesota Twins stadium". Minnesota Public Radio. 2006. 
^ Tom Scheck; Brandt Williams (May 22, 2006). "Twins' stadium opponents were tired of the fight; supporters weren't". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Brandt Williams (April 25, 2005). "Pohlad: Contribution to Twins ballpark 'fair, substantial'". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Legislature passes $1 billion public works bill". St. Paul Pioneer Press. June 2006. Archived from the original on March 12, 2007. Retrieved June 26, 2006. 
^ Montopoli, Brian (March 25, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty: I shut down Sharia loan program". CBS News. 
^ "Is There a Double Standard in Tim Pawlenty's Disavowal of Sharia-Compliant Mortgages?". TIME. March 25, 2011. 
^ "Mark Dayton says Gov. Tim Pawlenty cut education spending". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. July 29, 2010. 
^ a b c "2012 Presidential White Paper #2: Former Minnesota Governor Tim Pawlenty" (PDF). Club for Growth. May 24, 2011. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (December 22, 2010). "'Binge buster'—In two terms as governor, Tim Pawlenty put the brakes on state spending and set Minnesota on a path to fiscal austerity. But critics say he simply kicked budget problems down the road.". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Laura McCallum (October 31, 2003). "Social studies standards face more heat". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (December 19, 2003). "Yecke unveils second try at social studies, science standards". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Sara Evans and Lisa Norling (November 2004). "What Happened in Minnesota?". Organization of American Historians newsletter. Archived from the original on August 3, 2008. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ a b Pugmire, Tim (May 16, 2004). "Yecke blasts Minnesota's political climate for vote to oust her". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ Tim Pugmire (June 27, 2006). "Good grades would mean free college under Pawlenty plan". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Art Hughes (May 7, 2007). "Dream Act dies under threat of Pawlenty veto". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Fitzgerald, John (October 1, 2009). "Schools to Pay Millions to Cover Governor's IOU". Minnesota 2020. Retrieved July 2, 2011. 
^ a b Schumacher, Lawrence (May 3, 2010). "Pawlenty nixes college student credit transfer fix". Twin Cities Daily Planet. Retrieved May 3, 2010. 
^ a b Anderson, G. R. Jr. (February 28, 2008). "One head finally rolls". MinnPost.com. MinnPost. Retrieved February 29, 2008. 
^ Saulny, Susan (February 29, 2008). "Minnesota Transportation Chief Is Out". The New York Times. The New York Times Company. Retrieved February 29, 2008. 
^ "State House approves gas tax hike". KSTP. 2007. Retrieved August 3, 2007. 
^ Jackson, Henry C.; Mark Scolforo (August 4, 2007). "8 Reported Missing in Bridge Collapse". Washington Post. 
^ Laura McCallum (August 3, 2004). "Pawlenty finds money to jumpstart North Star rail line". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ a b Sturdevant, Lori (April 12, 2008). "Working toward the train in vain". Minneapolis Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. [permanent dead link]
^ a b c Yuen, Laura; Tom Scheck (April 7, 2008). "Pawlenty delivers a setback to the Central Corridor project". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ "Coleman: Disappointed By Gov. Vetoing LRT Money". Associated Press. April 10, 2008. Archived from the original on March 1, 2009. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Tom Weber (May 19, 2008). "Central Corridor planning moves forward". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Kaszuba, Mike (April 18, 2008). "Met Council head is in a political bind". www.startribune.com. Archived from the original on April 2, 2015. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Salisbury, Bill. "Vetoes not political? (The Political Animal)". blogs.twincities.com. Archived from the original on April 14, 2008. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Scheck, Tom (April 7, 2008). "MPR: St. Paul officials: What does Pawlenty have against us?". minnesota.publicradio.org. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Stassen-Berger, Rachel E. (June 26, 2006). "When crime jumps, politicos trade blame: experts say one elected official can't do much to raise—or lower—crime rates". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ a b Hoppin, Jason (February 10, 2010). "Pawlenty: Time to get tougher on sex crimes – Some offenders would get 25 years; others, even more". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ Ludeman, Cal (February 7, 2011). "Details on sex offender program deleted". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on April 2, 2015. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Jim Lehrer (March 22, 2006). "MINNESOTA'S IMMIGRATION DEBATE". Twin Cities Public Broadcasting. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (January 4, 2006). "Illegal immigration a 'real issue': Pawlenty defends crackdown, but not all agree with tactics". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ McCallum, Laura (September 26, 2005). "Pawlenty pumps ethanol". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 6, 2007. 
^ a b Novak, Robert (February 28, 2008). "How Not to Run for Vice President". The Washington Post. The Washington Post Company. Retrieved February 28, 2008. 
^ a b "Pawlenty’s Political Climate Change". Fact-Check.org. 
^ herb, jeremy (August 4, 2011). "Remarks highlight Pawlenty's climate shift". minneapolis star tribune. Retrieved August 10, 2012. 
^ Powell, Joy; Lopez, Patricia (August 22, 2007). "State health commissioner resigns". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on March 2, 2009. Retrieved January 12, 2008. 
^ Tom Scheck (February 16, 2005). "Measuring the success of Canadian drug imports". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 12, 2008. 
^ "The Kaiser Commission on Medicaid and the Uninsured" (PDF). The Henry J. Kaiser Family Foundation. Archived from the original (PDF) on February 4, 2011. Retrieved March 16, 2011. 
^ "Pawlenty uses veto power to cut health care". Mnmed.org. Retrieved October 31, 2010. [permanent dead link]
^ Scheck, Tom (May 15, 2009). "Pawlenty, lawmakers remain at odds over budget issues". Minnesota Public Radio News. Retrieved June 2, 2009. 
^ Williams, Chris (Associated Press) (November 18, 2009). "HCMC approves big cuts in 2010 budget". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved November 19, 2009. 
^ McIntee, Mike (February 9, 2010). "Vets To Feel Governor Pawlenty's GAMC Cuts". The Uptake. Archived from the original on August 6, 2014. Retrieved February 10, 2010. 
^ Marcotty, Josephine & Stassen-Berger, Rachel E. (September 1, 2010). "Pawlenty restricts health money". Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ a b Salisbury, Bill (October 18, 2008). "Governor will lead trade group to Israel". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Ragsdale, Jim; Welbes, John (June 19, 2004). "Fox promises consulate—Mexico president expresses wish to aid countrymen in Minnesota". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ 200 National Guard members to patrol Mexican border | Minnesota Public Radio News
^ Bjorhus, Jennifer (November 14, 2005). "Pawlenty courts Chinese investors – TRADE: Economic ties take a new direction as the Chinese begin looking for places to invest". Duluth News-Tribune. 
^ a b Smith, Dane (January 30, 2007). "Pawlenty plans trade mission to India". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on June 8, 2008. Retrieved January 30, 2007. 
^ Lopez, Patricia (June 22, 2004). "Pawlenty's trade mission—Poland and the Czech Republic: Pawlenty praises Poland's 'bright future'". Star Tribune. 
^ Von Sternberg, Bob (November 13, 2010). "Gov. Tim Pawlenty: Signing off". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on November 20, 2010. 
^ "Initiatives of NGA chairs". National Governors Association. 
^ "Past Chairs". Midwestern Governors Association. Archived from the original on May 1, 2013. 
^ Ambinder, Marc (February 9, 2005). "Conservatives Say Pawlenty Is Potential Presidential Candidate". ABC News. 
^ Will, George F. (February 24, 2008). "The Running Mate McCain Needs". The Washington Post. p. B07. 
^ Martin, Jonathan (February 17, 2008). "Steadfast McCain ally sparks veep talk". Politico. 
^ "Gov. Pawlenty announces re-election bid (feature audio)". MPR News. Minnesota Public Radio. May 31, 2006. 
^ Black, Eric; Tice, D.J. (March 14, 2007). "Pawlenty for veep: Will he or won't he?". Star Tribune. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty Announces re-election campaign (video)". WCCO-TV. May 31, 2006. Archived from the original on February 9, 2013. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ Black, Eric (February 18, 2008). "How did veep talk go so far without Pawlenty's pledge coming up?". MinnPost. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty to co-chair McCain '08 exploratory committee". KARE. Associated Press. January 15, 2007. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Pugmire, Tim (January 9, 2008). "Presidential campaigns raise volume in Minnesota". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved January 10, 2008. 
^ Hopfensperger, Jean (January 7, 2008) [updated February 5, 2008]. "Is Pawlenty's plan for immigration aimed at a VP slot?". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on January 27, 2008. Retrieved July 13, 2008. 
^ "McCain Selects His Running Mate". FOXNews.com. August 28, 2008. Archived from the original on 2008-11-02. Retrieved August 28, 2008. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty: McCain's Vice President?". Huffingtonpost.com. January 8, 2008. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ "McCain taps Alaska Gov. Palin as vice president pick". CNN Politics. CNN. August 29, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty says he never backed bailout in 2008". Politico Live. January 16, 2011. 
^ Ambinder, Marc (February 9, 2005). "Conservatives Say Pawlenty Is Potential Presidential Candidate". ABC News. Retrieved April 3, 2011. 
^ Kendra Marr (December 17, 2010). "Tim Pawlenty's regret: No third term". Politico. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ "Obama easily outpolls Pawlenty, Palin" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. July 10, 2009. Retrieved May 3, 2010. 
^ "Pawlenty rolls out new health care proposals". CNN. October 13, 2009. Retrieved May 25, 2010. 
^ Foster, Daniel (January 27, 2011). "Pence Out, Republican Presidential Field Open". National Review. 
^ Jonathan Martin (October 1, 2009). "Pawlenty preps 2012 campaign team". Politico. Retrieved June 3, 2010. 
^ "Pawlenty in Iowa: Republican party must unite to take power from Democrats | Des Moines Register Staff Blogs". Blogs.desmoinesregister.com. October 27, 2010. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ Peters, Jeremy (January 29, 2011). "Political Blogs Are Ready to Flood Campaign Trail". The New York Times. 
^ Kendra Marr (January 14, 2011). "Pawlenty: No VP thoughts this time". Politico. Retrieved January 14, 2011. 
^ Davenport, Reid (January 18, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty: If I run, it will be for the presidency". The GW Hatchet. The George Washington University. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ a b Weiner, Jay (January 18, 2011). "In campaign-like appearance, Pawlenty shows off 'Courage to Stand' ... and to sit, signing books". MinnPost. Retrieved January 18, 2011. 
^ a b Bryan Fischer and Tim Pawlenty. AFA's Bryan Fischer Interviews Tim Pawlenty. YouTube (Google). Retrieved January 17, 2011. 
^ Exclusive – Tim Pawlenty Extended Interview (Episode #16007). The Daily Show (Comedy Partners). January 12, 2010. Retrieved January 17, 2011. 
^ Duffy, J.P. (December 15, 2010). "FRC, Members of Congress, Governors, and Conservative Leaders Release Open Letter Calling for Civil Debate, End to Character Assassination". Retrieved January 30, 2011. 
^ Pawlenty, Tim (December 13, 2010). "Government Unions vs. Taxpayers". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Marr, Kendra (March 21, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty forms 2012 presidential exploratory committee". Politico. Retrieved March 21, 2011. 
^ Camia, Catalina (March 21, 2011). "Pawlenty launches committee to explore White House bid". USA Today. Retrieved March 21, 2011. 
^ Aliyah Shahid (April 13, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty to CNN's Piers Morgan: 'I'm running for President,' spokesman walks it back". Daily News (New York). Retrieved January 13, 2012.  and in context Tim Pawlenty Tells Piers Morgan: "I'm Running For President". CNN via PoliticsNewsNews via YouTube (Google). Retrieved April 15, 2011. 
^ "@CNN report of @TimPawlenty on @piersmorgan is out of context. Obviously, Pawlenty has exploratory committee to run for President. Not VP," wrote Alex Conant, his spokesman, in Wallbank, Derek (April 12, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty accidentally confirms the obvious, then walks it back". MinnPost. Retrieved April 15, 2011. 
^ "Real change is about telling hard truths". USA Today. May 23, 2011. 
^ Pawlenty 'betting it all on Iowa' in presidential run. KARE-TV. Multimedia KARE. May 23, 2011. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Tim Pawlenty – A Time for Truth (Preview of Monday's Announcement). YouTube (Google). May 22, 2011. Retrieved May 22, 2011. 
^ Shear, Michael (May 22, 2011). "Pawlenty Announces Candidacy a Day Early". The New York Times. Retrieved May 22, 2011. 
^ Seib, Gerald F. (May 23, 2011). "Is America Ready for President TPaw?". The Wall Street Journal. Dow Jones. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Reinhard, Beth (August 13, 2011). "Bachmann Boom; TPaw Bust?". National Journal. Archived from the original on October 25, 2011. Retrieved August 14, 2011. 
^ "PolitiFact: Obamacare was patterned after (Mitt Romney's) plan in Massachusetts". August 12, 2011. Retrieved August 9, 2012. 
^ Lucy Madison (June 14, 2011). "Will backing off "Obamneycare" in GOP debate hurt Pawlenty's campaign?". CBS News. Retrieved November 2, 2012. 
^ Jens Manuel Krogstad (June 14, 2011). "Pawlenty decision to back off "Obamneycare" criticism questioned". Des Moined Register. Retrieved November 2, 2012. 
^ Bakst, Brian (August 14, 2011). "Ex-Minn. Gov. Tim Pawlenty ends White House bid". The Huffington Post. Associated Press. Retrieved August 14, 2011. 
^ Memoli, Michael (2011-09-12). "Tim Pawlenty backs former rival Mitt Romney for president". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved 2011-09-12. 
^ Parker, Ashley & Barbaro, Michael (July 17, 2012). "Caution, Not Flash, as Romney Seeks His No. 2". New York Times. Retrieved July 18, 2012. 
^ "Mitt Romney loses Tim Pawlenty as campaign co-chair 45 days before election", newsday.com.
^ "Roundtable Management" Archived November 15, 2012, at the Wayback Machine., FSR webpage. Retrieved 2012-11-08.
^ Orol, Ronald D., "Pawlenty: ‘Walls of reality’ closing on Congress", MarketWatch, November 7, 2012. Retrieved 2012-11-08.
^ Art Hughes (November 6, 2002). "Pawlenty sets stage for a Capitol revolution". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Mary Pawlenty leaves bench for new job". Minnesota Public radio. Associated Press. January 4, 2007. 
^ "Minn. First Lady to Join Gilbert Mediation Center". wcco.com. Associated Press. September 2007. Archived from the original on May 18, 2008. 
^ "Tim (Timothy J.) Pawlenty". Minnesota Historical Society. 
^ Lewis, Matt (January 2011). "Tim Pawlenty on Michele Bachmann, Michael Steele . . . and Hockey". Politics Daily. Retrieved May 16, 2011. 
^ Todd, Chuck; Murray, Mark; Montanaro, Domenico (May 23, 2011). "2012: Daniels is out, T-Paw and Cain are in". First Read. MSNBC. Archived from the original on May 28, 2011. 
^ "Who's afraid of Mitt and T-Paw...". Front Row Washington. Reuters. May 20, 2011. 
^ Antle, W. James III (May 23, 2011). "TPaw and TARP, Cont'd". The American Spectator. 
^ a b "Pawlenty: An economic pro or crafty budget setter?". Fox News. Associated Press. May 25, 2011. 
^ "Klobuchar Approval Rating Highest PPP Has Found in Last Year" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. April 16, 2009. 
^ "Palin At The Top – And Bottom – for GOP Voters in 2012 – Rasmussen Reports". Rasmussen Reports. July 7, 2009. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ "SurveyUSA News Poll #16315". SurveyUSA. March 3, 2010. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ "Election 2010: Minnesota Governor". Rasmussen Reports, LLC. October 22, 2010. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ "Pawlenty Begins Race With 41% GOP Name Recognition". Gallup. March 23, 2011. 
^ "Voters tepid toward Obama, but favor him over GOP". Public Policy Polling. March 16, 2011. 
^ "Obama a lock in Minnesota" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. June 6, 2011. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1994. p. 145. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1996. pp. 155–156. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1998. pp. 142–143. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2000. p. 481. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2006. pp. 456–463. 


External links



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Tim Pawlenty.




Biography portal
Minnesota portal
Politics portal




Tim Pawlenty at Minnesota Legislators Past & Present

Profile at Project Vote Smart
Financial information (federal office) at the Federal Election Commission
Appearances on C-SPAN
Campaign contributions at Follow the Money (U.S. House)
Campaign 2002 – Minnesota Governor Minnesota Public Radio
Campaign 2006 – Tim Pawlenty Minnesota Public Radio



Minnesota House of Representatives


Preceded by
Art Seaberg
Member of the Minnesota House of Representatives
from District 38B
1993–2003
Succeeded by
Lynn Wardlow


Preceded by
Ted Winter
Majority Leader of the Minnesota House of Representatives
1999–2003
Succeeded by
Erik Paulsen


Party political offices


Preceded by
Norm Coleman
Republican nominee for Governor of Minnesota
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Emmer


Political offices


Preceded by
Jesse Ventura
Governor of Minnesota
2003–2011
Succeeded by
Mark Dayton


Preceded by
Janet Napolitano
Chair of National Governors Association
2007–2008
Succeeded by
Ed Rendell








v
t
e


Governors of Minnesota



Territorial (1849–58)



Ramsey
Gorman
Medary








State (since 1858)



Sibley
Ramsey
Swift
Miller
Marshall
Austin
Davis
Pillsbury
Hubbard
McGill
Merriam
Nelson
Clough
Lind
Van Sant
Johnson
Eberhart
Hammond
Burnquist
Preus
Christianson
Olson
Petersen
Benson
Stassen
Thye
Youngdahl
E. Anderson
Freeman
Andersen
Rolvaag
LeVander
W. Anderson
Perpich
Quie
Perpich
Carlson
Ventura
Pawlenty
Dayton












v
t
e


Chairs of the National Governors Association






Willson
McGovern
Walsh
Spry
Capper
Harrington
Allen
Sproul
Cox
Trinkle
Brewster
McMullen
Dern
Case
Pollard
Rolph
McNutt
Peery
Cochran
Stark
Vanderbilt
Stassen
O'Conor
Saltonstall
Maw
Martin
Caldwell
Hildreth
Hunt
Lane
Carlson
Lausche
Peterson
Shivers
Thornton
Kennon
Langlie
Stanley
Stratton
Collins
Boggs
McNichols
Powell
Rosellini
Anderson
Sawyer
Reed
Guy
Volpe
Ellington
Love
Hearnes
Moore
Mandel
Evans
Rampton
Ray
Andrus
Askew
Milliken
Carroll
Bowen
Busbee
Snelling
Matheson
J. Thompson
Carlin
Alexander
Clinton
Sununu
Baliles
Branstad
Gardner
Ashcroft
Romer
Campbell
Dean
T. Thompson
Miller
Voinovich
Carper
Leavitt
Glendening
Engler
Patton
Kempthorne
Warner
Huckabee
Napolitano
Pawlenty
Rendell
Douglas
Manchin
Gregoire
Heineman
Markell
Fallin
Hickenlooper
Herbert
McAuliffe
Sandoval












v
t
e


Minnesota House Majority Leaders






W. Dunn
Wilson
Rockne
Rines
Wm. Nolan
Girling
Wi. Norton
McDonough
R. Dunn
Eastvold
R. Dunn
Cina
Dirlam
Lindstrom
Anderson
Knickerbocker
Eken
Sieben
Levi
Vanasek
Wynia
Long
Welle
Anderson
Carruthers
Winter
Pawlenty
Paulsen
Sertich
Dean
Murphy
Peppin















v
t
e


(2008 ←)    United States presidential election, 2012    (→ 2016)






United States elections, 2012
Fundraising
National polls
Statewide polls (pre-2012, early 2012)
Timeline
General election debates
Newspaper endorsements
International reactions
Hurricane Sandy





Democratic Party

Convention
Primaries

Newspaper endorsements





Incumbent nominee: Barack Obama

campaign
endorsements
positions


Incumbent VP nominee: Joe Biden

positions




Challengers: Bob Ely
Keith Judd
Warren Mosler
Darcy Richardson
Jim Rogers
Vermin Supreme
Randall Terry
John Wolfe





Republican Party

Convention
Primaries
Debates

Statewide polls
National polls

Straw polls

Newspaper endorsements





Nominee: Mitt Romney

campaign
endorsements
positions


VP nominee: Paul Ryan

positions




Candidates: Michele Bachmann (campaign)
Herman Cain (campaign)
Jack Fellure
Newt Gingrich (campaign)
Stewart Greenleaf
Jon Huntsman (campaign)
Gary Johnson (campaign)
Fred Karger
Andy Martin
Thaddeus McCotter (campaign)
Jimmy McMillan
Roy Moore
Ron Paul (campaign)
Tim Pawlenty (campaign)
Rick Perry (campaign)
Buddy Roemer (campaign)
Rick Santorum (campaign)





Libertarian Party

Convention
Primaries





Nominee: Gary Johnson

campaign
positions


VP nominee: Jim Gray


Candidates: Jim Duensing
R. J. Harris
Carl Person
Sam Sloan
R. Lee Wrights





Green Party

Convention





Nominee: Jill Stein (campaign)
VP nominee: Cheri Honkala


Candidates: Stewart Alexander
Roseanne Barr
Kent Mesplay










Other third-party and independent candidates



American Independent Party



Nominee Tom Hoefling


Candidates Wiley Drake
Virgil Goode (campaign)
Edward C. Noonan
Laurie Roth





American Third Position Party



Nominee Merlin Miller
VP nominee Virginia Abernethy





America's Party



Nominee Tom Hoefling





Constitution Party

Convention





Nominee Virgil Goode (campaign)
VP nominee Jim Clymer


Candidates Darrell Castle
Laurie Roth
Robby Wells





Freedom Socialist Party



Nominee Stephen Durham





Grassroots Party



Nominee Jim Carlson





Justice Party



Nominee Rocky Anderson
VP nominee Luis J. Rodriguez





Objectivist Party



Nominee Tom Stevens





Party for Socialism and Liberation



Nominee Peta Lindsay





Peace and Freedom Party



Nominee Roseanne Barr
VP nominee Cindy Sheehan


Candidates Stewart Alexander
Rocky Anderson
Stephen Durham
Peta Lindsay





Prohibition Party



Nominee Jack Fellure


Candidates James Hedges





Reform Party



Nominee Andre Barnett


Candidates Laurence Kotlikoff
Darcy Richardson
Buddy Roemer (campaign)
Robert David Steele
Robby Wells





Socialist Equality Party



Nominee Jerry White





Socialist Workers Party



Nominee James Harris





Socialist Party



Nominee Stewart Alexander (campaign)
VP nominee Alejandro Mendoza





Independents



Candidates Lee Abramson
Randy Blythe
Jeff Boss
Robert Burck
Terry Jones
Joe Schriner





Draft movements



Michael Bloomberg (movement)













State results






Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming











Other 2012 elections: House
Senate
Gubernatorial









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 160316458
LCCN: n2010076275
SUDOC: 157114341










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Tim_Pawlenty&oldid=792355660"					
Categories: 1960 births21st-century American politiciansAmerican people of German descentAmerican people of Polish descentBaptists from the United StatesConverts to Baptist denominationsConverts to Baptist denominations from Roman CatholicismGovernors of MinnesotaLiving peopleMembers of the Minnesota House of RepresentativesMinnesota lawyersMinnesota RepublicansPoliticians from Saint Paul, MinnesotaPeople from Eagan, MinnesotaPeople from South St. Paul, MinnesotaRepublican Party state governors of the United StatesUnited States presidential candidates, 2012University of Minnesota Law School alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from July 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from November 2016Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


ČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançaisHornjoserbsceItalianoעבריתNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 26 July 2017, at 01:16.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Tim Pawlenty - Wikipedia




















 







Tim Pawlenty

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Tim Pawlenty








Chair of the National Governors Association


In office
July 23, 2007 – July 14, 2008


Preceded by
Janet Napolitano


Succeeded by
Ed Rendell


39th Governor of Minnesota


In office
January 6, 2003 – January 3, 2011


Lieutenant
Carol Molnau


Preceded by
Jesse Ventura


Succeeded by
Mark Dayton


Majority Leader of the Minnesota House of Representatives


In office
January 3, 1999 – January 3, 2003


Governor
Jesse Ventura


Preceded by
Ted Winter


Succeeded by
Erik Paulsen


Member of the Minnesota House of Representatives
from District 38B


In office
January 3, 1993 – January 3, 2003


Preceded by
Art Seaberg


Succeeded by
Lynn Wardlow





Personal details


Born
Timothy James Pawlenty
(1960-11-27) November 27, 1960 (age 56)
Saint Paul, Minnesota, U.S.


Nationality
American


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Mary Anderson


Children
2


Alma mater
University of Minnesota, Twin Cities (BA, JD)


Signature



Timothy James "Tim" Pawlenty (/pəˈlɛnti/;[1] born November 27, 1960) is president and CEO of Financial Services Roundtable, a Washington, D.C.-based industry advocacy group. He was a Republican politician who served as the 39th Governor of Minnesota (2003–2011). He previously served in the Minnesota House of Representatives (1993–2003), where he was majority leader for two terms. In 2011, he entered the campaign for the Republican presidential nomination and later was a potential vice presidential nominee before serving as co-chair of Mitt Romney's campaign.
Pawlenty was born in Saint Paul, Minnesota, and raised in nearby South St. Paul. He graduated from University of Minnesota with a B.A. in political science and a J.D. His early career included working as a labor law attorney and the vice president of a software as a service company. After settling in the city of Eagan with his wife, Pawlenty was appointed to the city's Planning Commission and was elected to the Eagan City Council at the age of 28. He won a seat as a state representative in 1992, representing District 38B in suburban Dakota County. He was re-elected four times and was voted majority leader by House Republicans in 1998.
After narrowly winning the Republican gubernatorial primary in 2002, Pawlenty won a three-way election for Governor of Minnesota, and was re-elected in 2006 by a margin of less than one percent. His campaign platform focused on balancing the budget without raising taxes. During Pawlenty's governorship, he did not raise income taxes, but did enact targeted increases in sales tax and user fees. His administration advocated for numerous public works projects, including work on the Northstar Commuter Rail Line, and the construction of Target Field, a Major League Baseball stadium in Minneapolis. He signed a bill mandating 20% ethanol in gasoline by 2013. He cut health care costs in an attempt to balance the budget, and borrowed funds from the state's K-12 education and low income programs. He signed an executive order rejecting federal funds related to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act. He also led worldwide trips for business leaders and trade delegations to explore trade opportunities. In the 2007–2008 term, he served as chairman of the National Governors Association.
Pawlenty was rumored to be a contender for both the Republican presidential and vice presidential nominations during the 2008 election, and he officially sought the 2012 Republican presidential nomination from May to August 2011. After withdrawing from that race, he became a finalist to join his party's nominee on the 2012 ticket as its vice presidential candidate.[2] Pawlenty was not selected as Mitt Romney's vice presidential candidate, but served as co-chair of Romney's campaign. In September 2012, he left Romney's campaign to become a Washington lobbyist for financial institutions.[3]



Contents


1 Early life, education, and early career
2 Minnesota House of Representatives
3 Governorship

3.1 Election, 2002
3.2 Reelection, 2006
3.3 State budget

3.3.1 Minnesota Supreme Court case


3.4 Funding projects
3.5 Education
3.6 Transportation
3.7 Crime
3.8 Energy policy and climate change
3.9 Health
3.10 Foreign relations
3.11 Other activities


4 2012 presidential campaign

4.1 Early steps
4.2 Book tour and political positions
4.3 Candidacy


5 Financial Services Roundtable
6 Personal life
7 Public image

7.1 Political views
7.2 Approval ratings
7.3 Electoral history


8 References
9 External links



Early life, education, and early career
Pawlenty was born in Saint Paul, Minnesota, to Eugene Joseph Pawlenty, and his wife, Virginia Frances (née Oldenburg).[4][5] His father, who drove a milk delivery truck, was of Polish descent, while his mother was of German ancestry.[4] His mother died of cancer when he was 16.[6] Pawlenty grew up in South St. Paul,[5] where he played ice hockey on his high school's junior varsity squad.[7]
Intending to become a dentist, Pawlenty enrolled in the University of Minnesota, the only one in his family to go beyond high school.[8] However, he changed his plans and spent the summers of 1980 and 1982 working as an intern at the office of U.S. Senator David Durenberger.[5] In 1983, he graduated with a B.A. in political science.[9] He received a Juris Doctor from the University of Minnesota Law School in 1986.[10] While in law school, he met wife, Mary Anderson, whom he married in 1987.[11]
Pawlenty first worked as a labor law attorney at the firm Rider Bennett (later Rider, Bennett, Egan & Arundel), where he had interned while a law student.[12] He later became vice president of a software as a service company, Wizmo Inc.[13][14]
Having moved to Eagan, Minnesota, a suburb of Minneapolis – Saint Paul, Pawlenty was appointed to the city's Planning Commission by Mayor Vic Ellison.[14][15] One year later, at age 28, he was elected to the City Council.[6]
Pawlenty entered state politics in 1990 as a campaign advisor for Jon Grunseth's losing bid for Minnesota governor.[6] After Pawlenty himself became governor, he appointed Grunseth's ex-wife, Vicky Tigwell, to the board of the Minneapolis−Saint Paul International Airport, an action which became an ethics and accountability issue in 2003.[16][17]
Minnesota House of Representatives
Pawlenty was elected to the Minnesota House of Representatives in 1992, winning 49.1 percent of the vote in District 38B (suburban Dakota County).[18] In the House, he authored bills instituting term limits for committee chairmen, funding for infant parenting classes, minimum sentences for repeat domestic violence offenders, and community notification for sex offenders. In response to a state budget surplus, he advocated for a tax reduction rather than expanded education funding.[19] He was reelected four times and was chosen House Majority Leader when the Republicans became the majority party in the State Legislature in 1998.[20]
Governorship
Election, 2002
Main article: Minnesota gubernatorial election, 2002
In 2002, Pawlenty wanted to run for governor, but party leaders made it clear they favored businessman Brian Sullivan.[6][21] Pawlenty then decided on the U.S. Senate, but he abandoned those plans when Vice President Dick Cheney asked him to step aside and allow former St. Paul mayor Norm Coleman to challenge Senator Paul Wellstone without Republican primary opposition.[22] Pawlenty returned to his original ambition and won a hard-fought and narrow victory over Sullivan in the Republican party primary election.[23]
In the general election, Pawlenty faced two strong opponents. His main rival was veteran Democratic–Farmer–Labor (DFL) state senator Roger Moe. Former Democratic Congressman Tim Penny ran on the Independence Party ticket (Governor Jesse Ventura, a member of the Independence Party, chose not to seek reelection). Until mid-October 2002, all three were essentially tied in the polls.[24] Pawlenty's major campaign stances included: a pledge not to raise taxes to balance the state's budget deficit (while allowing for increases in license and user fees);[24] that visa expiration dates be required to be printed on driver's licenses; that women seeking an abortion be required to wait at least 24 hours; enactment of a concealed carry gun law; and reform of the state's education requirements.[25] Pawlenty won the election with 43.8 percent of the vote.[26] His largest gains after the October three-way tie were reportedly among voters in the suburbs of Minneapolis–St. Paul.[24]
Reelection, 2006
Main article: Minnesota gubernatorial election, 2006
Governor Pawlenty ran for re-election in 2006.[27] He espoused conservative stands on issues. But conservatives criticized him on funding issues, in particular two pieces of legislation for stadiums for the Gophers and Minnesota Twins, and bond issues for public transit, including the Northstar commuter rail line.[28]
The 2006 gubernatorial race included Minnesota Attorney General Mike Hatch, of the DFL; Peter Hutchinson of the Independence Party; and Ken Pentel of the Green Party. Pawlenty won, defeating Hatch by a margin of less than one percent, though both the state House and Senate gained DFL majority.[29]
State budget
Pawlenty was elected in 2002 on a platform of balancing the state's budget without raising taxes. He emphasized his campaign and first term with the Taxpayers League of Minnesota slogan "no new taxes."[30] His governorship was characterized by a historically low rate of spending growth. According to the Minnesota Management and Budget Department, general-fund expenditures from 2004 to 2011 increased an average of 3.5 percent per two-year term, compared to an average of 21.1 percent from 1960 to 2003 (these numbers, however, are not inflation-adjusted).[31][32][33] University of Minnesota political science professor Larry Jacobs said that slowing down state spending and opposing tax increases were the "signature issue" of Pawlenty's governorship.[34]
In his first year as governor, Pawlenty inherited a projected two-year budget deficit of $4.3 billion, the largest in Minnesota's history.[35] After a contentious budget session with a Democrat-controlled Senate, he signed a package of fee increases, spending reductions, and government reorganization which eliminated the deficit. The budget reduced the rate of funding increases for state services, including transportation, social services, and welfare. It also enacted a perennial proposal to restructure city aid based on immediate need, rather than historical factors. In negotiations the governor agreed to several compromises, abandoning a desired public employee wage freeze and property tax restrictions.[35]
During his second term, Pawlenty erased a $2.7-billion deficit by cutting spending, shifting payments, and using one-time federal stimulus money.[36] His final budget (2010–2011) was the state's first two-year period since 1960 in which net government expenditures decreased. Pawlenty has claimed this as "the first time in 150 years" that spending has been cut, but fact-checkers have disputed this claim as no public budget records prior to 1960 are known to exist.[33][37]
Pawlenty has been criticized by some for providing a short-term budget solution but coming up short in his long-term strategy as governor. The state department of Management and Budget reports that the two-year budget starting in July 2011 is projected to come up $4.4 billion short.[36] Former Minnesota Governor Arne Carlson, a Republican, criticized Pawlenty's budget strategy: he borrowed more than $1 billion from the tobacco settlement (money set aside for health care), borrowed more than $1.4 billion from K-12 education funding, borrowed more than $400 [million][38] from the Health Care Access Fund for low-income families, among other short-term shifts in accounting. The result was a $5-billion deficit, the seventh largest in the United States.[39] Minnesota property taxes rose $2.5 billion, more than the previous 16 years combined, and Moody's lowered the state's bond rating.[40] Carlson told Time, "I don't think any governor has left behind a worse financial mess than he [Pawlenty] has." Pawlenty responded, "My friend governor Arne Carlson is, of course, now an Obama and John Kerry supporter."[41]
Minnesota Supreme Court case




Minnesota Supreme Court chamber at the Minnesota State Capitol


While Pawlenty said he was "confident" in his right to use unallotment, the Minnesota Supreme Court ultimately decided against him, voting 4 to 3 in a decision in May 2010.[42] His budget had been the subject of a lawsuit in Ramsey County District Court, which was decided against him. Judge Kathleen Gearin decided Pawlenty exceeded his constitutional authority in making unilateral spending cuts to a $5.3-million special dietary program that he had unalloted.[43][44] Attorney David Lillehaug said initially, "This is, I don't think it's understating this to say, this is one of the most important court cases in Minnesota legal history."[45] Pawlenty announced the following day that he would appeal;[46] he filed his defense in February,[47] and arguments were heard on March 15.[48][49] In May, the Supreme Court affirmed Judge Gearin, deciding that "Because the legislative and executive branches never enacted a balanced budget for the 2010–2011 biennium, use of the unallotment power to address the unresolved deficit exceeded the authority granted to the executive branch by the statute".[50] Pawlenty responded:[51]

I will fight to reduce spending and taxes in Minnesota and that battle continues. My commitment to the people of Minnesota remains the same: we will balance the budget without raising taxes.

After the court ruling, as the 2010 legislative session drew to a close, Pawlenty vetoed a budget which would fix a $2.9-billion deficit by adding a new tax bracket for six-figure incomes. In response to the proposal, he criticized Democrats for attempting to raise taxes in the midst of an extremely difficult economic situation.[52] Eventually, due in part to the efforts of House Speaker Margaret Kelliher, who was running for the 2010 Democratic nomination for governor of Minnesota, the General Assembly passed legislation approving nearly all the original unallotments.[53]
Funding projects
Since the Minnesota Constitution prohibits state-run gambling outside of Native territory, Pawlenty proposed negotiating with Minnesota's 11 tribes over profit-sharing of their casinos.[54] Legislators also pushed a proposal to turn Canterbury Park horse track into a racino.[55] The plan was poorly received by Northern Tribes who would operate part of the racino, citing reluctance to compete with other tribes.[56] Tribes with casinos opposed the expanded gambling and some legislators objected on moral grounds that the state shouldn't exploit problem gamblers. Politicians in heavy tribal areas feared losing campaign-finance sources if they supported the plan.[57][58] Delays by the Legislature ended with the bill being pulled from committee.[59] Tribes had spent millions lobbying legislatures in 2004.[60]
Pawlenty worked throughout 2006 to fund a Minnesota Twins baseball stadium in Minneapolis.[61] The resulting Minnesota Twins-Hennepin County ballpark bill called for an increased county sales tax which passed the state legislature and was symbolically signed in at the Hubert H. Humphrey Metrodome.[62][63] The majority of Hennepin County commissioners did not feel a referendum was necessary to approve the sales tax because of the delay it would cause. Pawlenty and the Legislature agreed, citing 10 years already of the project's debate, and exempted the county from state law requiring one in the bill.[64][65]
In June 2006, Pawlenty signed a $999.9-million public works bill that included funding for additional work on the Northstar Commuter rail line (a change in position from reservations about the idea he initially expressed), an expanded Faribault prison, a bioscience building at the University of Minnesota, and science facilities at Minnesota State University in Mankato. The bill also funded a $26-million expansion of the University of Minnesota's Carlson School of Management.[66]
In 2011, Pawlenty shut down an Islamic finance program, that was part of a larger program to increase home ownership in Minnesota, and his spokesperson said that the program accommodated the Muslim ban on interest.[67] Adam Sorensen from TIME questioned whether this was a case of double standards, pointing out New York's kosher food regulations, Blue Laws that prohibit alcohol sales on Sundays, and Pawlenty's own creation of "The Governor's Council On Faith-Based And Community Initiatives".[68]
Education
In the budget process, Pawlenty made an effort to preserve education funding while cutting other government spending. In 2009, he bolstered education funding using federal stimulus grants. Despite this, education funding fell from $9,700 to $8,400 per student (adjusted for inflation) during his tenure.[69] Pawlenty was an advocate for charter schools and was praised by the National Alliance for Public Charter Schools for his education policies. In 2010, the organization rated Minnesota #1 in the country for charter school promotion.[70]
Pawlenty oversaw the repeal of the Profile of Learning Kindergarten through 12th grade graduation requirements and sought to reinstate them during his governorship.[71] Renamed the Minnesota Academic Standards, they were guided by Department of Education commissioner Cheri Pierson Yecke. The bill's first draft raised several concerns by the education review boards including the amount of content, age-appropriateness, and a European-centric view of the social sciences portion.[72] Yecke revised and expanded material based on the response.[73] Even as both Legislative houses passed the Academic Standards bill, her confirmation as commissioner was rejected by the DFL majority Minnesota Senate.[74] She was seen as an outsider coming from Virginia and became unpopular for having pushed the academic reforms during a tight budget session as well as her critical look of Minnesota schools.[75] In her confirmation hearing, DFLers also noted concern over her conservative viewpoints.[75]
In June 2006, Pawlenty proposed the ACHIEVE program for the top 25% of high school graduates.[76] The program would pay for tuition for the first 2 years (4 years for selected fields such as science, technology, engineering and math) and would cost the state an estimated $112 million per 2-year cycle. However the program was not included in the 2007 higher education bill.[77]
Pawlenty used an accounting change called a tax shift to balance the state deficit without raising taxes. School districts statewide may unexpectedly lose $58 million in interest and reserve revenue.[78]
In 2010, Pawlenty vetoed a bill (HF 3164), which the legislature had passed 110 to 20, calling for Minnesota State Colleges & Universities (MnSCU) to revamp its credit transferring system within five years to fix "minimal loss of credits for transferring students" who had been losing between 10 and 30 percent of their credits.[79] Pawlenty found it "unnecessary" because MnSCU was fixing its system already "through internal actions and policy changes".[79]
Transportation




U.S. Representative Keith Ellison speaking at the site of the I-35W Mississippi River Bridge collapse in Minneapolis. He is flanked by Governor Pawlenty on the picture's left. To right: Mayor R. T. Rybak, Secretary of Transportation Mary Peters behind Ellison, Betty McCollum, and Senator Norm Coleman


During Pawlenty's first term, urban traffic congestion was a significant concern of voters. He appointed his lieutenant governor, Carol Molnau, as transportation commissioner, for which she was approved by the legislature in May 2004.[80] Molnau attempted to reform the transportation department, (Mn/DOT), using concepts such as "design-build". Legislators criticized Molnau's performance as transportation commissioner, citing ineffective leadership and management, and removed her from that role in February 2008, a decision Pawlenty said was motivated by partisanship.[80][81]
Pawlenty favored raising fees and imposing toll lanes on roads as the primary means of discouraging excessive traffic. During his term, the carpool lanes of Interstate 394 leading into downtown Minneapolis were converted into high-occupancy toll lanes. Pawlenty used or threatened vetoes in 2005, 2007 and 2008 on legislation funding proposed highway expansion, infrastructure repairs, road maintenance, and mass transit.[82] The 2008 veto was in spite of Pawlenty's announcement that he would consider reversing his opposition to a state gas-tax increase for funding road and bridge repairs, in the wake of the collapse of the I-35W Mississippi River bridge.[83]
Pawlenty had opposed the Northstar Commuter Rail as a legislator, but changed his position in 2004, announcing a funding plan to jump-start the project, when the Bush administration determined the rail line was deemed cost-effective and time-saving for commuters.[84]
In April 2008 during the budget bonding bill signing, Pawlenty used his line-item veto on $70 million pledged toward the building of the Central Corridor light-rail project, intended to connect Minneapolis and Saint Paul. In vetoing the expenditure, Pawlenty did not consult Peter Bell, head of the Metro Council and project leader.[85] Pawlenty stated that he vetoed the bill in order to send a message to the Legislature, which had exceeded his initial budget request, that they needed to "stay focused, be fiscally disciplined, set priorities and solve this budget crisis in a fiscally disciplined way."[86] Pawlenty however was supportive of the project and had requested the money in the bonding bill he submitted to the Minnesota State Legislature.[86] The veto disappointed some of Minnesota's congressional representatives in Washington, including Minnesota's Republican Senator Norm Coleman, who pledged to "raise my voice as strong as I can, as loud as I can. The federal commitment is there."[87] Though Pawlenty's veto might have delayed the ability of the state to receive federal matching funds for the project, Bell said the project was not derailed.[85] The Central Corridor funding issue was resolved on May 19, 2008, with the state pledging its original amount towards the project after legislators compromised with Pawlenty's budget requests.[88]
There were Republican state legislators who supported other cuts of the bonding bill, including Doug Magnus, the ranking Republican on the House Transportation Finance Division, who praised Pawlenty's "fiscal responsibility."[89] Critics, including Chris Coleman, Mayor of Saint Paul, called Pawlenty's veto "political gamesmanship," seeing the move as retribution for the Legislature's successful override of Pawlenty's veto of a transportation bonding bill.[86] They noted cuts overwhelmingly targeted Democratic districts, and Democratic stronghold Saint Paul most heavily.[90][91]
Crime
Crime in Minnesota was a high-profile political issue during Pawlenty's governorship. When crime rates in Minneapolis spiked 16 percent from 2004 to 2005, city officials blamed Pawlenty for large cuts to state aid, which they said restricted public safety resources. Pawlenty in turn criticized the capital city for poorly allocating its funding.[92]
Pawlenty made two large efforts to expand penalties for sexual offenders. In response to his first proposal in 2005, the state legislature passed a large package of sentencing reforms. One new instrument was the possibility of a life sentence without parole for serious offenders, although Pawlenty expressed disapproval at the courts' reluctance to use this option: only seven individuals received such a sentence in the first two years of implementation.[93] Pawlenty made a push for even harsher sentences in 2010, which increased the presumptive sentence for first-degree sex offenses from 12 years to 25 years and increased it further for repeat offenders. At the same time he advocated for a $90-million expansion of the state's civil commitment program for sexual offenders, maintaining that the increased criminal sentences would keep the commitment program's cost under control.[93] According to a single report in the Star Tribune, "A report on Minnesota's sex-offender program delivered to legislators in the final days of the Pawlenty administration was heavily edited by a top political appointee to reflect the former governor's skepticism about the effectiveness of treatment and to delete arguments for expanded community resources for offenders."[94]
Early in 2006, after issuing a study that estimated the cost of illegal immigration to the state as approximately $188 million, Pawlenty announced a program for changing the way the state dealt with persons who were in the United States illegally. Pawlenty said that the economic benefits of illegal immigration did not justify the illegal behavior.[95] Pawlenty's extensive proposal included the designation of 10 state law enforcement officials as the Minnesota Illegal Immigration Enforcement Team, "trained to question, detain and arrest suspected illegal immigrants" with a focus on "such crimes as human trafficking, identity theft, methamphetamine distribution and terrorism." He rounded out his proposal with tougher penalties for false identification, and instituting a fine of up to $5,000 for employers of illegal immigrants. His proposal was challenged by DFL senators who preferred increased legal immigration to punitive action.[96]
Energy policy and climate change




A United States Postal Service vehicle advertising its use of E85 fuel during the Saint Paul Winter Carnival parade in January 2007.


Minnesota has mandated a 10% mixture of gasoline and ethanol (gasohol) since 1997. Pawlenty signed into law in May 2005 a bill that will raise the minimum mandated mixture to 20% in 2013. Pawlenty has also lobbied the Governors' Ethanol Coalition to mandate higher ethanol use nationwide.[97]
Conservative Republican governors were not supportive of Pawlenty's presentation on clean energy to the governor's association, which he gave in cooperation with Ed Rendell, who was the governor of Pennsylvania and the National Governors Association's Democratic vice-chairman. With Kathleen Sebelius of Kansas, Pawlenty was co-chairman of the association's energy committee. The effort received "adamant opposition" from governors of petroleum (oil) producing states.[98]
In 2007, Governor Pawlenty signed the Next Generation Energy Act of 2007 into law and, along with six other Midwestern governors, the Midwestern Greenhouse Gas Accord. These directed state agencies to develop a plan to reduce greenhouse gases, and "develop a market-based and multi-sector cap-and-trade mechanism".[99] However, by 2009 Pawlenty had reversed his position and called cap-and-trade "overly bureaucratic" and a potential "disaster".[99] By 2011, Pawlenty's position had changed sufficiently to state "the weight of the evidence is that most of it, maybe all of it, is because of natural causes."[100]
Health
In 2004, Minnesota's Star Tribune newspaper opined that the credibility of Pawlenty's commissioner of health, Dianne Mandernach, suffered when a website posting by the department suggested that abortion might have a role in breast cancer. She also angered many when it was learned she had delayed releasing government research on cancer in miners. In 2007, Mandernach resigned.[101]
In 2005, Pawlenty asked a U.S. Senate subcommittee to allow his MinnesotaCare health plan to expand and continue allowing state residents and employees to import cheaper Canadian prescription drugs.[102]
In 2007, Pawlenty signed into law the 2007 Omnibus Health and Human Services Appropriations Bill, which provided funding for the Health Care Transformation Task Force, a panel of health care experts charged with exploring ways to reduce health care spending, improve quality, and ensure that Minnesota develops a universal health care plan by 2011.[103]
Later in his tenure he used health care funding cuts as a mechanism to balance the state budget. After years of assuring doctors that the state "sick tax" would be used only to fund health welfare programs, in 2009 Pawlenty recommended a 3% cut in physician reimbursements from the state and asked that the sick tax be put instead into the state's general budget.[104] Pawlenty used a line-item veto to remove $381 million from health and human services funding, a removal which could lead to 35,000 Minnesotans' losing their General Assistance Medical Care (GAMC) health insurance in 2011.[105] Hennepin County Medical Center—the largest provider of health care to Minnesota's poor and uninsured—closed two clinics, reduced its staff and reduced access to non-emergency services.[106] State Senator Linda Berglin wrote a bill that would extend GAMC funding.[107]
In 2010, he refused federal health care funds including more than $1 billion to expand the number of Minnesotans covered by Medicaid, $68 million for a high-risk insurance pool, $1 million to help set up an insurance exchange where consumers could shop for health coverage, and $850,000 for teenage pregnancy prevention. Pawlenty accepted a $500,000 abstinence-only sex-education grant that would require $350,000 in matching state money. Pawlenty said, "It doesn't say we have to apply for all of them."[108]
Foreign relations




Tim Pawlenty meeting Minnesota National Guard troops in Kosovo (April 12, 2008)


Pawlenty's first term coincided with the deployment of National Guardsmen from numerous states, connected with the War on Terror and the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan. During his two terms Pawlenty made trips to Iraq, Afghanistan, Bosnia, Kosovo, and Kuwait visiting Minnesota troops.[109]
Pawlenty was visited in 2004 by Mexican President Vicente Fox in talks to strengthen trade. Fox announced that his country would open a consulate in Minnesota the next year, removing the need for Mexican residents in the state to travel out of state for identification papers and other materials.[110] In mid-2006, in response to illegal immigration, Pawlenty sent Minnesota National Guardsmen to the U.S.–Mexico border at the request of the U.S. Department of Defense and the U.S. Department of Homeland Security.[111]
Pawlenty took a delegation of nearly 200 Minnesotan business, government, academic and civic leaders on a weeklong trip to China in mid-November 2005. The stated objectives were to provide a forum for companies to acquire market information, assess market potential, evaluate market entry strategies and identify potential business partners, as well as to promote Chinese investment in Minnesota.[112] Pawlenty also led Minnesota trade delegations to Canada in 2003,[113] Poland and the Czech Republic in 2004,[114] India in 2007,[113] and Israel in 2008.[109]
Other activities
Throughout his eight-year tenure, Pawlenty hosted a weekly one-hour radio show on WCCO-AM, a tradition he inherited from his predecessor as governor, Jesse Ventura.[115] Pawlenty was the chairman of the National Governors Association for the 2007–2008 term.[116] He also served as Chair of the Midwestern Governors Association in 2006.[117]
Beginning in 2005, Pawlenty was rumored in the press as a potential candidate for president of the United States.[118][119][120] When formally announcing his candidacy for a second term as Governor of Minnesota on May 31, 2006, Pawlenty said, "As to my future, if I run for governor and win, I will serve out my term for four years as governor."[121][122][123] On January 15, 2007, after being reelected, Pawlenty said, "I am committed to serving out my term as governor. That's what I am going to do."[124]
In 2007, it was announced that Pawlenty would be serving in a lead role for McCain as a national co-chair of his presidential exploratory committee[125] which led to Pawlenty's becoming co-chairman of McCain's campaign (along with Phil Gramm and Tom Loeffler).[126] In January 2008, a reporter for the Minneapolis Star Tribune suggested Pawlenty's renewed focus on his proposed immigration reform plans might be politically motivated as counterbalance to McCain's less favorable guest worker program.[127]
For many weeks, Pawlenty was widely considered to be a leading candidate for the vice-presidential nomination on the Republican ticket with John McCain in the 2008 presidential election.[128][129] In a surprise, McCain chose Alaska Governor Sarah Palin.[130]
In 2008, Pawlenty expressed support for the Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP). But in 2010 Pawlenty claimed that he had made those statements solely as a surrogate for presidential nominee McCain and never actually supported the idea himself.[131] On May 23, 2011, Pawlenty formally announced he'd run for the Republican presidential nomination, saying, “politicians are often afraid that if they're too honest, they might lose an election. I'm afraid that in 2012, if we're not honest enough, we may lose our country.”
2012 presidential campaign
Main article: Tim Pawlenty presidential campaign, 2012
Early steps
In February 2005, ABC News identified him as a potential candidate for president.[132] Pawlenty decided not to seek a third term as governor, and so was not a candidate in the November 2010 gubernatorial election.[133] In July 2009, Public Policy Polling conducted a poll that showed that President Obama was favored to win against Pawlenty in his home state of Minnesota by more than 10 points.[134] In October 2009, a CNN article suggested that Pawlenty was contemplating a 2012 White House bid.[135] Among those advising him in preparation for a potential presidential run was lobbyist and former Congressman Vin Weber.[136]
In late 2009, Pawlenty began taking steps that many saw as leading to a 2012 presidential bid.[137] He visited Iowa in November 2009 and April 2010, making political speeches.[138] In January 2011, the New York Times reported that "Few Americans, in fact, even know his name."[139] In January 2011, Pawlenty told the College Republicans group at The George Washington University "If I decide to run it would be for president, not vice president."[140][141]
Book tour and political positions




Pawlenty at a book signing in February 2011 in Phoenix, Arizona.


Pawlenty went on tour for his book Courage to Stand, and as of January 18, his book had reached #1,979 on Amazon.com's list of bestsellers.[142] Pawlenty calls himself a social conservative.[143] In his extended interview with Jon Stewart on The Daily Show, he said he thinks United States Social Security and Medicare need to be cut to balance the federal budget.[144] Pawlenty believes that state governments should outlaw abortion, except for cases of rape, incest, and to save a woman's life. He thinks the United States Supreme Court decided Roe v. Wade wrongly, abortion being a state, not a federal, matter. He opposes same-sex marriage and civil unions, and said on talk radio "... I have been a public supporter of maintaining Don't ask, don't tell and I would support reinstating it as well".[143]
In December 2010, Pawlenty was one of three U.S. governors who publicly declared solidarity with the Christian-right group Family Research Council.[145]
Pawlenty's tour was in Minneapolis, San Francisco and Dallas, and it ended January in Iowa where the Iowa Caucuses were scheduled for February 6, 2012. "That will come up fast," he said, "if I do run." In Minneapolis, speaking to Pat Kessler of WCCO-TV who asked about his feelings regarding a potential run for president by Representative Michele Bachmann, "I have a lot of respect for Michele Bachmann … Whether she runs or not, it's gonna be a big field. There's gonna be five, six, seven, eight people running … Whoever wants to run can run. The more, the merrier."[142]
In a December 2010 column in The Wall Street Journal, Pawlenty argued in favor of the historical benefits of "private sector" labor unions and strongly against "public sector" labor unions, whose collective bargaining rights he would like to see curbed: "The rise of the labor movement in the early 20th century was a triumph for America's working class. In an era of deep economic anxiety, unions stood up for hard-working but vulnerable families, protecting them from physical and economic exploitation." He also criticized modern unions: "The moral case for unions—protecting working families from exploitation—does not apply to public employment... Unionized public employees are making more money, receiving more generous benefits, and enjoying greater job security than the working families forced to pay for it with ever-higher taxes, deficits and debt."[146]
Candidacy
On March 21, 2011, Pawlenty announced, via Facebook, that he had formed an exploratory committee in preparation for a potential run for the 2012 Republican presidential nomination.[147][148]
On April 12, 2011, Pawlenty said clearly on CNN's Piers Morgan Tonight that he was "running for president" and not for vice president, adding that a formal announcement would be given in several weeks.[149] On Twitter, his spokesman said CNN took his comments out of context.[150]
On May 23, 2011, Pawlenty launched his candidacy for president in a speech in Iowa stating: "I'm going to try something a little unusual in politics. I'm just going to tell the truth."[151][152] A YouTube video[153] appeared a day before.[154] The Wall Street Journal wrote of his candidacy, and the luck he experienced in the GOP's field, that Pawlenty has a "golden chance to become the chief rival to... Mitt Romney".[155]
Pawlenty finished third in the Ames Straw Poll on August 13, 2011,[156] behind the winner Michele Bachmann and the runner-up Ron Paul. Before the Ames debate, he took a more aggressive stance against Romney, including the coining the term "Obamneycare".[157] When pressed by John King during CNN's June 13, 2011 debate to address why he used the word, he backed off.[158] However, he denied that he backed off.[159] The following day he announced his decision to withdraw from the presidential race.[160] On September 12, 2011, Pawlenty announced his endorsement of former Governor Mitt Romney of Massachusetts, as well as his position as national co-chair for Romney's campaign.[161] Romney retired over $400,000 of Pawlenty's campaign debt.[162]
Financial Services Roundtable
On September 20, 2012, Pawlenty's advisor Brian McClung announced to Associated Press that Pawlenty would resign as the co-chairman of Mitt Romney's electoral campaign. He was to head the Financial Services Roundtable (FSR), a financial service industry lobby group in Washington, D.C. He would not be running in the 2014 gubernatorial election in Minnesota nor in the state's 2014 senatorial election.[163] He assumed the positions of President & CEO. He replaced Steve Bartlett, a former U.S. Representative from Texas who had held the positions since 1999.[164]
In November 2012, Pawlenty said that "Republicans and Democrats will have to reconcile their differences on spending and taxes because the 'walls of reality are closing in on them'" relative to the federal government's looming "fiscal cliff". Presenting himself as not from Wall Street or from Washington and, having previously criticized “entrenched financial interests”, he said he could "bring a fresh and new voice to those debates”. He also "refuted assertions that implementation of the Dodd-Frank Act, legislation enacted roughly 27 months [earlier] in response to the financial crisis, ha[d] been delayed because of lobbying".[165]
Personal life




Tim Pawlenty with his wife, Mary


Pawlenty and his wife Mary have two daughters, Anna and Mara. Mary was appointed as a judge of the Dakota County District Court in Hastings, Minnesota, in 1994. After he was elected governor in 2002, the family remained at their Eagan home instead of moving into the Governor's residence because of his wife's requirement to live in her judicial district.[166] In 2007, she left her judicial position to become General Counsel of the National Arbitration Forum, a dispute-resolution company based in Minneapolis.[167] She stayed on only briefly before departing for another dispute-resolution company, the Gilbert Mediation Center.[168]
Pawlenty was raised a Roman Catholic. His conversion to an Evangelical Protestant faith has been attributed to his wife Mary, who is a member of Wooddale Church in Eden Prairie, Minnesota,[169] a member congregation of the Minnesota Baptist Conference. In a January 2011 interview, Mr. Pawlenty stated, "I love and respect and admire the Catholic Church. I still attend Mass once in a while there. The church I now attend is an interdenominational church which has got many former Catholics in it, and so we share the Christian faith and the Bible. I had to reconcile my faith life with my wife so we could have a consistent, integrated family faith life."[170]
Pawlenty frequently uses (and is referred to by) the mononym "TPaw" or "T-Paw".[171][172][173]
Public image
Political views
Pawlenty is generally considered a conservative on the American political spectrum. With regard to his economic record, he has drawn mixed reviews from fiscally conservative interest groups.[174] The lobbying group Taxpayers League of Minnesota gave Pawlenty an average approval score of 80% during his years as a state legislator, while the Cato Institute think-tank gave him scores ranging from C to A across his eight years as governor.[70] In February 2008, Washington Post columnist Robert Novak wrote that Pawlenty was the most conservative Minnesota governor since Governor Theodore Christianson in the 1920s.[98] A 2011 white paper by the Club for Growth, analyzing Pawlenty as a presidential candidate, found his political stance difficult to identify. The group praised him for reduced growth in spending and taxation, but found that he "has some simply inexcusable tax hikes in his record" and questioned his support of proposals such as "mandatory vegetable oil in gasoline, cap and trade, and a statewide smoking ban."[70] Chris Edwards, a director at Cato, speculated that Pawlenty's rightward tack in his second term was related to his impending presidential run.[174]
Approval ratings
In April 2009, 46% of Minnesotans approved of Pawlenty, while 40% disapproved.[175] Among registered Republicans nationwide in July 2009, 38% had a favorable view of him while 33% didn't according to a Rasmussen Reports survey.[176] In March 2010 42% of Minnesotans approved of Pawlenty, while 52% disapproved.[177]
In October 2010 a Rasmussen report showed that Pawlenty had a 49% approval rating among Minnesotans with 49% disapproving.[178] A March 2011 survey by Gallup stated that Pawlenty began his Presidential run with only 41% name recognition in the GOP.[179] Also in March 2011, the Public Policy Polling (PPP) agency found that nationwide voters had a net negative view of Pawlenty, with 15% viewing him favorably verses 33% unfavorably.[180] In a 2011 PPP poll of registered Minnesota voters conducted from May 27–30, 42% of Minnesotans had a favorable opinion of Pawlenty, while 52% had an unfavorable opinion of him. In the presidential race, President Obama lead Pawlenty by 51% to 43%, suggesting Pawlenty could lose his home state to President Obama were he the 2012 GOP nominee.[181]
Electoral history

Minnesota District 38B state representative elections, 1992–2000

Year
Republican
DFL
Constitution
Total
Source


 
 
 


Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %


1992
Tim Pawlenty
9,610
49.1%
Linda Rother
8,773
44.8%
James Russell McMahon
253
1.3%
19,583
[18]


1994
Tim Pawlenty
12,172
81.0%
None
None
15,022
[182]


1996
Tim Pawlenty
14,747
74.4%
None
None
19,822
[183]


1998
Tim Pawlenty
9,118
48.5%
Leo Brisbois
7,819
41.6%
None
18,809
[184]


2000
Tim Pawlenty
13,779
59.6%
Gary Moore
7,239
31.3%
None
23,100
[185]



Minnesota gubernatorial elections, 2002–2006

Year
Republican
DFL
Independence
Green
Total
Source


 
 
 
 


Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %
Name
Votes
 %


2002
Tim Pawlenty
999,473
43.8%
Roger Moe
821,268
36.0%
Tim Penny
364,534
16.0%
Ken Pentel
50,589
2.2%
2,282,860
[26]


2006
Tim Pawlenty
1,028,568
46.4%
Mike Hatch
1,007,460
45.4%
Peter Hutchinson
141,735
6.4%
Ken Pentel
10,800
0.5%
2,217,818
[186]


References


^ Baenen, Jeff. "Minnesota Pronunciation Guide". Associated Press in Minnesota. Retrieved July 4, 2011. 
^ Streitfeld, Rachel (August 12, 2012). "Ryan's clandestine journey to Romney's ticket went from 'surreal to real'". CNN. Retrieved 2012-08-15. 
^ Knox, Olivier (September 20, 2012). "Pawlenty quits as Romney campaign co-chair". Yahoo! News. 
^ a b Reitwiesner, William Addams. "Ancestry of Tim Pawlenty". wargs.com. 
^ a b c Davey, Monica (August 7, 2008). "Pawlenty Looks to National Stage". The New York Times. Retrieved June 1, 2011. 
^ a b c d "Campaign 2002: Governor Tim Pawlenty". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Jim Walsh (January 28, 2004). "Grant Hart recalls his old classmate, Tim Pawlenty". City Pages. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Sharpiro, Walter. "The Tragedy of Tim Pawlenty: He did everything right. And that was the problem". The New Republic. Retrieved July 26, 2011. 
^ Political Science Dept of College of Liberal Arts (July 5, 2008). "PoliSci Alumni". University of Minnesota. 
^ "Empowered with a New Degree, Class of '08 Sets Forth – 120th Commencement Ceremony". University of Minnesota Law School. February 11, 2008. 
^ Melo, Frederick (January 5, 2007). "Mary Pawlenty leaves bench—First Lady will be top counsel for mediation firm". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ "Pawlenty Biography". 2012 Republican Candidates: Comparing the 2012 Republican Candidates. Retrieved July 26, 2011. 
^ "Main page". Wizmo. 
^ a b Tom Squitieri (November 7, 2002). "His plans changed, but message didn't". USA TODAY. 
^ "What's next for Tim Pawlenty?". MinnPost. September 8, 2008. Retrieved September 10, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (July 16, 2003). "DFLer slams "Grunseth groupies"". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ State Senator Sandra L. Pappas (July 21, 2003). "Legislators Call for Full and Complete Disclosure from Governor Pawlenty" (Press release). MN State Legislature press release (via Internet Archive). Archived from the original on September 19, 2004. 
^ a b Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1992. p. 146. 
^ Sherman, Amy (October 16, 1998). "38B candidates' ideas differ on surplus, education; incumbent faces unusual challenge". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ "Legislators Past and Present". Minnesota Legislative Reference Library. Retrieved August 23, 2007. 
^ Laura McCallum (June 12, 2002). "Campaign 2002 profile: Brian Sullivan". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Smith, Dane (April 19, 2001). "Cheney advises Pawlenty not to run for Senate; Majority leader bows to request from White House". Star Tribune. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (September 13, 2002). "Tim Pawlenty". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ a b c Grant, Ashley; Associated Press (November 6, 2002). "Pawlenty elected Minnesota governor—Republican breaks out of three-way race". Grand Forks Herald. p. A-05. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ Coleman, Toni et al. (January 5, 2003). "Your guide to the 2003 legislature: issues to watch". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A8. CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
"Major Minnesota issues". Grand Forks Herald. Associated Press. January 5, 2003. p. A-07. 
^ a b Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2002. pp. 322–325. 
^ Hohmann, James. "Once a goalie, Tim Pawlenty plays offense". Politico. Capitol News. Retrieved April 20, 2011. 
^ Laura McCallum (June 2, 2006). "Pawlenty accepts Republican endorsement for re-election". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Laura McCallum (November 8, 2006). "Hatch concedes; Pawlenty barely wins re-election". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Britt Robson (January 19, 2005). "Minnesota Eats Itself Another Pawlenty budget, another round of bloodletting". City Pages. Retrieved August 31, 2008. 
^ "Historical expenditures: General fund and all funds" (PDF). Minnesota Management and Budget Department. March 2011. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty said he brought Minnesota state spending growth down 'to about 1.7 percent per year.'". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. April 1, 2011. 
^ a b "PoliGraph: Pawlenty spending claim lacks context". MPR News. Minnesota Public Radio. January 27, 2011. 
^ Sharpiro, Walter. "The Tragedy of TIm Pawlenty: He Did Everything Right. And That's The Problem". The New Republic. Retrieved July 27, 2011. 
^ a b Salisbury, Bill (June 1, 2003). "Pawlenty wins, but risks attached – his no-new-taxes pledge may become a liability later". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ a b Scheck, Tom (September 24, 2009). "Pawlenty downplaying budget deficit predictions". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 24, 2009. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty said in 2009, 'we cut state spending in real terms for the first time in 150 years'". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. April 12, 2011. 
^ AEI said "billion", an error see original: Carlson, Arne (May 23, 2011). "The Presidency: A Bit Short Is Pawlenty". Blogspot. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Ornstein, Norman J. (May 25, 2011). "GOP Presidential Candidates Affect Agenda". American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy Research. Retrieved May 25, 2011. 
^ Wyler, Grace (May 23, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty Launches Campaign As The GOP Default Candidate". Business Insider. Retrieved May 25, 2011. 
^ Stephanopoulos, George (May 23, 2011). "George's Bottom Line". ABC News. Retrieved June 9, 2011. 
^ Black, Eric (May 5, 2010). "Supreme Court overrules Pawlenty on unallotments". MinnPost. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Scheck, Tom (October 29, 2009). "Lawsuit challenges Pawlenty's budget cuts". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved October 30, 2009. 
^ Grow, Doug (December 31, 2009). "Unallotment ruling may have turned Minnesota's recent political gridlock into new political chaos". MinnPost. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ David Lillehaug and Mike McIntee (December 30, 2009). Atty David Lillehaug: Court ruling huge political setback for Gov. Pawlenty. The UpTake via MinnPost. Event occurs at 1:22. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ McIntee, Mike (December 31, 2009). Pawlenty To Appeal Unallotment Ruling. The UpTake via Twin Cities Daily Planet. Event occurs at 1:30. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ Shaw, Charley (February 9, 2010). "Pawlenty in appellate brief says he legally unalloted the budget". Politics in Minnesota. Retrieved February 9, 2010. 
^ Helgeson, Baird (February 9, 2010). "Pawlenty defends budget cuts". Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Scheck, Tom (March 15, 2010). "State's budget in hands of Supreme Court". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved March 15, 2010. 
^ Magnuson, Eric J. (May 5, 2010). "State of Minnesota in Supreme Court: A10-64" (PDF). Minnesota Judicial Branch. Archived from the original (PDF) on May 5, 2010. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Kimball, Joe (May 5, 2010). "Pawlenty responds to ruling on unallotment, urges Legislature to back his cuts". MinnPost. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (May 12, 2010). "Budget clock is ticking at the Capitol—After veto, talks deadlock and DFL calls on Pawlenty to take the lead". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Sturdevant, Lori (May 23, 2010). "Now on the trail, loaded with legislative baggage—Kelliher bears the weight of her position, while Emmer's burdens are largely of his own making". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Michael Khoo (February 5, 2004). "Pawlenty's speech puts focus on gambling". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ T.W. Budig (April 3, 2003). "Canterbury racino legislation advances in House; Pawlenty cool to more gambling". ECM Capitol Roundup. Archived from the original on May 10, 2003. 
^ Becky Glander (February 5, 2005). "Some angered at racino proposal". University Chronicle. Archived from the original on March 1, 2009. 
^ Andrew Tellijohn (March 7, 2003). "Canterbury chasing jackpot with 'racino'". Minneapolis / St. Paul Business Journal. 
^ "Indian Country is in the midst of political awakening". October 11, 2004. Retrieved December 3, 2007. 
^ Michael Khoo (May 17, 2005). "Casino issue is dying, if not dead, at Capitol". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Native American casinos". Indianz. May 23, 2005. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ "Pawlenty's talks on Twins stadium yield no action". Associated Press/MPR. January 11, 2006. 
^ Twins ballpark: What's next?. May 26, 2006. 
^ "Votetracker Minnesota Twins stadium". Minnesota Public Radio. 2006. 
^ Tom Scheck; Brandt Williams (May 22, 2006). "Twins' stadium opponents were tired of the fight; supporters weren't". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ Brandt Williams (April 25, 2005). "Pohlad: Contribution to Twins ballpark 'fair, substantial'". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Legislature passes $1 billion public works bill". St. Paul Pioneer Press. June 2006. Archived from the original on March 12, 2007. Retrieved June 26, 2006. 
^ Montopoli, Brian (March 25, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty: I shut down Sharia loan program". CBS News. 
^ "Is There a Double Standard in Tim Pawlenty's Disavowal of Sharia-Compliant Mortgages?". TIME. March 25, 2011. 
^ "Mark Dayton says Gov. Tim Pawlenty cut education spending". PolitiFact.com. St. Petersburg Times. July 29, 2010. 
^ a b c "2012 Presidential White Paper #2: Former Minnesota Governor Tim Pawlenty" (PDF). Club for Growth. May 24, 2011. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (December 22, 2010). "'Binge buster'—In two terms as governor, Tim Pawlenty put the brakes on state spending and set Minnesota on a path to fiscal austerity. But critics say he simply kicked budget problems down the road.". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Laura McCallum (October 31, 2003). "Social studies standards face more heat". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Laura McCallum (December 19, 2003). "Yecke unveils second try at social studies, science standards". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Sara Evans and Lisa Norling (November 2004). "What Happened in Minnesota?". Organization of American Historians newsletter. Archived from the original on August 3, 2008. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ a b Pugmire, Tim (May 16, 2004). "Yecke blasts Minnesota's political climate for vote to oust her". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 26, 2007. 
^ Tim Pugmire (June 27, 2006). "Good grades would mean free college under Pawlenty plan". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Art Hughes (May 7, 2007). "Dream Act dies under threat of Pawlenty veto". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 8, 2008. 
^ Fitzgerald, John (October 1, 2009). "Schools to Pay Millions to Cover Governor's IOU". Minnesota 2020. Retrieved July 2, 2011. 
^ a b Schumacher, Lawrence (May 3, 2010). "Pawlenty nixes college student credit transfer fix". Twin Cities Daily Planet. Retrieved May 3, 2010. 
^ a b Anderson, G. R. Jr. (February 28, 2008). "One head finally rolls". MinnPost.com. MinnPost. Retrieved February 29, 2008. 
^ Saulny, Susan (February 29, 2008). "Minnesota Transportation Chief Is Out". The New York Times. The New York Times Company. Retrieved February 29, 2008. 
^ "State House approves gas tax hike". KSTP. 2007. Retrieved August 3, 2007. 
^ Jackson, Henry C.; Mark Scolforo (August 4, 2007). "8 Reported Missing in Bridge Collapse". Washington Post. 
^ Laura McCallum (August 3, 2004). "Pawlenty finds money to jumpstart North Star rail line". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ a b Sturdevant, Lori (April 12, 2008). "Working toward the train in vain". Minneapolis Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. [permanent dead link]
^ a b c Yuen, Laura; Tom Scheck (April 7, 2008). "Pawlenty delivers a setback to the Central Corridor project". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ "Coleman: Disappointed By Gov. Vetoing LRT Money". Associated Press. April 10, 2008. Archived from the original on March 1, 2009. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Tom Weber (May 19, 2008). "Central Corridor planning moves forward". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Kaszuba, Mike (April 18, 2008). "Met Council head is in a political bind". www.startribune.com. Archived from the original on April 2, 2015. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Salisbury, Bill. "Vetoes not political? (The Political Animal)". blogs.twincities.com. Archived from the original on April 14, 2008. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Scheck, Tom (April 7, 2008). "MPR: St. Paul officials: What does Pawlenty have against us?". minnesota.publicradio.org. Retrieved April 25, 2008. 
^ Stassen-Berger, Rachel E. (June 26, 2006). "When crime jumps, politicos trade blame: experts say one elected official can't do much to raise—or lower—crime rates". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ a b Hoppin, Jason (February 10, 2010). "Pawlenty: Time to get tougher on sex crimes – Some offenders would get 25 years; others, even more". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ Ludeman, Cal (February 7, 2011). "Details on sex offender program deleted". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on April 2, 2015. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Jim Lehrer (March 22, 2006). "MINNESOTA'S IMMIGRATION DEBATE". Twin Cities Public Broadcasting. 
^ Salisbury, Bill (January 4, 2006). "Illegal immigration a 'real issue': Pawlenty defends crackdown, but not all agree with tactics". St. Paul Pioneer Press. p. A1. 
^ McCallum, Laura (September 26, 2005). "Pawlenty pumps ethanol". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved August 6, 2007. 
^ a b Novak, Robert (February 28, 2008). "How Not to Run for Vice President". The Washington Post. The Washington Post Company. Retrieved February 28, 2008. 
^ a b "Pawlenty’s Political Climate Change". Fact-Check.org. 
^ herb, jeremy (August 4, 2011). "Remarks highlight Pawlenty's climate shift". minneapolis star tribune. Retrieved August 10, 2012. 
^ Powell, Joy; Lopez, Patricia (August 22, 2007). "State health commissioner resigns". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on March 2, 2009. Retrieved January 12, 2008. 
^ Tom Scheck (February 16, 2005). "Measuring the success of Canadian drug imports". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved September 12, 2008. 
^ "The Kaiser Commission on Medicaid and the Uninsured" (PDF). The Henry J. Kaiser Family Foundation. Archived from the original (PDF) on February 4, 2011. Retrieved March 16, 2011. 
^ "Pawlenty uses veto power to cut health care". Mnmed.org. Retrieved October 31, 2010. [permanent dead link]
^ Scheck, Tom (May 15, 2009). "Pawlenty, lawmakers remain at odds over budget issues". Minnesota Public Radio News. Retrieved June 2, 2009. 
^ Williams, Chris (Associated Press) (November 18, 2009). "HCMC approves big cuts in 2010 budget". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved November 19, 2009. 
^ McIntee, Mike (February 9, 2010). "Vets To Feel Governor Pawlenty's GAMC Cuts". The Uptake. Archived from the original on August 6, 2014. Retrieved February 10, 2010. 
^ Marcotty, Josephine & Stassen-Berger, Rachel E. (September 1, 2010). "Pawlenty restricts health money". Star Tribune. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ a b Salisbury, Bill (October 18, 2008). "Governor will lead trade group to Israel". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ Ragsdale, Jim; Welbes, John (June 19, 2004). "Fox promises consulate—Mexico president expresses wish to aid countrymen in Minnesota". St. Paul Pioneer Press. 
^ 200 National Guard members to patrol Mexican border | Minnesota Public Radio News
^ Bjorhus, Jennifer (November 14, 2005). "Pawlenty courts Chinese investors – TRADE: Economic ties take a new direction as the Chinese begin looking for places to invest". Duluth News-Tribune. 
^ a b Smith, Dane (January 30, 2007). "Pawlenty plans trade mission to India". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on June 8, 2008. Retrieved January 30, 2007. 
^ Lopez, Patricia (June 22, 2004). "Pawlenty's trade mission—Poland and the Czech Republic: Pawlenty praises Poland's 'bright future'". Star Tribune. 
^ Von Sternberg, Bob (November 13, 2010). "Gov. Tim Pawlenty: Signing off". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on November 20, 2010. 
^ "Initiatives of NGA chairs". National Governors Association. 
^ "Past Chairs". Midwestern Governors Association. Archived from the original on May 1, 2013. 
^ Ambinder, Marc (February 9, 2005). "Conservatives Say Pawlenty Is Potential Presidential Candidate". ABC News. 
^ Will, George F. (February 24, 2008). "The Running Mate McCain Needs". The Washington Post. p. B07. 
^ Martin, Jonathan (February 17, 2008). "Steadfast McCain ally sparks veep talk". Politico. 
^ "Gov. Pawlenty announces re-election bid (feature audio)". MPR News. Minnesota Public Radio. May 31, 2006. 
^ Black, Eric; Tice, D.J. (March 14, 2007). "Pawlenty for veep: Will he or won't he?". Star Tribune. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty Announces re-election campaign (video)". WCCO-TV. May 31, 2006. Archived from the original on February 9, 2013. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ Black, Eric (February 18, 2008). "How did veep talk go so far without Pawlenty's pledge coming up?". MinnPost. Retrieved April 10, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty to co-chair McCain '08 exploratory committee". KARE. Associated Press. January 15, 2007. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ Pugmire, Tim (January 9, 2008). "Presidential campaigns raise volume in Minnesota". Minnesota Public Radio. Retrieved January 10, 2008. 
^ Hopfensperger, Jean (January 7, 2008) [updated February 5, 2008]. "Is Pawlenty's plan for immigration aimed at a VP slot?". Star Tribune. Archived from the original on January 27, 2008. Retrieved July 13, 2008. 
^ "McCain Selects His Running Mate". FOXNews.com. August 28, 2008. Archived from the original on 2008-11-02. Retrieved August 28, 2008. 
^ "Tim Pawlenty: McCain's Vice President?". Huffingtonpost.com. January 8, 2008. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ "McCain taps Alaska Gov. Palin as vice president pick". CNN Politics. CNN. August 29, 2008. Retrieved August 29, 2008. 
^ "Pawlenty says he never backed bailout in 2008". Politico Live. January 16, 2011. 
^ Ambinder, Marc (February 9, 2005). "Conservatives Say Pawlenty Is Potential Presidential Candidate". ABC News. Retrieved April 3, 2011. 
^ Kendra Marr (December 17, 2010). "Tim Pawlenty's regret: No third term". Politico. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ "Obama easily outpolls Pawlenty, Palin" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. July 10, 2009. Retrieved May 3, 2010. 
^ "Pawlenty rolls out new health care proposals". CNN. October 13, 2009. Retrieved May 25, 2010. 
^ Foster, Daniel (January 27, 2011). "Pence Out, Republican Presidential Field Open". National Review. 
^ Jonathan Martin (October 1, 2009). "Pawlenty preps 2012 campaign team". Politico. Retrieved June 3, 2010. 
^ "Pawlenty in Iowa: Republican party must unite to take power from Democrats | Des Moines Register Staff Blogs". Blogs.desmoinesregister.com. October 27, 2010. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ Peters, Jeremy (January 29, 2011). "Political Blogs Are Ready to Flood Campaign Trail". The New York Times. 
^ Kendra Marr (January 14, 2011). "Pawlenty: No VP thoughts this time". Politico. Retrieved January 14, 2011. 
^ Davenport, Reid (January 18, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty: If I run, it will be for the presidency". The GW Hatchet. The George Washington University. Retrieved January 13, 2012. 
^ a b Weiner, Jay (January 18, 2011). "In campaign-like appearance, Pawlenty shows off 'Courage to Stand' ... and to sit, signing books". MinnPost. Retrieved January 18, 2011. 
^ a b Bryan Fischer and Tim Pawlenty. AFA's Bryan Fischer Interviews Tim Pawlenty. YouTube (Google). Retrieved January 17, 2011. 
^ Exclusive – Tim Pawlenty Extended Interview (Episode #16007). The Daily Show (Comedy Partners). January 12, 2010. Retrieved January 17, 2011. 
^ Duffy, J.P. (December 15, 2010). "FRC, Members of Congress, Governors, and Conservative Leaders Release Open Letter Calling for Civil Debate, End to Character Assassination". Retrieved January 30, 2011. 
^ Pawlenty, Tim (December 13, 2010). "Government Unions vs. Taxpayers". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Marr, Kendra (March 21, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty forms 2012 presidential exploratory committee". Politico. Retrieved March 21, 2011. 
^ Camia, Catalina (March 21, 2011). "Pawlenty launches committee to explore White House bid". USA Today. Retrieved March 21, 2011. 
^ Aliyah Shahid (April 13, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty to CNN's Piers Morgan: 'I'm running for President,' spokesman walks it back". Daily News (New York). Retrieved January 13, 2012.  and in context Tim Pawlenty Tells Piers Morgan: "I'm Running For President". CNN via PoliticsNewsNews via YouTube (Google). Retrieved April 15, 2011. 
^ "@CNN report of @TimPawlenty on @piersmorgan is out of context. Obviously, Pawlenty has exploratory committee to run for President. Not VP," wrote Alex Conant, his spokesman, in Wallbank, Derek (April 12, 2011). "Tim Pawlenty accidentally confirms the obvious, then walks it back". MinnPost. Retrieved April 15, 2011. 
^ "Real change is about telling hard truths". USA Today. May 23, 2011. 
^ Pawlenty 'betting it all on Iowa' in presidential run. KARE-TV. Multimedia KARE. May 23, 2011. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Tim Pawlenty – A Time for Truth (Preview of Monday's Announcement). YouTube (Google). May 22, 2011. Retrieved May 22, 2011. 
^ Shear, Michael (May 22, 2011). "Pawlenty Announces Candidacy a Day Early". The New York Times. Retrieved May 22, 2011. 
^ Seib, Gerald F. (May 23, 2011). "Is America Ready for President TPaw?". The Wall Street Journal. Dow Jones. Retrieved May 23, 2011. 
^ Reinhard, Beth (August 13, 2011). "Bachmann Boom; TPaw Bust?". National Journal. Archived from the original on October 25, 2011. Retrieved August 14, 2011. 
^ "PolitiFact: Obamacare was patterned after (Mitt Romney's) plan in Massachusetts". August 12, 2011. Retrieved August 9, 2012. 
^ Lucy Madison (June 14, 2011). "Will backing off "Obamneycare" in GOP debate hurt Pawlenty's campaign?". CBS News. Retrieved November 2, 2012. 
^ Jens Manuel Krogstad (June 14, 2011). "Pawlenty decision to back off "Obamneycare" criticism questioned". Des Moined Register. Retrieved November 2, 2012. 
^ Bakst, Brian (August 14, 2011). "Ex-Minn. Gov. Tim Pawlenty ends White House bid". The Huffington Post. Associated Press. Retrieved August 14, 2011. 
^ Memoli, Michael (2011-09-12). "Tim Pawlenty backs former rival Mitt Romney for president". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved 2011-09-12. 
^ Parker, Ashley & Barbaro, Michael (July 17, 2012). "Caution, Not Flash, as Romney Seeks His No. 2". New York Times. Retrieved July 18, 2012. 
^ "Mitt Romney loses Tim Pawlenty as campaign co-chair 45 days before election", newsday.com.
^ "Roundtable Management" Archived November 15, 2012, at the Wayback Machine., FSR webpage. Retrieved 2012-11-08.
^ Orol, Ronald D., "Pawlenty: ‘Walls of reality’ closing on Congress", MarketWatch, November 7, 2012. Retrieved 2012-11-08.
^ Art Hughes (November 6, 2002). "Pawlenty sets stage for a Capitol revolution". Minnesota Public Radio. 
^ "Mary Pawlenty leaves bench for new job". Minnesota Public radio. Associated Press. January 4, 2007. 
^ "Minn. First Lady to Join Gilbert Mediation Center". wcco.com. Associated Press. September 2007. Archived from the original on May 18, 2008. 
^ "Tim (Timothy J.) Pawlenty". Minnesota Historical Society. 
^ Lewis, Matt (January 2011). "Tim Pawlenty on Michele Bachmann, Michael Steele . . . and Hockey". Politics Daily. Retrieved May 16, 2011. 
^ Todd, Chuck; Murray, Mark; Montanaro, Domenico (May 23, 2011). "2012: Daniels is out, T-Paw and Cain are in". First Read. MSNBC. Archived from the original on May 28, 2011. 
^ "Who's afraid of Mitt and T-Paw...". Front Row Washington. Reuters. May 20, 2011. 
^ Antle, W. James III (May 23, 2011). "TPaw and TARP, Cont'd". The American Spectator. 
^ a b "Pawlenty: An economic pro or crafty budget setter?". Fox News. Associated Press. May 25, 2011. 
^ "Klobuchar Approval Rating Highest PPP Has Found in Last Year" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. April 16, 2009. 
^ "Palin At The Top – And Bottom – for GOP Voters in 2012 – Rasmussen Reports". Rasmussen Reports. July 7, 2009. Retrieved October 31, 2010. 
^ "SurveyUSA News Poll #16315". SurveyUSA. March 3, 2010. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ "Election 2010: Minnesota Governor". Rasmussen Reports, LLC. October 22, 2010. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ "Pawlenty Begins Race With 41% GOP Name Recognition". Gallup. March 23, 2011. 
^ "Voters tepid toward Obama, but favor him over GOP". Public Policy Polling. March 16, 2011. 
^ "Obama a lock in Minnesota" (PDF). Public Policy Polling. June 6, 2011. Retrieved June 12, 2011. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1994. p. 145. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1996. pp. 155–156. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 1998. pp. 142–143. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2000. p. 481. 
^ Minnesota Election Results (PDF). Election Division, Minnesota Secretary of State. 2006. pp. 456–463. 


External links



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Tim Pawlenty.




Biography portal
Minnesota portal
Politics portal




Tim Pawlenty at Minnesota Legislators Past & Present

Profile at Project Vote Smart
Financial information (federal office) at the Federal Election Commission
Appearances on C-SPAN
Campaign contributions at Follow the Money (U.S. House)
Campaign 2002 – Minnesota Governor Minnesota Public Radio
Campaign 2006 – Tim Pawlenty Minnesota Public Radio



Minnesota House of Representatives


Preceded by
Art Seaberg
Member of the Minnesota House of Representatives
from District 38B
1993–2003
Succeeded by
Lynn Wardlow


Preceded by
Ted Winter
Majority Leader of the Minnesota House of Representatives
1999–2003
Succeeded by
Erik Paulsen


Party political offices


Preceded by
Norm Coleman
Republican nominee for Governor of Minnesota
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Emmer


Political offices


Preceded by
Jesse Ventura
Governor of Minnesota
2003–2011
Succeeded by
Mark Dayton


Preceded by
Janet Napolitano
Chair of National Governors Association
2007–2008
Succeeded by
Ed Rendell








v
t
e


Governors of Minnesota



Territorial (1849–58)



Ramsey
Gorman
Medary








State (since 1858)



Sibley
Ramsey
Swift
Miller
Marshall
Austin
Davis
Pillsbury
Hubbard
McGill
Merriam
Nelson
Clough
Lind
Van Sant
Johnson
Eberhart
Hammond
Burnquist
Preus
Christianson
Olson
Petersen
Benson
Stassen
Thye
Youngdahl
E. Anderson
Freeman
Andersen
Rolvaag
LeVander
W. Anderson
Perpich
Quie
Perpich
Carlson
Ventura
Pawlenty
Dayton












v
t
e


Chairs of the National Governors Association






Willson
McGovern
Walsh
Spry
Capper
Harrington
Allen
Sproul
Cox
Trinkle
Brewster
McMullen
Dern
Case
Pollard
Rolph
McNutt
Peery
Cochran
Stark
Vanderbilt
Stassen
O'Conor
Saltonstall
Maw
Martin
Caldwell
Hildreth
Hunt
Lane
Carlson
Lausche
Peterson
Shivers
Thornton
Kennon
Langlie
Stanley
Stratton
Collins
Boggs
McNichols
Powell
Rosellini
Anderson
Sawyer
Reed
Guy
Volpe
Ellington
Love
Hearnes
Moore
Mandel
Evans
Rampton
Ray
Andrus
Askew
Milliken
Carroll
Bowen
Busbee
Snelling
Matheson
J. Thompson
Carlin
Alexander
Clinton
Sununu
Baliles
Branstad
Gardner
Ashcroft
Romer
Campbell
Dean
T. Thompson
Miller
Voinovich
Carper
Leavitt
Glendening
Engler
Patton
Kempthorne
Warner
Huckabee
Napolitano
Pawlenty
Rendell
Douglas
Manchin
Gregoire
Heineman
Markell
Fallin
Hickenlooper
Herbert
McAuliffe
Sandoval












v
t
e


Minnesota House Majority Leaders






W. Dunn
Wilson
Rockne
Rines
Wm. Nolan
Girling
Wi. Norton
McDonough
R. Dunn
Eastvold
R. Dunn
Cina
Dirlam
Lindstrom
Anderson
Knickerbocker
Eken
Sieben
Levi
Vanasek
Wynia
Long
Welle
Anderson
Carruthers
Winter
Pawlenty
Paulsen
Sertich
Dean
Murphy
Peppin















v
t
e


(2008 ←)    United States presidential election, 2012    (→ 2016)






United States elections, 2012
Fundraising
National polls
Statewide polls (pre-2012, early 2012)
Timeline
General election debates
Newspaper endorsements
International reactions
Hurricane Sandy





Democratic Party

Convention
Primaries

Newspaper endorsements





Incumbent nominee: Barack Obama

campaign
endorsements
positions


Incumbent VP nominee: Joe Biden

positions




Challengers: Bob Ely
Keith Judd
Warren Mosler
Darcy Richardson
Jim Rogers
Vermin Supreme
Randall Terry
John Wolfe





Republican Party

Convention
Primaries
Debates

Statewide polls
National polls

Straw polls

Newspaper endorsements





Nominee: Mitt Romney

campaign
endorsements
positions


VP nominee: Paul Ryan

positions




Candidates: Michele Bachmann (campaign)
Herman Cain (campaign)
Jack Fellure
Newt Gingrich (campaign)
Stewart Greenleaf
Jon Huntsman (campaign)
Gary Johnson (campaign)
Fred Karger
Andy Martin
Thaddeus McCotter (campaign)
Jimmy McMillan
Roy Moore
Ron Paul (campaign)
Tim Pawlenty (campaign)
Rick Perry (campaign)
Buddy Roemer (campaign)
Rick Santorum (campaign)





Libertarian Party

Convention
Primaries





Nominee: Gary Johnson

campaign
positions


VP nominee: Jim Gray


Candidates: Jim Duensing
R. J. Harris
Carl Person
Sam Sloan
R. Lee Wrights





Green Party

Convention





Nominee: Jill Stein (campaign)
VP nominee: Cheri Honkala


Candidates: Stewart Alexander
Roseanne Barr
Kent Mesplay










Other third-party and independent candidates



American Independent Party



Nominee Tom Hoefling


Candidates Wiley Drake
Virgil Goode (campaign)
Edward C. Noonan
Laurie Roth





American Third Position Party



Nominee Merlin Miller
VP nominee Virginia Abernethy





America's Party



Nominee Tom Hoefling





Constitution Party

Convention





Nominee Virgil Goode (campaign)
VP nominee Jim Clymer


Candidates Darrell Castle
Laurie Roth
Robby Wells





Freedom Socialist Party



Nominee Stephen Durham





Grassroots Party



Nominee Jim Carlson





Justice Party



Nominee Rocky Anderson
VP nominee Luis J. Rodriguez





Objectivist Party



Nominee Tom Stevens





Party for Socialism and Liberation



Nominee Peta Lindsay





Peace and Freedom Party



Nominee Roseanne Barr
VP nominee Cindy Sheehan


Candidates Stewart Alexander
Rocky Anderson
Stephen Durham
Peta Lindsay





Prohibition Party



Nominee Jack Fellure


Candidates James Hedges





Reform Party



Nominee Andre Barnett


Candidates Laurence Kotlikoff
Darcy Richardson
Buddy Roemer (campaign)
Robert David Steele
Robby Wells





Socialist Equality Party



Nominee Jerry White





Socialist Workers Party



Nominee James Harris





Socialist Party



Nominee Stewart Alexander (campaign)
VP nominee Alejandro Mendoza





Independents



Candidates Lee Abramson
Randy Blythe
Jeff Boss
Robert Burck
Terry Jones
Joe Schriner





Draft movements



Michael Bloomberg (movement)













State results






Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming











Other 2012 elections: House
Senate
Gubernatorial









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 160316458
LCCN: n2010076275
SUDOC: 157114341










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Tim_Pawlenty&oldid=792355660"					
Categories: 1960 births21st-century American politiciansAmerican people of German descentAmerican people of Polish descentBaptists from the United StatesConverts to Baptist denominationsConverts to Baptist denominations from Roman CatholicismGovernors of MinnesotaLiving peopleMembers of the Minnesota House of RepresentativesMinnesota lawyersMinnesota RepublicansPoliticians from Saint Paul, MinnesotaPeople from Eagan, MinnesotaPeople from South St. Paul, MinnesotaRepublican Party state governors of the United StatesUnited States presidential candidates, 2012University of Minnesota Law School alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from July 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from November 2016Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected biographies of living peopleWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


ČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançaisHornjoserbsceItalianoעבריתNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 26 July 2017, at 01:16.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






TIMPAWLENTY.COM 











Tim Pawlenty, Former Governor of Minnesota - Keynote Speaker | LAI








 

 





























































































































































































































































































































































                        mobile menu
                    






















                                        1-800-SPEAKER                                    










Speakers




Exclusive Speakers
Speakers By Topic
Speakers By Type










 
LAI Exclusive: John Allen


                    Retired Four-Star Marine Corps General, Former Head of NATO Forces in Afghani...            




 
New LAI Exclusive: Howard Fineman


                    Leading Journalist, Political Commentator, and Best-Selling Author            




 
New LAI Exclusive: Director James Clapper


                    Former Director of National Intelligence            


012
 







 
Motivational Speakers







 
Leadership Speakers







 
Speakers on Innovation and Disruption





012
 







 
Political Analysts







 
TED Speakers







 
Entertainment Acts





012
 


Explore Speakers 







Our Events




Explore Our Events
Get on Our Invite List
Event Sponsors










 
Association Lecture Series







 
Salon Dinners







 
Special Events





012
 







 
Request an Invite to Events In Washington, DC







 
Request an Invite to Events in Chicago







 
Request an Invite to Events in New York





012
 







 
Become a Sponsor







 
Thank You to Our Sponsors







 
Event Production with LAI Live





012
 


Explore Events 







Lai Literary




About us




Our Advantage
Meet the Team
Careers










 
Why Work with LAI?


                    Discover Our Advantage            




 
What is a Speaker's Bureau?


                    Get All the FAQs Here            




 
First Time Booking A Speaker?


                    Learn About the Booking Process            


012
 







 
Meet Our Team







 
In the Community







 
LAI In the News





012
 







 
Openings at LAI Speakers' Bureau







 
Openings at LAI Live







 
Openings at LAI VIdeo





012
 


About Us 







Blog










01234

 





Search Speakers







   

By Topic

AdventureBig DataBrandingBusiness StrategyChange ManagementChinaConsumer BehaviorCorporate CultureCorporate Social Responsibility CreativityCrisis ManagementCustomer ExperienceCyber SecurityDecision MakingDisruptionDiversity & InclusionEconomic OutlookEnergyEntrepreneurshipEthicsFinance Policy & RegulationFintechFuture TrendsGenerations & DemographicsGeopoliticsGrowthHealth CareHealth, Happiness & WellnessHistoryHuman ResourcesHumorInnovationInspiration & MotivationInternational BusinessLaw & Legal AffairsLeadershipMarketingMiddle EastNational SecurityNegotiationOvercoming AdversityPeak PerformancePolitical SatirePoliticsRelationship BuildingRetailRobotics, AI & DronesSalesSocial Media & Social NetworkingTeamworkTechnologyTurnaround




By Type

African American SpeakersAthletes & CommentatorsBusiness Authors/ StrategistsBusiness Leaders from Major BrandsCelebrity ChefCEOsComediansDuosEmcee & Master of CeremoniesEntertainment ActsFemale SpeakersMediaMilitary LeadersModeratorPolitical AnalystsPolitical LeadersPollsters & Public Opinion ExpertsSomething DifferentTED Speakers 




By Event Location
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
British Columbia
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri 
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Ontario
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
Africa
Asia
Australia
Europe





                    By Fee Range                


$5k

 
$100k+



To Search by Fees Select Event Location




 




 








Home / Speakers / Tim Pawlenty 








 







                                                    Conversations With Power: Tim Pawlenty and Ronald Brownstein                                                

 
















 





The product has been added to your shopping cart.

 Save To My Speaker List 







                                Share
                            


























Tim Pawlenty
Former Governor of Minnesota, Former Republican Presidential Candidate, and CEO of the Financial Services Roundtable
 Two-term governor known for balancing Minnesota’s budget while cutting spending, reforming health care, and improving schools  Co-chair of Mitt Romney's 2012 Presidential campaign  Discusses the intersection of politics and finance and provides thoughtful suggestions to the day’s pressing problems

Topics & Types
Health CareLeadershipPolitical Leaders 



Check Availability



Profile
Topics




Tim Pawlenty, known affectionately as “T-Paw,” was a two-term governor of Minnesota and is one of the leading voices in the Republican Party. He was also a candidate for the 2012 Republican nomination for president and co-chair of Mitt Romney for President. Currently, Pawlenty is the CEO of the Financial Services Roundtable. Exclusively represented by Leading Authorities speakers bureau, his presentations address our current political climate and what is next for the GOP in a way that only someone who has traveled the country running for president and served successfully as governor could. He shares insider stories from the campaign trail and conveys thoughtful approaches to the most pressing public policy issues of our time, all with clarity and an upbeat energy. Pawlenty can also do in-depth policy analysis for healthcare, education, fiscal issues, agriculture, and other topics.
Governor Pawlenty used innovative and conservative leadership to balance Minnesota’s budget, cut spending, reform health care, and improve schools without raising taxes. Due to his leadership, Minnesota had nation-leading health care, high school test scores, and a prosperous economy. Pawlenty has also played an active role in international affairs and foreign policy. He made five trips to Iraq, three to Afghanistan, two to Kosovo, and one to Bosnia – all in support of American troops. In support of Minnesotan businesses, he also led trade missions around the world, including missions to China, India, Israel, Chile, Brazil, Poland, the Czech Republic, Japan, and Canada.
Gubernatorial Career. After being elected governor in 2002, Pawlenty represented the interests of more than five million citizens and was responsible for a $50 billion biennial budget, more than 30,000 employees, and over 30 agencies and departments. As Minnesota’s chief executive officer, Pawlenty also balanced the budget every year – erasing a deficit of $4.3 billion – and cut taxes by nearly $800 million. This moved Minnesota out of the top 10 highest-taxed states – a goal of every Minnesota governor for more than 30 years.
In addition to tackling the state’s fiscal concerns, Tim Pawlenty also championed innovative education and health care reforms that later became national models. His healthcare reforms made price and quality more transparent for patients, which led to an overall better standard of care. His education reforms held teachers accountable, rewarding the best with a performance-pay system. Pawlenty has long stood behind the importance of education, as he was the first in his family to graduate from college. Other public policy initiatives he proposed and implemented in these areas were viewed as amongst the most innovative and impactful in the nation. As chair of the State Board of Investment, Pawlenty also provided oversight of $60 billion in investments.
Pre- and Post-Governorship. In the Minnesota House of Representatives, Pawlenty became the Republican majority leader and led efforts to enact the largest tax cuts in the state’s history. After his governorship, Tim Pawlenty authored Courage to Stand, which covers his reflections on leadership, public service, and policy, explaining how he successfully governed his left-leaning state. Continue Reading » 




Twitter  



Download Bio



Latest Books






Courage to Stand: An American Story












The Intersection of Finance and Politics. Tim Pawlenty is in a unique position to address the intersection of politics and finance. Having led an impressive career in both arenas, he shares insider political stories and conveys thoughtful approaches to the most pressing public policy issues of our time, looking at financial policy in-depth and analyzing the changing nature of finance systems and the governance of the global economy. With clarity and upbeat energy, he addresses how politics as a whole affects both the business community and personal finances, looking at issues like regulation, taxes, unemployment rates, inflation, banking, and financial reform.
Political and Election Analysis. Pawlenty is a former governor of Minnesota and a former candidate for the Republican nomination for president of the United States. One of the leading voices in the Republican Party, he is in a truly unique position to critique our current political environment, having heard the grassroots issues from a wide range of concerned citizens during his campaign. He also experienced firsthand how campaign finance rules and the media affect elections. In his presentations, he addresses our current political climate in a way that only someone who has traveled the country running for president and has successfully served as governor could. He discusses election analysis, what is next for the GOP, and the issues facing decision makers on Capitol Hill – from taxes, the economy, and the deficit to health care, education, and social issues.
Issue-Based Politics. Tim Pawlenty is one of the leading voices in the Republican Party. While governor of Minnesota, he used innovative and conservative leadership to balance Minnesota’s budget, cut spending, reform health care, and improve schools without raising taxes. Due to his leadership, Minnesota had nation-leading health care, the highest school test scores, and a leading economy. In his presentations, he addresses our political issues like health care reform, taxes, education, renewable energy, creating jobs, the economy, and the deficit.
Understanding Politics and Government’s Impact on your Business. Tim Pawlenty shares insights on leadership, public service, government, and policy. He explains how he successfully governed as a Republican in his left-leaning state of Minnesota, including eliminating the state’s deficit, reforming healthcare and education, creating jobs, and supporting renewable energy reform – all without raising taxes. He also shares his beliefs and his vision for how to improve America. In his presentations, he addresses the current political environment with a focus on policies and solutions for our country’s challenges from the Republican perspective.
Lessons in Leadership. Pawlenty discusses the leadership lessons he learned in government, including leading as a Republican in his left-leaning state of Minnesota and on the presidential campaign trail. He addresses what it takes to get things done successfully in a bi-partisan environment. Continue Reading » 




Download Topics


Topics available to speak on
Health CareLeadershipPolitical Leaders 







                        Location/Travels from: DC



FEES


Local
Please Inquire


US East
Please Inquire


US West
Please Inquire


Europe
Please Inquire


Asia
Please Inquire


* This specific fee falls within this range. Ranges are presented
                        as a
                        guideline only. Speaker fees are subject to change without notice.
                        For an exact quote, please contact your Leading Authorities representative.



Check Availability




 Check Fees & Availability



  



  



  



  





North America
Africa
Asia
Australia
Europe
South America
  



  





  



  


 

 

 





 



 

Similar Speakers




 



Haley Barbour


                                Former Governor of Mississippi                            





 



Trent Lott


                                Former U.S. Senator (R-MS) and Senate Majority Leader                            





 



John Sununu


                                Former U.S. Senator (R-NH)                            









Need a Speaker for Your Next Event?
Get a custom list of top recommendations today.

Need a Speaker?

or call 1-800-SPEAKER



Need a Speaker?




 
 
 
 

North America
Africa
Asia
Australia
Europe
South America
  


 
    


   
 




Your message has been sent. Thank you.





 

































	Pawlenty, Timothy James "Tim" - Legislator Record - Minnesota Legislators Past & Present


 
 











































 



MN Legislature


Minnesota Legislative Reference Library


Legislators Past & Present









Accessibility menu

Skip to main content
Skip to Legislative Reference Library navigation
Skip to footer






MN Legislature
Get Connected
About the Legislature
Mobile Site

Advanced Search


Search the MN Legislature









Menu






House
 

Minnesota House of Representatives

House Members and Staff
House Members
Leadership
Staff
Employment


Committees
Committee List
Committee Roster
Upcoming Meetings
Standing Committee Schedule
Minutes
Committee Deadlines


Offices
Chief Clerk
Fiscal Analysis
House Research
Public Information
Sergeant-at-Arms
Caucuses - DFL/GOP


Other Information
House Journal
House Rules
Joint Rules
Educational Programs




Senate
 

Minnesota Senate

Senators and Staff
Senators
Leadership
Staff
Employment


Committees
Committee List
Committee Roster
Upcoming Meetings
Standing Committee Schedule
Committee Deadlines


Offices
Secretary of the Senate
Senate Counsel, Research & Fiscal Analysis
Caucuses - DFL/GOP


Other Information
Senate Journal
Senate Rules
Joint Rules
Educational Programs




Joint
 

Joint Departments, Offices, and Commissions

Joint Legislative Offices
Revisor of Statutes
Legislative Reference Library
Office of the Legislative Auditor


Commissions
Legislative Coordinating Commission (LCC)
Legislative-Citizen Commission on MN Resources (LCCMR)
Legislative Commission on Pensions & Retirement (LCPR)
Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council
Legacy Amendment
More...




Schedules
 

Schedules, Calendars, and Legislative Business

House
House Schedules
Order of Business
Calendar for the Day
Supplemental Calendar for the Day
Fiscal Calendar


Senate
Senate Schedules
Order of Business
Senate Calendar
General Orders of the Day


Joint
Combined Upcoming Meetings
Broadcast TV Schedule
Committee Deadlines




Legislators
 

Legislators

House
House Members
Pronunciation Guide
Leadership
Address Spreadsheet
Caucuses - DFL/GOP
Floor Votes by Member


Senate
Senators
Pronunciation Guide
Leadership
Address Labels
Caucuses - DFL/GOP


Joint
Legislators Roster
Election Directory
Legislators Past & Present
Who Represents Me?




Committees
 

Legislative Committees

House
Committee List
Committee Roster
Upcoming Meetings
Standing Committee Schedule
Minutes


Senate
Committee List
Committee Roster
Upcoming Meetings
Standing Committee Schedule


Joint
Joint Committees & Task Forces
Committee Deadlines
Bills In Conference Committtee
Side by Side Comparisons




Bills
 

Bills

House


House Bill number





Bill Introductions
Summaries: Bill | Act
Fiscal Tracking Sheets
Hot List
Bill Search & Status (House)


Senate


Senate Bill number





Bill Introductions
Summaries: Bill | 
                            Act
Fiscal Tracking Sheets
Hot List
Bill Search & Status (Senate)


Joint
Bill Search & Status
MyBills
Side by Side Comparisons
Bills In Conference Committtee
Vetoes
Current Session Laws




Law
 

Statutes, Laws, and Rules

Statutes


Statute number





Keyword Search
Current Statutes
Statutes by Topic (Index)
Statutes Archive


Session Laws
Current Session Laws
Session Laws by Topic (Index)
Session Laws Archive
Session Laws Changed (Table 1)
Statutes Changed (Table 2)
Keyword Search


Administrative Rules
Current Rules
Rules by Topic (Index)
Rules Archive
Keyword Search
Minnesota Rule Status
State Register


Other Legal Materials
Minnesota Constitution
State Constitutional Amendments
Court Rules




Multimedia
 

Multimedia — Audio, Video, Broadcast TV, News, & Photos

House
Live Video
Webcast Schedule
Audio & Video Archives
Session Daily
Photos


Senate
Live Video
Live Video
Webcast Schedule
Audio Archives
Video Archives
Photos


Joint
Broadcast TV Schedule
Commission Audio/Video




Publications
 

Legislative Research, Reports & Information

Office Research & Reports
House Fiscal Analysis
House Research
Legislative Auditor
Senate Publications
Library
Revisor Publications


News
House Session Daily
Senate Media Services


Legislative History
Minnesota Legislative History Guide
House Journal
Senate Journal
Legislative Time Capsule
Vetoes


Notable Documents
Fiscal Review
MN Government in Brief
Minnesota Issues Guides
New Laws
Books & reports









Minnesota Legislative Reference Library
Legislators Past & Present







Library Navigation
















Books & Reports


Magazines


Newspapers


Historical
  


Legislature
State Government
Legislators Past & Present
Time Capsule
Virtual File
Print Materials




Guides


Links


Legislative History
  


Step by Step
Resources




Library Info
  


Mission & Collection
Hours & Location
Staff Directory
Services
Key Statutory Mandates
Employment Opportunities




 







Legislature > LRL Home > Legislators Past & Present > Member Record
New Search
 
Pawlenty, Timothy James "Tim"




Sessions Served
                
                  
                Other Information

 

 House  1993-2002  (District 38B)

Party when first elected:  Independent Republican

Counties Served: 
                   Dakota

BIOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION



Date of Birth: 
11/27/1960


Birth Place: 
Saint Paul, Minnesota


Birth County: 
Ramsey


Birth Country: 
United States


Date of Death: 




Gender: 
Male


Religion: 
 Baptist, Evangelical Christian







Other Names: 
Tim





City of Residence (when first elected): 
Eagan


Occupation (when first elected): 
Attorney; Rider, Bennett, Egan and Arundel Law Firm


EDUCATION


South Saint Paul High School; Secondary; University of Minnesota; B.A.; Political Science, 1983University of Minnesota, Law School; J.D.; 1986


OTHER GOVERNMENT SERVICE


U.S. Legislative Staff/Council/Commission: 
United States Senate (Intern for United States Senator Dave Durenberger); 
                         
                         ??/??/198? to ??/??/19??



Municipal Board/Commission: 
Eagan, Minnesota (City Planning Commission, Chair); 
                         
                         ??/??/1988 to ??/??/199?



Municipal Council/Aldermen: 
Eagan, Minnesota (City Council); 
                         
                         ??/??/1991 to ??/??/1992
[Elected]


State Governor: 
Minnesota; 
                         
                         01/06/2003 to 01/03/2011
[Elected]




FAMILY RELATIONSHIPS


Spouse: 
Mary Elizabeth Anderson Pawlenty (married in 1987, she was a Minnesota district court judge, 1994-2007)
Children: 
Two children: Anna and Mara (daughters)
Family Members Who Have Served in the Minnesota Legislature: 


GENERAL NOTES

He was of Polish and German ancestry.He ran unsuccessfully for the Republican party endorsement for President of the United States in the 2012 election.  He stepped down after coming in third in the August 2011 Iowa straw poll.He ran usuccessfully for the Republican party endorsement for Minnesota Governor in the 1998 election.  He dropped out of the race when Norm Coleman announced that he was running.Religion provided by the Star Tribune.  They state that he is a member of Wooddale Church which is affiliated with the Baptist General Conference.  (Star Tribune, 11/7/2006).  He's been identified as being raised Catholic and converting to the Baptist faith.  Other sources (such as Wikipedia) also identify him as Baptist, while a City Pages article identified him as Lutheran; in 2006, the Governor's Office identified him as Christian.  The Daily Telegraph in 2010 states "A Catholic who converted to become a Protestant evangelical."



 



Click to view




Eagan, MN






Total Days Served: 
3654

SESSIONS SERVED





                        82nd Legislative Session (2001-2002)
                     
                         
                        Session Details




Body: House


District: 38B




Elected: 11/7/2000


Residence: Eagan




Term of Office: 1/3/2001 to 1/6/2003




Counties Represented:
 Dakota


Occupation: Vice President for Corporate Development, Wizmo Inc.


Party:
Republican



Bills Authored:
Chief Author
                           
                        Author


Special Session Bills Authored:     2001 1st Sp.S. - Author


Committees:


Rules and Legislative Administration (Chair)







Leadership Position:
Majority Leader




 
 



Click to view

 








                        81st Legislative Session (1999-2000)
                     
                         
                        Session Details




Body: House


District: 38B




Elected: 11/3/1998


Residence: Eagan




Term of Office: 1/5/1999 to 1/2/2001




Counties Represented:
 Dakota


Occupation: Attorney; Rider, Bennett, Egan and Arundel Law Firm


Party:
Republican



Bills Authored:
Chief Author
                           
                        Author




Committees:


Rules and Legislative Administration (Chair)







Leadership Position:
Majority Leader




 
 


 








                        80th Legislative Session (1997-1998)
                     
                         
                        Session Details




Body: House


District: 38B




Elected: 11/5/1996


Residence: Eagan




Term of Office: 1/7/1997 to 1/4/1999




Counties Represented:
 Dakota


Occupation: Attorney; Rider, Bennett, Egan and Arundel Law Firm


Party:
Republican



Bills Authored:
Chief Author
                           
                        Author




Committees:


General Legislation, Veterans Affairs and Elections




Judiciary




Judiciary Subcommittee: Civil and Family Law Division




Rules and Legislative Administration








 
 


 








                        79th Legislative Session (1995-1996)
                     
                         
                        Session Details




Body: House


District: 38B




Elected: 11/8/1994


Residence: Eagan




Term of Office: 1/3/1995 to 1/6/1997




Counties Represented:
 Dakota


Occupation: Attorney; Rider, Bennett, Egan and Arundel Law Firm


Party:
Independent Republican



Bills Authored:
Chief Author
                           
                        Author




Committees:


General Legislation, Veterans Affairs and Elections




General Legislation, Veterans Affairs and Elections Subcommittee: Elections Division




Governmental Operations




Governmental Operations Subcommittee: State Government Finance Division




International Trade and Economic Development




Rules and Legislative Administration




Rules and Legislative Administration Subcommittee: Rules








 
 


 








                        78th Legislative Session (1993-1994)
                     
                         
                        Session Details




Body: House


District: 38B




Elected: 11/3/1992


Residence: Eagan




Term of Office: 1/5/1993 to 1/2/1995




Counties Represented:
 Dakota


Occupation: Attorney; Rider, Bennett, Egan and Arundel Law Firm


Party:
Independent Republican





Committees:


Education




Education Subcommittee: Higher Education Finance Division




Education Subcommittee: Higher Education Policy




Housing




Local Government and Metropolitan Affairs




Local Government and Metropolitan Affairs Subcommittee: Metropolitan Government








 
 


 






OTHER INFORMATION


Photographs
Minnesota. Governor (2003-2011 : Pawlenty). Governor's Office Photographs. Minnesota Historical Society.





Articles & Books By
Pawlenty, Tim.  Courage to Stand: An American Story.  Carol Stream, Illinois: Tyndale House, 2010.

 

Articles & Books About
Robson, Britt.  "Minnesota Held Hostage."  City Pages, June 1, 2005, p. 14-23.

 
Martin, Grant.  "Pawlenty Aims to Score on Issues, Put Bickering on Ice." Session Weekly, St. Paul: Minnesota House of Representatives Information Office, January 22, 1999, p. 13.

 
Samaha, Adam.  "Pawlenty Hopes to Bridge Suburban, Urban Concerns."  Session Weekly, St. Paul: Minnesota House of Representatives Information Office, January 29, 1993, p. 15.

 
Tim (Timothy J.) Pawlenty.  Biographical Information from the Minnesota Historical Society's Governors of Minnesota.

 


The Minnesota Legislative Reference Library has collected newspaper articles on legislators since 1973. They are available in the Library.





 

Name Search

Name






Other Searches

Session
Current
County Represented
City of Residence (when elected)
Leadership Positions 
Elections: Special, Contested, Recount
Committee Members & Chairs
Other Government Service
Self-Reported Minority
Gender
Occupation
Educational Institution
Education Level 
Birth or Death Dates
Birth Place 
Family Connections
Note Search
Religion
Constitutional Convention Members
View All Records
Database Information



 




View full site


About the Legislature

FAQ
Guide to the Legislative Process
Historical Information
Employment/Internships
Visiting the Capitol
Maps
Who Represents Me?
Accessibility



Contact Us


For all comments concerning legislation or issues:
Contact your House Member
Contact your Senator





For general information:
Contact a legislative librarian:
(651) 296-8338 or email.


View services for users with a hearing or speech disability


Submit website comments




Get Connected

MyBills
E-mail Updates & RSS Feeds
House News
Senate News
Phone Numbers





        Minnesota Legislative Reference Library, 645 State Office Building, Saint Paul, MN  55155












Tim Pawlenty - Governor, Lawyer - Biography.comSubscribe to NewsletterAboutTim Pawlenty Biography.comGovernor, Lawyer(1960–)27SHARESQuick FactsNameTim PawlentyOccupationGovernor, LawyerBirth DateNovember 27, 1960 (age 56)EducationUniversity of Minnesota Law SchoolPlace of BirthSouth St. Paul, MinnesotaFull NameTimothy James PawlentyTim PawlentyZodiac SignSagittariusCite This PageAttorney and politician Tim Pawlenty is a former Republican Minnesota state senator, and served as governor of Minnesota from 2003 to 2009.IN THESE GROUPSFamous People Born in South St. PaulFamous GovernmentFamous People in Business2012 Potential Republican Vice Presidential CandidatesShow All GroupsFamous People in EducationFamous People Named TimFamous People Born in United StatesFamous People Named PawlentyFamous ChristiansFamous People Born in MinnesotaFamous SagittariansFamous People Who Held Political OfficeFamous People in LawFamous People Born on November 27Famous People Born in 1960Famous University of Minnesota Law School AlumniFamous University of Minnesota AlumniFamous GovernorsFamous RepublicansFamous LawyersFamous People in U.S. PoliticsSynopsisTim Pawlenty was born on November 27, 1960, in South St. Paul, Minnesota. In 1992, he was elected to the Minnesota House of Representatives, and became Republican House majority leader in 1999. He was re-elected as a state representative four times. In 2003, he became the governor of Minnesota. In the summer of 2009, Pawlenty announced his decision not to seek a third term as Minnesota's governor.Early LifeTimothy James Pawlenty was born on November 27, 1960, in South St. Paul, Minnesota. After earning both his undergraduate and law degrees at the University of Minnesota. While obtaining his legal degree, he began working for the law firm of Rider, Bennett, Egan and  Arundel. In 1988, Pawlenty began working as political director for U.S. Sen. David Durenberger, a Republican, for whom Pawlenty had previously interned. He had also worked on Durenberger's campaign in the early 1980s, as an undergraduate student. Political CareerPawlenty made his true entrance into politics in 1989, when he was  elected to the Eagan City Council in Minnesota. A few years later, in  1992, he was elected to the Minnesota House of Representatives,  representing Dakota County, and became Republican House majority leader  in 1999. Pawlenty was re-elected as a state representative four times. Though Pawlenty had originally planned to seek a seat in the U.S.  Senate in 2001, several Republican leaders, including Vice President  Dick Cheney, asked him to step aside to allow Norm Coleman to challenge  Paul Wellstone. Pawlenty then decided to run for governor to succeed  Jesse Ventura. His campaign focused on socially conservative values; he  emphasized his pro-life stance and opposition to gay rights, as well as  keeping taxes minimal, while campaigning. The race saw four major-party candidates, including Pawlenty  (Republican) Roger Moe (Democratic), Tim Penny (Independent), and Ken  Pentel (Green). Pawlenty campaigned in 2002 on a pledge not to raise  taxes to balance the state's budget deficit. He also supported requiring  visa expiration dates on driver's licenses, a 24-hour waiting period on  abortions, implementing the state's conceal-carry gun law and changing  the state's education requirements. Pawlenty became the 39th governor of Minnesota, beginning his term on  January 6, 2003. He was re-elected in 2006. After balancing the state's  budget during his first term, the economic downturn that was endured  globally in 2008 caused Minnesota to face a $6 billion-plus deficit by  the end of Pawlenty's second term, in 2009. Pawlenty co-chaired Republican presidential candidate John McCain's  campaign during the 2008 presidential election, and was deemed by the  media as a possible running mate for McCain. However, the  vice-presidential nomination went to Republican Sarah Palin, Alaska's  governor at the time. In the summer of 2009, Pawlenty publicly announced his decision not to  seek a third term as Minnesota's governor. He left office a year and a  half later, in January of 2011. In May of 2011, Pawlenty announced his  candidacy in the 2012 presidential election. However, after several  months, and little success at gaining public traction, he withdrew from  the race. Soon after, he announced that he would endorse Republican  candidate Mitt Romney, former governor of Massachusetts,  for the presidental nomination. In 2012, news outlets began to identify Pawlenty as a possible running mate for Mitt Romney, in his 2012 presidential bid. In May of 2012, Pawlenty reportedly stated that he wasn't ruling out the possibility of being selected by Romney, though months earlier, he had told interviewers that he was not likely a top pick. Personal LifePawlenty married Mary Elizabeth Anderson, a district judge in Dakota County, Minnesota, in 1987. They have two daughters, Anna and Mara. Pawlenty wrote an autobiography, Courage to Stand: An American Story, which was published in 2010.Fact CheckWe strive for accuracy and fairness. If you see something that doesn't look right, contact us!Citation InformationArticle TitleTim Pawlenty Biography.comAuthorBiography.com EditorsWebsite NameThe Biography.com websiteURLhttps://www.biography.com/people/tim-pawlenty-360292Access Date{{$root.currentTime | date:'MMMM d, yyyy'}}PublisherA&E Television NetworksLast UpdatedApril 2, 2014Original Published Daten/a27SHARESBIO NEWSLETTERSign up to receive updates from BIO and A+E Networks.











































+1 (800) 598-7450


Digital River Logo
















Home › Press Releases › Tim Pawlenty Joins Digital River’s Board of DirectorsPress ReleasesSee what’s happening with Digital River. Read our company news, global editorial pieces and industry recognitions. 



Tim Pawlenty Joins Digital River’s Board of Directors
MINNEAPOLIS – Dec. 5, 2011 – Digital River, Inc. (NASDAQ: DRIV), a leading provider of global e-commerce solutions, announces the appointment of former Minnesota Governor Tim Pawlenty to its board of directors. Mr. Pawlenty served as Governor of the State of Minnesota for two terms from 2003-2011. As Minnesota’s Chief Executive Officer, he represented the interests of 5.2 million citizens and was responsible for a $50 billion biennial budget, 30,000 employees and over 20 agencies and departments.
“We are pleased to welcome Tim to Digital River’s board,” said Joel Ronning, Digital River’s CEO. “To our team, Tim brings a wealth of diverse business development and finance experience along with a strong international perspective. His vision and work developing and leading innovative initiatives will be an invaluable asset to our company. We look forward to his participation as we accelerate our development efforts in the digital marketplace and our growth across the software, consumer electronics, payments, entertainment and online service markets.”
“With more than 15 years of experience managing global online businesses for some of the Internet’s most notable brands, Digital River has earned a reputation as a thought leader in the industry,” said Mr. Pawlenty. “I am looking forward to being part of a company that is working on the front lines of a rapidly evolving marketplace marked by exciting opportunities.”
Mr. Pawlenty currently serves as a member of the board of directors of three companies: Miromatrix Medical, Ionix Medical and Red Prairie. He also serves as a senior advisor to Vector Capital.
During his career in public office, Mr. Pawlenty received Presidential appointments to serve on the Advisory Council on Historic Preservation and the National Infrastructure Advisory Committee. He served as chair of the National Governor’s Association, Education Commission of the States and Midwest Governor’s Association. Mr. Pawlenty also served in the Minnesota House of Representatives where he was elected Majority Leader.
In addition, Mr. Pawlenty has practiced law in the areas of criminal prosecution, civil litigation and appeals. He also served as Vice President of Corporate Development for Wizmo, an early stage technology services company, and was a member of the Board of Directors of NewTel Europe, LLC and Stratika.
About Digital River, Inc.
Digital River, Inc., a leading provider of global e-commerce solutions, builds and manages online businesses for software and game publishers, consumer electronics manufacturers, distributors, online retailers and affiliates. Its multi-channel e-commerce solution, which supports both direct and indirect sales, is designed to help companies of all sizes maximize online revenues as well as reduce the costs and risks of running an e-commerce operation. The company’s comprehensive platform offers site development and hosting, order management, fraud management, export controls, tax management, physical and digital product fulfillment, multi-lingual customer service, advanced reporting and strategic marketing services.
Founded in 1994, Digital River is headquartered in Minneapolis with offices across the U.S., Asia, Europe and South America. For more details about Digital River, visit the corporate website, follow the company on Twitter or call +1 952-253-1234.
Digital River is a registered trademark of Digital River, Inc. All other company and product names are trademarks, registrations or copyrights of their respective owners.
Twitter Tags: #ecommerce, #DigitalRiverInc
Tweet This: Tim Pawlenty joins Digital River’s Board of Directors #ecommerce


See Also

Press Releases
Media Coverage

Media Inquiries
The goal of Digital River’s global public relations team is to provide you with timely
					 information and interesting story ideas. To help you find the right information for your story, 
					 please send email inquiries to Public Relations.

Gerri Dyrek
						Group VP, Corporate Communications
P: +1 952 225 3719
					

Kristin McKenzie
						Associate Director, Corporate Communications
P: +1 952 225 3718
					












Contact Us
Contact Us



First Name



Last Name



Email Address



Phone Number



Company Name





AfghanistanAland IslandsAlbaniaAlgeriaAmerican SamoaAndorraAngolaAnguillaAntarcticaAntigua and BarbudaArgentinaArmeniaArubaAustraliaAustriaAzerbaijanBahamasBahrainBangladeshBarbadosBelarusBelgiumBelizeBeninBermudaBhutanBolivia, Plurinational State ofBonaire, Sint Eustatius and SabaBosnia and HerzegovinaBotswanaBouvet IslandBrazilBritish Indian Ocean TerritoryBrunei DarussalamBulgariaBurkina FasoBurundiCambodiaCameroonCanadaCape VerdeCayman IslandsCentral African RepublicChadChileChinaChristmas IslandCocos (Keeling) IslandsColombiaComorosCongo, the Democratic Republic of theCongoCook IslandsCosta RicaCote d’IvoireCroatiaCubaCuraçaoCyprusCzech RepublicDenmarkDjiboutiDominicaDominican RepublicEcuadorEgyptEl SalvadorEquatorial GuineaEritreaEstoniaEthiopiaFalkland Islands (Malvinas)Faroe IslandsFederated MicronesiaFijiFinlandFranceFrench GuianaFrench PolynesiaFrench Southern TerritoriesGabonGambiaGeorgiaGermanyGhanaGibraltarGreeceGreenlandGrenadaGuadeloupeGuamGuatemalaGuernseyGuineaGuinea-BissauGuyanaHaitiHeard Island and McDonald IslandsHoly See (Vatican City State)HondurasHungaryIcelandIndiaIndonesiaIran, Islamic Republic ofIraqIrelandIsle of ManIsraelItalyJamaicaJapanJerseyJordanKazakhstanKenyaKiribatiKorea, Democratic People’s Republic ofKorea, Republic ofKuwaitKyrgyzstanLao People’s Democratic RepublicLatviaLebanonLesothoLiberiaLibyan Arab JamahiriyaLiechtensteinLithuaniaLuxembourgMacaoMacedonia, the former Yugoslav Republic ofMadagascarMalawiMalaysiaMaldivesMaliMaltaMarshall IslandsMartiniqueMauritaniaMauritiusMayotteMexicoMoldova, Republic ofMonacoMongoliaMontenegroMontserratMoroccoMozambiqueMyanmarNamibiaNauruNepalNetherlandsNew CaledoniaNew ZealandNicaraguaNigerNigeriaNiueNorfolk IslandNorthern Mariana IslandsNorwayOmanPakistanPalauPalestinian Territory, OccupiedPanamaPapua New GuineaParaguayPeruPhilippinesPitcairnPolandPortugalPuerto RicoQatarReunionRomaniaRussian FederationRwandaSaint BarthélemySaint Helena, Ascension and Tristan da CunhaSaint Kitts and NevisSaint LuciaSaint Martin (French part)Saint Pierre and MiquelonSaint Vincent and the GrenadinesSamoaSan MarinoSao Tome and PrincipeSaudi ArabiaSenegalSerbiaSeychellesSierra LeoneSingaporeSint Maarten (Dutch part)SlovakiaSloveniaSolomon IslandsSomaliaSouth AfricaSouth Georgia and the South Sandwich IslandsSouth SudanSpainSri LankaSudanSurinameSvalbard and Jan MayenSwazilandSwedenSwitzerlandSyrian Arab RepublicTaiwanTajikistanTanzania, United Republic ofThailandTimor-LesteTogoTokelauTongaTrinidad and TobagoTunesiaTurkeyTurkmenistanTurks and Caicos IslandsTuvaluUgandaUkraineUnited Arab EmiratesUnited KingdomUnited StatesUruguayU.S. Minor Outlying IslandsUzbekistanVanuatuVirgin IslandsVenezuela, Bolivarian Republic ofVietnamVirgin Islands, BritishWallis and FutunaWestern SaharaYemenZambiaZimbabwe 



Please select your primary area of interest:




                      Commerce
                    




                      World Payments
                    




                      Marketing
                    




                      Customer Service
                    





Tell Us More





Opt In: I wish to receive solution, event and company updates from Digital River via email.












Send
















Ecommerce, Payments & Digital Marketing Press Releases





















































+1 (800) 598-7450


Digital River Logo
















Home › Company › Newsroom › Press ReleasesPress ReleasesSee what’s happening with Digital River. Read our company news, global editorial pieces and industry recognitions. 






				        View by year     
				        
2017
2016
2015
2014
2013
2012
2011




June 29th, 2017
Digital River and Jabra Join Forces to Expand Jabra’s Ecommerce Business to 50 Countries in 24 Months
Add Chinese direct-to-consumer ecommerce store and in-country order fulfillment for the audio technology specialist 

 MINNEAPOLIS – June 29, 2017 – Digital River, Inc., a leading global...
Read More


June 22nd, 2017
New Commissioned Ecommerce Research from Digital River: Customer Churn Causes Nearly 20 Percent Fall Off in Annual Subscription Revenue
Advises online businesses to maximize renewals to ensure long-term profitability with subscriptions

 MINNEAPOLIS – June 22, 2017 – Digital River, Inc., a leading global provider of...
Read More


June 21st, 2017
Digital River Integrates with Adobe Experience Manager to Power New Cloud Commerce Solution
Pairs elegant, personalized digital shopping experiences with an integrated commerce cloud, recognized for subscriptions and globalization capabilities

 MINNEAPOLIS – June 21, 2017 – Digital...
Read More


June 5th, 2017
New Ecommerce Research from Digital River Shows 34 Percent of Subscribers are Needlessly Lost to Churn
Digital River to host webinar that features guest speaker Lily Varon, an analyst from an independent research firm, and research findings about how to combat subscriber churn 

MINNEAPOLIS –...
Read More


May 1st, 2017
Digital River Named a Leader in the Gartner Magic Quadrant for Digital Commerce
Evaluation Based on Completeness of Vision and Ability to Execute
MINNEAPOLIS – May 1, 2017 – Digital River, Inc., a leading global provider of Commerce-as-a-Service solutions, announced it has...
Read More


March 28th, 2017
Global Independent Research Firm Names Digital River as a Strong Performer in its Report on B2C Commerce Suites
Recognized for its globalization capabilities, ability to handle global payments and complex subscriptions

MINNEAPOLIS – March 28, 2017 – Digital River, Inc., a leading global provider of...
Read More


March 20th, 2017
Digital River Sponsors and Exhibits at Adobe Summit
MINNEAPOLIS – Mar. 20, 2017 – Digital River, Inc., a leading global provider of Commerce-as-a-Service solutions, announced that it will sponsor and exhibit at Adobe Summit...
Read More


March 15th, 2017
Digital River World Payments Adds In-Country Payment Processing in Hong Kong, Singapore and Australia; Expands in Europe
Integrates with First Data’s global acquiring platform to advance international growth plans

 MINNEAPOLIS – Mar. 15, 2017 – Digital River World Payments, a global payments service provider,...
Read More


February 22nd, 2017
Digital River Hosts Seventh Annual Monetization Day at the 2017 Game Developers Conference
Features trio of panels discussing virtual reality, fraud prevention best practices and top revenue-generating techniques 

MINNEAPOLIS – Feb. 22, 2017 – Digital River, Inc., a leading global...
Read More


February 8th, 2017
Digital River World Payments Expands Relationship with ACI Worldwide
Adds ACI ReD Shield fraud prevention to its global online payments solution
MINNEAPOLIS and NAPLES, FL – Feb 8, 2017 – Digital River World Payments, a global payments service provider, and ACI...
Read More


January 5th, 2017
Goal Zero, Solar Power Products Innovator, Selects Digital River to Run European Direct-to-Consumer Ecommerce Operations
MINNEAPOLIS – Jan. 5, 2017 – Digital River, Inc., a leading global provider of Commerce-as-a-Service solutions, announced it is running direct-to-consumer ecommerce operations for Goal Zero,...
Read More



See Also

Press Releases
Media Coverage

Media Inquiries
The goal of Digital River’s global public relations team is to provide you with timely
				 information and interesting story ideas. To help you find the right information for your story, 
				 please send email inquiries to Public Relations.

Gerri Dyrek
					Group VP, Corporate Communications
P: +1 952 225 3719
				

Kristin McKenzie
					Associate Director, Corporate Communications
P: +1 952 225 3718
				




 







Contact Us
Contact Us



First Name



Last Name



Email Address



Phone Number



Company Name





AfghanistanAland IslandsAlbaniaAlgeriaAmerican SamoaAndorraAngolaAnguillaAntarcticaAntigua and BarbudaArgentinaArmeniaArubaAustraliaAustriaAzerbaijanBahamasBahrainBangladeshBarbadosBelarusBelgiumBelizeBeninBermudaBhutanBolivia, Plurinational State ofBonaire, Sint Eustatius and SabaBosnia and HerzegovinaBotswanaBouvet IslandBrazilBritish Indian Ocean TerritoryBrunei DarussalamBulgariaBurkina FasoBurundiCambodiaCameroonCanadaCape VerdeCayman IslandsCentral African RepublicChadChileChinaChristmas IslandCocos (Keeling) IslandsColombiaComorosCongo, the Democratic Republic of theCongoCook IslandsCosta RicaCote d’IvoireCroatiaCubaCuraçaoCyprusCzech RepublicDenmarkDjiboutiDominicaDominican RepublicEcuadorEgyptEl SalvadorEquatorial GuineaEritreaEstoniaEthiopiaFalkland Islands (Malvinas)Faroe IslandsFederated MicronesiaFijiFinlandFranceFrench GuianaFrench PolynesiaFrench Southern TerritoriesGabonGambiaGeorgiaGermanyGhanaGibraltarGreeceGreenlandGrenadaGuadeloupeGuamGuatemalaGuernseyGuineaGuinea-BissauGuyanaHaitiHeard Island and McDonald IslandsHoly See (Vatican City State)HondurasHungaryIcelandIndiaIndonesiaIran, Islamic Republic ofIraqIrelandIsle of ManIsraelItalyJamaicaJapanJerseyJordanKazakhstanKenyaKiribatiKorea, Democratic People’s Republic ofKorea, Republic ofKuwaitKyrgyzstanLao People’s Democratic RepublicLatviaLebanonLesothoLiberiaLibyan Arab JamahiriyaLiechtensteinLithuaniaLuxembourgMacaoMacedonia, the former Yugoslav Republic ofMadagascarMalawiMalaysiaMaldivesMaliMaltaMarshall IslandsMartiniqueMauritaniaMauritiusMayotteMexicoMoldova, Republic ofMonacoMongoliaMontenegroMontserratMoroccoMozambiqueMyanmarNamibiaNauruNepalNetherlandsNew CaledoniaNew ZealandNicaraguaNigerNigeriaNiueNorfolk IslandNorthern Mariana IslandsNorwayOmanPakistanPalauPalestinian Territory, OccupiedPanamaPapua New GuineaParaguayPeruPhilippinesPitcairnPolandPortugalPuerto RicoQatarReunionRomaniaRussian FederationRwandaSaint BarthélemySaint Helena, Ascension and Tristan da CunhaSaint Kitts and NevisSaint LuciaSaint Martin (French part)Saint Pierre and MiquelonSaint Vincent and the GrenadinesSamoaSan MarinoSao Tome and PrincipeSaudi ArabiaSenegalSerbiaSeychellesSierra LeoneSingaporeSint Maarten (Dutch part)SlovakiaSloveniaSolomon IslandsSomaliaSouth AfricaSouth Georgia and the South Sandwich IslandsSouth SudanSpainSri LankaSudanSurinameSvalbard and Jan MayenSwazilandSwedenSwitzerlandSyrian Arab RepublicTaiwanTajikistanTanzania, United Republic ofThailandTimor-LesteTogoTokelauTongaTrinidad and TobagoTunesiaTurkeyTurkmenistanTurks and Caicos IslandsTuvaluUgandaUkraineUnited Arab EmiratesUnited KingdomUnited StatesUruguayU.S. Minor Outlying IslandsUzbekistanVanuatuVirgin IslandsVenezuela, Bolivarian Republic ofVietnamVirgin Islands, BritishWallis and FutunaWestern SaharaYemenZambiaZimbabwe 



Please select your primary area of interest:




                      Commerce
                    




                      World Payments
                    




                      Marketing
                    




                      Customer Service
                    





Tell Us More





Opt In: I wish to receive solution, event and company updates from Digital River via email.












Send












